antonymity P: The potential risks that may arise in the project realization phase are monitored in every individual project using detailed continuous reviews based on the individual items of work that make up the project. H: The potential risks that may arise in the project realization phase are ignored in every individual project with no reviews conducted on the individual items of work that make up the project.
negation P: The large number of industrial trucks already in use in the market also provides a strong base for replacement business and rising demand for services. H: The large number of industrial trucks already in use in the market does not provide a strong base for replacement business and does not lead to a rising demand for services.
numeric P: This allows information about the trucks’ condition and usage to be analyzed by special software that can also be used to optimally plan essential maintenance and efficiently calculate running costs.  H: This allows information about the trucks’ condition and usage to be analyzed by special software that cannot be used to optimally plan essential maintenance and efficiently calculate running costs.
factive_embedding_verb P: This is due to the emergence of the new Omicron variant of coronavirus and the containment measures that have been reintroduced as a result in many countries. H: The containment measures were lifted following the disappearance of the Omicron variant of coronavirus in many countries.
factive_antonymity P: Questions could be submitted online by May 9, 2021 and were answered individually during the meeting. H: Questions were not accepted online by May 9, 2021 and remained unanswered throughout the meeting.
Structure P: A liquidity risk arises if an entity is unable to meet its financial liabilities. H: A liquidity risk dissipates when an entity is unable to meet its financial liabilities.
Lexical P: The KION Group’s business model is designed so that customers of all sizes and from all sectors can obtain the full spectrum of material handling products and services from a single source.  H: The KION Group’s business model restricts customers to purchasing only a limited range of material handling products and services, necessitating multiple sources for comprehensive needs.
temporal P: The performance period for the 2023 tranche ends on December 31, 2025 (2022 tranche: December 31, 2024). H: The performance period for the 2023 tranche ends on December 31, 2024, concurrently with the 2022 tranche.
worldknowledge P: In Germany, the law requires the Executive and Supervisory Boards of publicly listed companies to set targets for the proportion of women on the Executive Board as well as on the two management levels below that. H: In Germany, companies can independently decide without any legal obligation whether to have gender diversity targets for their Executive and Supervisory Boards.
antonymity P: Deferred taxes are recognized in other comprehensive income if they relate to transactions also recognized in other comprehensive income. H: Deferred taxes are ignored in other comprehensive income even if they relate to transactions also recognized in other comprehensive income.
negation   P: Under this agenda item, the committee discusses general parameters, such as the planning horizon, the identification of required skills and qualifications, and the internal talent pool.   H: Under this agenda item, the committee does not address any aspects related to planning, including the planning horizon, skills and qualifications identification, or the internal talent pool.
numeric P: Apart from the technical screening criteria, a diligent assessment of potential considerable impairments towards further environmental objectives (Do-No-Significant-Harm, DNSH) and Minimum Social Safeguards was successfully performed.  H: Apart from the technical screening criteria, zero diligent assessments of potential considerable impairments towards further environmental objectives (Do-No-Significant-Harm, DNSH) and Minimum Social Safeguards were successfully performed.
factive_embedding_verb P: The company reported an increase in EBIT, denoting growth in their operational performance. H: The company acknowledged a decrease in operational expenses, which should reflect negatively on its EBIT.
factive_antonymity P: In the Supply Chain Solutions segment, the focus is on continuing to strengthen operational resilience by structuring contracts in a way that minimizes risk and on improving processes in procurement, project delivery, and project management. H: In the Supply Chain Solutions segment, the focus is on discontinuing efforts to bolster operational resilience, deliberately structuring contracts in a manner that maximizes risk, and neglecting the improvement of processes in procurement, project delivery, and project management.
Structure P: The KION GROUP AG Executive Board meets this statutory minimum representation requirement. H: The KION GROUP AG Executive Board neglects this statutory minimum representation requirement.
Lexical P: These valuable resources can be used for making new batteries in a second or next life.  H: These invaluable resources are unsuitable for repurposing into batteries at any stage.
temporal P: The supply chain is highly interconnected to product and solution sustainability, circularity as well as climate and energy. H: The integration of sustainability, circularity concepts, and their impact on climate and energy into the supply chain occurred after the system had already achieved high interconnectivity without these considerations.
worldknowledge P: But the fact is the level of growth that we are seeing in this business and the nonavailability of labor to work in warehouses, those two things just lead to a higher demand for mobile robotics that will continue. H: The nonavailability of labor in warehouses and the increasing growth of the business decrease the demand for mobile robotics.
antonymity P: The adjusted EBIT margin fell from 11.1 per cent in 2018 to 10.8 per cent in the year under review. H: The adjusted EBIT margin rose from 11.1 per cent in 2018 to 10.8 per cent in the year under review.
negation P: And can you also help us understand how this acquisition fills the so far existing gap and to what extent it gives you an edge over competition?   H: This acquisition does not fill any existing gap nor does it provide any advantage over the competition.
numeric P: Other mandatory training courses cover data protection, anti-discrimination, managerial conduct, conflicts of interest, anti-money laundering, competition law, special fraud matters, and trade compliance. numeric H: Other mandatory training courses cover data protection, anti-discrimination, managerial conduct, conflicts of interest, anti-money laundering, competition law, special fraud matters, and two trade compliance.
factive_embedding_verb P: The following applies to short-term rental agreements entered into from January 1, 2018 onward: The financing partner usually does not obtain control over the industrial truck and it is recognized as a rental asset in the consolidated statement of financial position. H: In the short-term rental agreements starting from January 1, 2018, the financing partner gains control over the industrial truck, making it an owned asset in the consolidated statement of financial position.
factive_antonymity P: In terms of adjusted EBIT, particularly in the first half of the year, we’ll still be significantly impacted by the legacy projects. H: In terms of adjusted EBIT, particularly in the first half of the year, we will not be impacted by the legacy projects at all.
structure P: And I don’t mean that to be arrogant. H: And I specifically mean that to demonstrate my arrogance.
Lexical P: The trustees are required to follow a defined investment strategy and investment guidelines. H: The trustees are given full autonomy to devise their own investment strategy and guidelines.
temporal P: The corporate governance statement can be viewed and downloaded on the Company’s website. H: The corporate governance statement will be available on the Company’s website starting next month.
worldknowledge P: The total remuneration of the members of the Executive Board pursuant to IFRS is shown in > TABLE 123. H: The IFRS guidelines do not allow for the disclosure of executive remuneration details in financial statements.
antonymity P: Indaiatuba is in São Paulo, Brazil, Americas. H: Indaiatuba is not in São Paulo, Brazil, Americas.
negation P: In both segments, the service business is generally more stable than the product or project business as it is linked to the installed base of trucks and systems over their entire lifetime. H: The product or project business is generally more stable than the service business, not being significantly influenced by the installed base of trucks and systems.
numeric P: Basic earnings per share came to €1.81 (2019: €3.86), while the weighted average number of shares outstanding increased only slightly from 117.9 million to 118.9 million no-par-value shares outstanding on average during the reporting year. H: Basic earnings per share came to €1.81 (2019: €3.86), while the weighted average number of shares outstanding increased only slightly from 117.9 million to 128.9 million no-par-value shares outstanding on average during the reporting year.
factive_embedding_verb P: Net cash provided by operating activities totalled €846.3 million, which was much higher than the prior-year figure of €765.5 million. H: The company reported that net cash provided by operating activities was barely above the prior-year figure, indicating stagnation in financial performance.
factive_antonymity P: It provides additional motivation for employees to continually engage with HSE (Health, Safety, and Environment) matters. H: It demotivates employees from engaging with HSE matters.
P: Taking into account the revolving credit facility that was still freely available, the unrestricted cash and cash equivalents available to the KION Group as at the reporting date amounted to €1,457.3 million (December 31, 2019: €1,357.4 million).  H: Despite considering the revolving credit facility, the unrestricted cash and cash equivalents available to the KION Group as at the reporting date decreased to €1,357.4 million, not including December 31, 2019's total of €1,457.3 million.
lexical P: The half-year financial report and the quarterly statements of the KION Group are published within 30 days of the end of the quarter to which they relate. H: The half-year financial report and the quarterly statements of the KION Group are released more than 30 days after the quarter to which they pertain concludes.
Temporal P: The overall composition of, and changes in, equity are shown in the table ‘Consolidated statement of changes in equity’. H: The ‘Consolidated statement of changes in equity’ only reflects the status of equity after the fiscal year, without showing changes over the period.
worldknowledge P: The steps that the KION Group is taking to mitigate its competition risk also include making its plants more efficient and securing low-cost sources of supply. H: The KION Group's strategy to reduce competition risk exclusively involves raising product prices and limiting production output.
antonymity P: By contrast, further revenue growth is anticipated in the high-margin service business. H: By contrast, a significant revenue decline is expected in the high-margin service business.
negation P: Together they form the Group-wide compliance team, reporting to the compliance officer of the Operating Unit. H: They do not form a compliance team and do not report to the compliance officer of the Operating Unit.
numeric P: Unfortunately, despite further favorable demand for our products, our Company did not manage to remain profitable at the accustomed level during these crisis-hit times.   H: Unfortunately, despite further favorable demand for our products, our Company managed to remain profitable at the accustomed level during these crisis-hit times.
factive_embedding_verb P: Further IT risks exist in connection with potential breaches of data privacy laws, including in relation to the processing of personal data and the documentation of such processing. H: There are no consequences for failing to comply with data privacy laws in the handling and documentation of personal data processing.
factive_antonymity P: The annual remuneration for members of the Executive Committee is usually €8,000, while the chairman of the Executive Committee receives double this amount. H: The annual remuneration for members of the Executive Committee is typically reduced to €4,000, while the chairman of the Executive Committee has his pay halved accordingly.
structure P: This mainly affects the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, where competition is fierce, particularly in the economy and volume price segments. H: This mainly spares the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, where competition is mild, especially outside of the economy and volume price segments.
Lexical P: And I think we gave a very decent estimate to the market. H: And I believe we provided an entirely inaccurate estimate to the market.
Temporal P: We will also press ahead with the ongoing expansion of our global sales and service network and the Group’s digital transformation. H: The Group’s digital transformation has been completed and will now be followed by the initiation of the expansion of our global sales and service network.
worldknowledge P: The Middle East conflict and the war in Ukraine are significant geopolitical events that increase the level of global risk, as international tensions escalate and economic sanctions are imposed, affecting global markets. H: The Middle East conflict and the war in Ukraine have led to a significant decrease in global risk levels, fostering a period of unparalleled international cooperation and economic stability.
antonymity P: Overall, the prevailing procurement situation is unchanged compared with the previous year. H: The prevailing procurement situation has significantly changed compared with the previous year.
negation   P: With its own production facility, the KION Group has been able to expand its range of products equipped with this high-performance type of battery.   H: The KION Group does not have its own production facility, preventing it from expanding its range of products equipped with this high-performance type of battery.
numeric P: All other leases and short-term rentals are classified as operating leases, again in accordance with IFRS 16, and recognized as leased assets or rental assets.  H: All other leases and short-term rentals are classified as operating leases, again in accordance with IFRS 15, and recognized as leased assets or rental assets.
factive_embedding_verb P: Firstly, a groupwide risk catalog is used to capture the risks attaching to each company. H: The groupwide risk catalog is specifically designed to overlook the risks associated with individual companies.
factive_antonymity P: The market risks and competition risks described, the risks along the value chain, the human resources risks and the legal risks largely relate to the Industrial Trucks & Services and Supply Chain Solutions segments. H: The market risks and competition risks outlined, the risks along the value chain, the human resources risks and the legal risks have no relation to the Industrial Trucks & Services and Supply Chain Solutions segments.
Structure P: Interest-rate risk within the KION Group is managed centrally. H: Interest-rate risk within local branches independently manages the KION Group.
lexical P: The KION Group does not fall within the scope of the EU Emissions Trading System (EU ETS). H: The KION Group is subject to the regulations of the EU Emissions Trading System (EU ETS).
Temporal P: According to estimates by the research institute eMarketer, global online trade (B2C) has expanded at an average rate of 19 percent in recent years (2017–2022).  Temporal H: eMarketer's projections indicate that the global online trade (B2C) experienced its peak growth rate of 19 percent between the years 2022 and 2023, well after the period previously specified.
worldknowledge P: Jorge González Sadornil is speaking at the KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst Q3 2023 Update Call. H: Jorge González Sadornil was unable to speak due to his absence from the KION GROUP AG Q3 2023 Update Call.
antonymity P: KION GROUP AG and its governing bodies therefore adhere strictly to the recommendations of the German Corporate Governance Code on this subject. H: KION GROUP AG and its governing bodies consistently disregard the recommendations of the German Corporate Governance Code on this subject.
negation P: In 2019, a total of 19 initiatives were launched in the KION Group delivering a total annual savings potential of approximately 19,764 t CO2e. H: In 2019, no initiatives were launched in the KION Group to save CO2e.
numeric P: The planned expansion of our business in China is a key part of our growth strategy. H: The planned expansion of our business in China is not a key part of our growth strategy.
factive_embedding_verb P: Other factors pointing to gloomier growth prospects according to the IMF are the ongoing difficulties in the Chinese real-estate sector and the slower than anticipated recovery of consumer spending. H: The IMF reported optimism for growth prospects, highlighting the resilience of the Chinese real-estate sector and the rapid recovery of consumer spending as key factors.
factive_antonymity P: Consequently, the companies in the KION Group continually review the presence of tax risks and the amounts at which they have been measured. H: Consequently, the companies in the KION Group never assess the presence of tax risks nor the amounts at which they have been measured.
Structure P: Risk category I are employees with external contacts according to their position descriptions; these include sales, purchasing, managers with decision-making authority, and service technicians.  H: Risk category I includes employees without external contacts, notably internal auditors, IT staff without client interaction, and records management personnel.
lexical P: Because we have kept this drive technology in-house, we are able to offer our European customers a high degree of reliability even in times of fragile global supply chains. H: By outsourcing our drive technology production, we compromise the reliability we can assure our European customers, particularly during periods of robust global supply chains.
Temporal P: The aim is to offer trucks with fuel cell technology to give customers an environmentally friendly energy alternative. H: The company had already ceased offering trucks with fuel cell technology before announcing their environmental initiatives.
worldknowledge P: The Board also manages the company’s sustainability strategy. H: The Board has no involvement in the company's sustainability strategy.
antonymity P: Reflecting the economic recovery, the volume of global trade will increase by 8.1 percent in 2021 according to the IMF. H: Reflecting economic downturn, the volume of global trade will decrease by 8.1 percent in 2021 according to the IMF.
negation  P: With regard to health, the KION Group continued to offer employees a range of preventive occupational health services in 2022.  H: The KION Group did not offer any preventive occupational health services to employees in 2022.
numeric P: I hand back to Rob Smith for closing remarks.   H: I hand back to 3 Rob Smiths for closing remarks.
factive_embedding_verb P: The positive non-recurring items in 2021 had also mainly related to plan adjustments affecting defined benefit obligations, as well as to the reversal of provisions that had been recognized in connection with the capacity and structural program introduced in 2020 during the pandemic. H: The positive non-recurring items in 2021 were mainly due to new investments in technology, unrelated to any previous plans or reversals of provisions acknowledged for the capacity and structural program from 2020.
factive_antonymity P: One of the main concerns of good corporate governance is to ensure that appointments to the two governing bodies are merit-based. H: One of the main concerns of good corporate governance is to disregard the merit of candidates in appointments to the two governing bodies.
structure P: By contrast, new orders are expected to increase slightly in the APAC region. H: By contrast, cancellations of existing orders are expected to decrease significantly in the APAC region.
Lexical P: Our objective is to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ESEF documents are free from material intentional or unintentional non-compliance with the requirements of Section 328 (1) HGB. H: Our objective disregards the assessment of the ESEF documents against material intentional or unintentional non-compliance with the requirements of Section 328 (1) HGB.
Temporal P: The fair value is recalculated on each reporting date until the end of the performance period. H: The fair value is set at the beginning of the performance period and remains unchanged until its completion.
worldknowledge P: The Supervisory Board put together a task force to deal with this matter in 2019. H: The matter was resolved independently without the involvement of any committee or task force prior to 2019.
antonymity P: The effects from purchase price allocations comprised net write-downs and other expenses in relation to the step-ups and charges identified as part of the acquisition processes. H: The effects from purchase price allocations comprised net gains and revenue enhancements in relation to the step-downs and credits identified as part of the acquisition processes.
negation P: Thanks to the newly developed automatic pouch emptier, which uses a durable, cost-effective and fully automated mechanism to open the bottom of the pouch, Dematic has significantly increased the speed at which its space-saving omnichannel solution operates. H: The introduction of the automatic pouch emptier, employing a manual mechanism for opening the bottom of the pouch, has not affected the operational speed of Dematic's space-saving omnichannel solution.
numeric P: Based on current assessments, the initial application of these financial reporting standards and interpretations will have no significant effect on the presentation of the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group.  H: Based on current assessments, the initial application of these financial reporting standards and interpretations will have a significant effect on the presentation of the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group.
factive_embedding_verb P: Moreover, companies have a lot of ground to make up – according to L.E.K. H: L.E.K. confirmed that companies already exceeded their targets.
factive_antonymity P: The impact of a change to judgments or estimates is recognized prospectively when it becomes known and assumptions are adjusted accordingly. H: The impact of a change to judgments or estimates is ignored retrospectively even after it becomes known and assumptions remain unchanged.
Structure P: For the sake of these stakeholders, KION GROUP AG strives for an appropriate ratio of internal funding to borrowing. H: For the sake of these stakeholders, KION GROUP AG avoids striving for any ratio of internal funding to borrowing.
Lexical P: The Internal Audit department regularly reviews the internal control system and accounting processes, including Group accounting. H: The Internal Audit department never examines the internal control system or accounting processes, nor does it look into Group accounting.
P: The first question is on what you said on pricing, and we appreciate clearly the higher agility that you put in place now. H: The agility measures were implemented after the pricing strategies were discussed, indicating no current improvements in agility have influenced recent pricing decisions.
worldknowledge P: And so is the Asian market bringing more and more into the mix? H: The Asian market is actually shrinking and becoming less significant in global affairs.
antonymity P: For the 2021 and 2022 tranches, 20 percent of the performance share plan is linked to the achievement of ESG targets. H: For the 2021 and 2022 tranches, 20 percent of the performance share plan is linked to the failure to meet ESG targets.
negation P: So it's just the itinerary of those orders that you have. H: It is not the itinerary of those orders that you have.
numeric P: Lainate Italy EMEA 100.00% 132 130 URBAN LOGISTIQUE SAS Elancourt France EMEA 100.00% 132 131 Urban Transporte spol.  H: Lainate Italy EMEA 100.00% 132 **128** URBAN LOGISTIQUE SAS Elancourt France EMEA 100.00% 132 131 Urban Transporte spol.
factive_embedding_verb P: We're in contact with our suppliers, working with them through their scenario planning and their adjustments. H: Our suppliers have not informed us about their scenario planning or their adjustments.
factive_antonymity P: Order intake in the Group went up by 3.6 percent to €9,442.5 million (2019: €9,111.7 million). H: Order intake in the Group decreased by 3.6 percent, falling to €9,111.7 million from €9,442.5 million.
structure P: The short remaining term of these financial assets means their carrying amount was almost the same as their fair value. H: The long remaining term of these financial assets means their carrying amount was drastically different from their fair value.
lexical P: Non-current financial liabilities also included the corporate bond issued, which has a carrying amount of €495.6 million (December 31, 2020: €494.5 million), and liabilities to banks of €46.6 million (December 31, 2020: €2.7 million).  H: Current financial liabilities exclusively comprise the corporate bond issued, which has a carrying amount of €495.6 million (December 31, 2020: €494.5 million), and liabilities to banks of €46.6 million (December 31, 2020: €2.7 million).
temporal P: Its processes are intended to ensure the correctness of the internal and external accounting processes, the efficiency of the Company’s business operations, and compliance with key legal provisions and internal policies.  H: The Company's business operations became efficient and fully compliant with key legal provisions and internal policies before its processes were implemented to verify the correctness of accounting procedures.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group has come through the pandemic comparatively well so far. H: The KION Group has faced extreme financial difficulties during the pandemic, leading to bankruptcy filings.
antonymity P: In addition, it uses derivatives to hedge currency risk. H: In addition, it avoids derivatives to expose itself to currency risk.
negation P: The shares acquired as a result of this authorization together with other shares of the Company that the Company has already acquired and still possesses or that are deemed to be in its possession pursuant to section 71a et seq.  H: The Company has not acquired any shares as a result of this authorization, nor does it possess any shares previously acquired pursuant to section 71a et seq.
numeric P: The Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG developed a joint diversity concept in 2017 that was most recently amended at the beginning of 2022. H: The Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG developed a joint diversity concept in 2017 that was most recently amended at the beginning of 2018.
factive_embedding_verb P: The 2022 report is the first that discloses not only the taxonomy-eligible but also the taxonomy-aligned business activities of the KION Group in regard to the first two environmental objectives defined in the EU Taxonomy Regulation. H: The 2022 report reviews without revealing any details about the taxonomy-aligned business activities of the KION Group in relation to the EU Taxonomy Regulation's first two environmental objectives.
factive_antonymity P: All fully consolidated subsidiaries of the KION Group are covered by the internal control system. H: Some fully consolidated subsidiaries of the KION Group are excluded from the internal control system.
Structure P: By contrast, the APAC region recorded solid growth, which was mainly driven by the expansion of new business in China. H: By contrast, the APAC region recorded a decline, which was mainly driven by the contraction of existing business in India.
Lexical P: The sources of liquidity are cash and cash equivalents, cash flow from operating activities, and amounts available under credit facilities. H: The drains on liquidity are cash and cash equivalents, cash flow from operating activities, and amounts available under credit facilities.
temporal P: The Company has taken measures to prevent it from incurring financial losses as a result of these risks.   H: The Company only started to implement measures to prevent financial losses after already experiencing significant losses due to these risks.
worldknowledge P: Certain industry, market and competitive position data contained in this Presentation, if any, come from official or third party sources. H: All industry, market, and competitive position data in the Presentation are based purely on speculative assumptions and personal opinions, without any reference to official or third-party sources.
antonymity P: The first university graduates successfully completed their management trainee program in 2021. H: The first university graduates failed their management trainee program in 2021.
negation P: Increases in procurement prices for commodities and intermediate products and translation effects caused by fluctuations in exchange rates can have a significant impact on the financial performance of individual market participants. H: Fluctuations in exchange rates and procurement prices for commodities and intermediate products do not affect the financial performance of individual market participants.
numeric P: To this end, the Supervisory Board has decided how the 5 relevant benchmarks are to be defined. H: To this end, the Supervisory Board has decided how the 3 relevant benchmarks are to be defined.
factive_embedding_verb P: This calls for shorter lead times, a more efficient flow of goods, a broader product range, and improved process reliability. H: This necessitates longer lead times, a less efficient flow of goods, a narrower product range, and reduced process reliability.
factive_antonymity P: Sections that only contain information on KION GROUP AG are indicated as such. H: No sections are marked to indicate they contain information on KION GROUP AG.
structure P: An AktG must not exceed 10 percent of the share capital at any time. H: An AktG must exceed 20 percent of the reserve funds at any time.
lexical P: For its accounting process, the KION Group has defined appropriate structures and processes as part of its internal control and risk management system that are required to be implemented throughout the Group.  H: For its accounting process, the KION Group has neglected to establish any structures or processes as part of its internal control and risk management system required for implementation across the Group.
Temporal P: Adjusted EBIT amounted to €536.0 million, which was within the target range of €525 million to €565 million. H: The target range for adjusted EBIT was set to €525 million to €565 million after the adjusted EBIT was reported at €536.0 million, suggesting a chronological inversion.
worldknowledge P: By contrast, the prior-year figure had been adversely affected, in particular, by the considerable growth of net working capital as a result of the extensive supply chain disruptions. H: The prior-year financial performance improved significantly due to the expansion of net working capital, benefiting from the efficient and uninterrupted supply chain operations.
antonymity P: As well as securing the existing 300 jobs at the site, we also hope to create new ones. H: The plan will eliminate the existing 300 jobs at the site, without plans to create new ones.
negation P: By contrast, the demand for Supply Chain Solutions should continue to rise. H: The demand for Supply Chain Solutions is expected to decline.
numeric P: In accordance with the German legal requirements, we have not audited the content of the consolidated corporate governance statement pursuant to Sections 289f, 315d German Commercial Code (HGB) included in the combined management report.  H: In accordance with the German legal requirements, we have not audited the content of the consolidated corporate governance statement pursuant to Sections 289f, 315b German Commercial Code (HGB) included in the combined management report.
factive_embedding_verb P: The total remuneration paid to former members of the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG and its legal predecessors amounted to €8.4 million (2022: €3.6 million). H: The total remuneration received by former members of the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG and its legal predecessors was reported at €8.4 million (2022: €3.6 million).
factive_antonymity P: References to values reported in the consolidated financial statements are not necessary for understanding. H: References to values reported in the consolidated financial statements are essential for understanding.
Structure P: In 2021, the non-recurring items had amounted to a total income of €37.8 million. H: In 2021, the recurring expenses had amounted to a total outcome of €37.8 million.
lexical P: For the 2022 and 2023 tranches, 20 percent of the performance share plan is linked to the achievement of ESG targets. H: For the 2022 and 2023 tranches, 20 percent of the performance share plan is detached from the accomplishment of ESG targets.
temporal P: Subsidiaries acquired in the course of the financial year are consolidated from the date on which control is obtained. H: Subsidiaries are consolidated into the financial statements before the date control is obtained.
worldknowledge P: As at 31 December 2019, there were no drawdowns from the revolving credit facility (2018: €101.8 million). H: The company extensively utilized the revolving credit facility throughout 2019, leading to significant drawdowns by the year's end.
antonymity P: Due to rounding effects, addition of the individual amounts shown may result in minor rounding differences to the totals. H: Due to rounding effects, subtraction of the individual amounts shown may result in minor rounding differences to the totals.
negation P: The Group also mitigates any losses from defaults by its receipt of the proceeds from the sale of repossessed trucks. H: The Group does not mitigate any losses from defaults through its receipt of the proceeds from the sale of repossessed trucks.
numeric P: Market planning takes into account predicted macroeconomic and industry-specific performance, which is described below. H: Market planning disregards predicted macroeconomic and industry-specific performance, which is described below.
factive_embedding_verb P: The elections may also come at the same time as key Executive Board members have to be re-appointed. H: The elections were scheduled successfully without coinciding with the re-appointment of key Executive Board members.
factive_antonymity P: Ltd. Belrose Australia APAC owns 100.00% of Dematic S.r.l. H: Ltd. Belrose Australia APAC does not own any portion of Dematic S.r.l.
Structure P: This increases the availability of goods, allows them to be delivered more quickly, and thus leads to greater customer satisfaction.   H: This reduces the availability of goods, hinders their quick delivery, and thus leads to decreased customer satisfaction.
Lexical P: In March 2020, a payment from the 2017 tranche was made on the basis of the achievement of the long-term targets that were defined in 2017 at the start of the performance period. H: In March 2020, a refund for the 2017 tranche was issued due to the failure to meet the long-term targets that were outlined in 2017 at the initiation of the performance period.
temporal P: We are pressing ahead with our growth strategy in China, one of the world’s most important and fast-growing markets for material handling, by strengthening our production site in Jinan, in Shandong province. H: We have decided to postpone our growth strategy in China, and the plans to expand our production site in Jinan, Shandong province have been put on hold indefinitely.
worldknowledge P: The free float accounted for 54.7 percent of the shares, while the remaining 0.1 percent were treasury shares. H: The free float and treasury shares together make up less than 55% of the total shares.
antonymity P: Order intake in the Supply Chain Solutions segment went up by 18.5 percent to €4,329.4 million in 2021 (2020: €3,654.5 million), driven by continued strong demand from customers for warehouse automation. H: Order intake in the Supply Chain Solutions segment went down by 18.5 percent to €2,979.6 million in 2021 (2020: €3,654.5 million), despite the weakening demand from customers for warehouse automation.
negation P: Revenue is the consideration that is expected to be received from the customer for the transfer of goods or services (transaction price). H: Revenue is not associated with the consideration expected to be received from the customer for the transfer of goods or services.
numeric P: This is supported by data from 2022 gathered by Interact Analysis.  H: This is supported by data from 2013 gathered by Interact Analysis.
factive_embedding_verb P: In the service business, the high number of industrial trucks in operation worldwide provides solid foundations for a small rise in revenue. H: The extensive operation of industrial trucks worldwide undermines the potential for an increase in revenue in the service business.
factive_antonymity P: The consolidated financial statements are prepared in euros, which is the Group’s presentation currency. H: The consolidated financial statements are prepared in dollars, not euros, contradicting the Group’s stated presentation currency.
Structure P: It is also possible that a partner will collaborate with competitors if exclusivity agreements are not in place. H: A partner will not collaborate with allies even if exclusivity agreements are lacking.
lexical P: The characteristics of the corruption perception index for the respective country, the size and structure of the local purchasing or sales organisation, and contacts with public officials play an important role in risk assessment. H: The reliability of the corruption perception index, alongside the inefficiency and disorganization of the local purchasing or sales organization, coupled with the absence of contact with public officials, are insignificant in risk assessment.
Temporal P: In addition to the decrease in operating profit, effects relating to the ITS and SCS segments’ business in Russia reduced net income by €36.8 million in total. H: The business in Russia had already negatively impacted net income by €36.8 million before the decrease in operating profit was observed.
worldknowledge P: In the indirect lease business, industrial trucks are sold to leasing companies (vendor partners) that enter into long-term leases with end customers. H: In the indirect lease business, industrial trucks are leased to end customers directly by manufacturers, bypassing leasing companies.
antonymity P: The compliance training courses are offered in many different languages to ensure that participants understand them properly. H: The compliance training courses are offered only in one language, preventing many participants from understanding them properly.
negation P: Leased assets for direct and indirect leases with end customers that are classified as operating leases decreased only slightly to €1,333.3 million (December 31, 2019: €1,361.2 million). H: Leased assets for direct and indirect leases with end customers that are classified as operating leases did not decrease but increased significantly from €1,361.2 million to €1,333.3 million.
numeric P: The Group creates working environments that are suitable for people with disabilities, supports reintegration into work processes and enables 100 people with physical disabilities to remain in employment.   H: The Group creates working environments that are suitable for people with disabilities, supports reintegration into work processes and enables 0 people with physical disabilities to remain in employment.
factive_embedding_verb P: Each purchasing department is responsible for monitoring compliance with guidelines in its area. H: Every purchasing department ignores the guidelines it is supposed to monitor.
factive_antonymity P: It uses five core key performance indicators (KPIs), which remained unchanged in the reporting year, to continuously monitor market success, profitability, financial strength, and liquidity. H: It altered five core key performance indicators (KPIs) in the reporting year, impacting its ability to accurately measure market success, profitability, financial strength, and liquidity.
Structure P: Order intake at €3.8 billion and order backlog now almost at €8 billion benefited from high demand as well as price increases and positive FX effects. H: Order intake and order backlog decreased due to low demand, price drops, and negative FX effects.
lexical P: Interdisciplinary teams work on the avoidance of risks arising from inadequate contractual arrangements. H: Interdisciplinary teams focus on embracing risks linked to inadequate contractual arrangements.
Temporal P: Dematic Holdings Pty., based in Luxembourg, established its 100.00% ownership in Dematic Holdings GmbH located in Frankfurt am Main, Germany, prior to expanding its operations across the EMEA region.   H: Dematic Holdings Pty. expanded its operations across the EMEA region before establishing its 100.00% ownership in Dematic Holdings GmbH located in Frankfurt am Main, Germany.
worldknowledge P: What I’d mention to you is about maximum 15% or so. H: The percentage I'm discussing could easily exceed 50%.
antonymity P: The discount rate is a before-tax interest rate that reflects current market expectations for the time value of money and the specific risks inherent in the liability. H: The discount rate is an after-tax interest rate that ignores current market expectations for the time value of money and the specific risks inherent in the liability.
negation P: The project involved taking data from the sensors of industrial trucks in order to create a digital twin of a real-world warehouse. H: The project did not use data from the sensors of industrial trucks for creating a digital twin of a real-world warehouse.
numeric P: The amount recognized is an average value or a value determined in accordance with the FIFO method. H: The amount recognized is an average value or a value determined in accordance with the LIFO method (LIFO = last in first out).
factive_embedding_verb P: And given 2 very strong years of double-digit Page 25 KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call Transcription organic order growth, you are still targeting a very healthy level of growth in 2020. H: The KION GROUP AG has planned to reduce their operational scale in 2020 despite the double-digit growth in the past two years.
factive_antonymity P: You mentioned earlier in the call that no impact from a pandemic could be included, which is obviously very understandable. H: You previously acknowledged in the discussion that the pandemic had significant impacts that should be considered.
Structure P: This was because the two operating segments saw disproportionately strong growth in their lower-margin businesses – new trucks and business solutions – compared with the growth of the service business.  H: This was because the two operating segments saw disproportionately strong growth in their higher-margin businesses – the service business – compared with the growth of the new trucks and business solutions.
lexical P: As part of its regular audits and ad-hoc audits, the Group audit department checks compliance at KION GROUP AG and its consolidated subsidiaries against the compliance requirements. H: The Group audit department overlooks rather than examines compliance at KION GROUP AG and its consolidated subsidiaries during its regular and ad-hoc audits.
Temporal P: In the Supply Chain Solutions segment, the value of order intake went up by 14.3 per cent, primarily driven by a robust performance in the second half of the year. H: The substantial increase in the value of order intake in the Supply Chain Solutions segment was chiefly due to performance improvements in the first quarter, before any notable achievements in the latter part of the year.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group sees the heterogeneity of its employees as a competitive advantage. H: The KION Group believes that uniformity among its employees is essential for their success.
antonymity P: Upon measurement of trade receivables, lease receivables, and contract assets subsequent to initial recognition, the KION Group applies the simplified impairment approach of IFRS 9. H: Upon measurement of trade receivables, lease receivables, and contract assets subsequent to initial recognition, the KION Group applies the complex impairment approach of IFRS 9.
negation   P: The brand company had supplied a perfectly coordinated solution comprising three automated standard industrial trucks and installed all the system components for a customer’s production warehouse.   H: The brand company did not supply any automated industrial trucks nor did it install any system components for the customer’s production warehouse.
numeric P: Within this total, the rise in net working capital of €201.9 million (2020: €150.3 million) reduced the level of cash flow from operating activities. H: Within this total, the rise in net working capital of €150.3 million (2020: €201.9 million) reduced the level of cash flow from operating activities.
factive_embedding_verb P: And looking at the full year 2022, the unit decline was 10% compared to the record level of last year. H: The company announced an increase in unit sales for the full year 2022, reaching a new record.
factive_antonymity P: And how much of that is of the order book currently? H: None of that is excluded from the order book at the moment.
Structure  P: For employees taking part for the first time, the KION Group offers a special incentive in the form of starter packages. H: The KION Group offers seasoned employees, not first-time participants, special incentives in the form of starter packages.
lexical P: Such risks form part of the KION Group’s aggregate risk profile and are classified as operational risk. H: These opportunities enhance the KION Group's aggregate risk profile and are acknowledged as strategic advantages.
temporal P: Further information on sensitivity analysis in relation to the impact of the discount rate and details of measurement can be found in the information on the retirement benefit obligation and similar obligations in note [29].  H: The retirement benefit obligation and similar obligations are discussed prior to the explanation of sensitivity analysis and the impact of the discount rate in note [29].
worldknowledge P: Probably one question which just popped up is on the supply chain just because we heard from some machinery companies, not direct competitors but others, saying that the supply situation is getting tighter again. H: The supply situation for machinery companies is actually becoming more relaxed and abundant, indicating an oversupply in the market.
antonymity P: All other leases and short-term rentals are classified as operating leases, again in accordance with IFRS 16. H: All other leases and short-term rentals are classified as financial leases, not in accordance with IFRS 16.
negation P: We do not express a separate audit opinion on the prospective information and on the assumptions used as a basis. H: We express a separate audit opinion on the prospective information and on the assumptions used as a basis.
numeric P: With the consent of the Supervisory Board, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG decided on 22 May 2017 to utilise some of the authorised capital created by the 2017 Annual General Meeting.  H: With the consent of the Supervisory Board, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG decided on 22 May 2018 to utilise some of the authorised capital created by the 2017 Annual General Meeting.
factive_embedding_verb P: If estimates change, or if there are differences between planned and actual costs, this is directly reflected in the profit or loss from project business contracts. H: Changes in estimates and differences between planned and actual costs have no impact on the reflection in the profit or loss from project business contracts.
factive_antonymity P: With regard to the further course of the coronavirus pandemic and the measures taken in response, this outlook is based on the market assumptions of the International Monetary Fund (IMF). H: With regard to the further course of the coronavirus pandemic and the measures taken in response, this outlook disregards the market assumptions of the International Monetary Fund (IMF).
P: We want to get it down to plus or minus 6 months or so on the ITS side. H: We aim to avoid adjusting it by any time frame on the ITS side.
lexical P: The KION Group Code of Compliance sets out specific requirements on conduct to prevent corruption. H: The KION Group Code of Compliance lacks specific guidelines on behavior, thus permitting corruption.
temporal P: A specialist career path was introduced Group-wide in 2020 for areas of particular future importance. H: The specialist career path for areas of particular future importance will be introduced Group-wide starting in 2023.
worldknowledge P: In addition, the executive directors are responsible for such internal control as they have determined necessary to enable the preparation of consolidated financial statements that are free from material misstatement, whether due to fraud or error. H: The executive directors play no role in determining the internal controls necessary for the preparation of error-free consolidated financial statements.
antonymity P: The annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG are prepared in accordance with the provisions in the German Commercial Code (HGB) and the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG). H: The annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG are prepared in violation of the provisions in the German Commercial Code (HGB) and the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG).
negation P: Because control over the promised assets gradually passes to the customer over the course of the project, revenue is recognized over a period of time. H: Revenue is recognized all at once, not gradually, because control over the promised assets does not pass to the customer over the course of the project.
numeric P: Then it will gradually work towards establishing comprehensive circularity. H: Then it will gradually work towards establishing zero circularity.
factive_embedding_verb P: The first one is really on the pricing dynamics. H: The first analysis completely overlooked the pricing dynamics.
factive_antonymity P: The two segments complement each other in terms of their respective market position and regional presence. H: The two segments detract from each other in terms of their respective market position and regional presence.
structure P: The specification of this type of target is required by Germany’s ‘Act for the equal participation of women and men in managerial positions in the private and public sectors’. H: The Act for the equal participation of women and men in managerial positions in the private and public sectors requires the abolishment of target specifications.
lexical P: It will be presented in the remuneration report for 2021. H: It is excluded from the remuneration report for 2021.
temporal P: A contract liability is a company’s obligation to transfer goods or services to a customer for which the company has received consideration. H: The company has an obligation to transfer goods or services to a customer, which will only be considered after the transfer has been completed.
worldknowledge P: All sales regions registered a year-on-year rise in order intake. H: The company did not receive any new orders this year.
antonymity P: When the health risks of coronavirus and the resulting challenges to our business became apparent, the Supervisory Board began receiving weekly updates from the Executive Board and offered its advice and support. H: When the health risks of coronavirus and the resulting challenges to our business became apparent, the Supervisory Board ceased receiving any updates from the Executive Board and withheld its advice and support.
negation P: The fallout from the bottle-necks at suppliers that had continued to have an effect in 2018 no longer had any significant impact on segment earnings. H: The fallout from the bottle-necks at suppliers still significantly impacted segment earnings after 2018.
numeric P: The Supply Chain Solutions segment’s revenue of €3.0 billion matched the projected minimum figure. H: The Supply Chain Solutions segment’s revenue of €2.5 billion matched the projected minimum figure.
factive_embedding_verb P: And never forget, -- that’s the constant reminder throughout the year -- we are providing a minimum guidance, right? H: They always acknowledged having received comprehensive guidance from us throughout the year.
factive_antonymity P: And from a Page 23 KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst Q3 2023 Update Call Transcription perspective of going into next year, that’s helpful. H: And from a Page 23 KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst Q3 2023 Update Call Transcription perspective of going into next year, that’s irrelevant.
structure P: Katie, Will, ladies and gentlemen, that’s a guidance question. H: That's a guidance question for Paul, Jane, and the audience.
Lexical P: Throughout the accounting process, the local companies are supported by central points of contact. H: Throughout the accounting process, the local companies are hindered by central points of contact.
Temporal P: The effects from purchase price allocations comprised net write-downs and other expenses in relation to the step-ups and charges identified as part of the acquisition processes. H: The expenses and net write-downs identified as part of the acquisition processes were accounted for before the purchase price allocations were considered.
worldknowledge P: Details of § 2 of the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG) regarding equity are provided in note [27], 'Equity', in the notes to the consolidated financial statements. H: The German Stock Corporation Act (AktG) does not regulate equity, and there is no mention of it in the financial statements.
antonymity P: The segment’s gross margin was higher than in the previous year, partly due to the smaller increase in fixed costs. H: The segment’s gross margin was lower than in the previous year, largely because of the greater increase in fixed costs.
negation P: These statements only take into account information that was available up to and including the date that this annual report was prepared. H: These statements include information that was obtained after the date this annual report was prepared.
numeric P: Once we have better visibility, we intend to update the markets with a new outlook for the year. H: Once we have better visibility, we intend to update the markets with the same outlook for the year.
factive_embedding_verb P: Indeed, we hit our targets for all of our corporate key performance indicators. H: Unfortunately, we failed to achieve our objectives for any of our corporate key performance indicators.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group relies on having highly qualified managers and experts in key roles. H: The KION Group disregards the importance of having highly qualified managers and experts in key roles.
structure P: Warranty provisions are recognized on the basis of past or estimated future claim statistics. H: Warranty provisions are disregarded regardless of past or estimated future claim statistics.
lexical P: In the indirect leasing business, industrial trucks are sold to vendor partners that enter into long-term leases with end customers. H: In the indirect leasing business, industrial trucks are bought back from vendor partners that cancel long-term leases with end customers.
temporal P: These included adding updated price adjustment clauses to new contracts, expanding the supplier base, and initiating major improvements in project execution and project management. H: The initiatives for major improvements in project execution and project management were completed before the expansion of the supplier base and the addition of updated price adjustment clauses to new contracts.
worldknowledge P: The combined management report contains cross-references that are not provided for by law and which are marked as unaudited. H: Every cross-reference within the combined management report is legally mandated and subjected to an official audit.
antonymity P: In Western Europe, we saw a decline of minus 4.1% in the fourth quarter, mainly driven by Germany, and ended up with an overall decline for the full year 2019 of minus 6.7%. H: In Western Europe, we saw a growth of plus 4.1% in the fourth quarter, mainly driven by Germany, and ended up with an overall increase for the full year 2019 of plus 6.7%.
negation P: KION GROUP AG has an internal control system designed to meet the specific needs of the Company. H: KION GROUP AG does not have an internal control system designed to meet the specific needs of the Company.
numeric P: Despite a market slowdown throughout the year, our IT&S segment showed a strong top line. H: Despite a market slowdown throughout the year, our IT&S segment showed a weak top line.
factive_embedding_verb P: Between 30% and 40% is our own. H: Exactly 50% is entirely ours.
factive_antonymity P: JULI Motorenwerk s.r.o. is based in the Czech Republic. H: JULI Motorenwerk s.r.o. is not based in the Czech Republic.
Structure P: Development costs rose to €155.3 million (2018: €137.7 million), reflecting the firm focus on implementing the innovation strategy under KION 2027.   H: Development costs maintained stability at €155.3 million, contradicting the firm's reported change under KION 2027.
Lexical P: The significant weighted-average assumptions shown in TABLE 078 were applied to the calculation of the net interest cost and the cost of benefits earned in the current year (current service cost). H: The negligible weighted-average assumptions depicted in TABLE 078 were utilized for estimating the net interest gain and the cost of benefits forfeited in the previous year (previous service cost).
Temporal P: Similarly, long-term lease receivables arising from leases with end customers that are classified as finance leases rose to €1,318.9 million (December 31, 2020: €1,199.1 million) due to higher unit sales of industrial trucks.   H: The decrease in long-term lease receivables to €1,199.1 million was observed after December 31, 2020, contradicting the expected increase from higher unit sales of industrial trucks.
worldknowledge P: Could that be something you will have to do in the future? H: It's already been completed in the past.
antonymity P: KION GROUP AG controls a subsidiary if it has decision-making authority over the main activities of the entity and can use this authority to affect the amount of the variable returns to which it is exposed as a result of the equity investment. H: KION GROUP AG cannot control a subsidiary despite having decision-making authority over the main activities of the entity, as this authority has no effect on the amount of the variable returns to which it is exposed as a result of the equity investment.
negation P: Based on the manager survey conducted in 2015 and the action plan derived from it, a package of measures was defined and implemented in 2016 as part of the ‘Lift up’ transformation initiative. H: No package of measures was developed or implemented as a result of the 2015 manager survey for the ‘Lift up’ transformation initiative.
numeric P: The drawdowns under the revolving credit facility are generally classified as short term. H: The drawdowns under the revolving credit facility are generally classified as long term.
factive_embedding_verb P: All percentage changes and ratios were calculated using the underlying data. H: The analysis of all percentage changes and ratios ignored the underlying data.
factive_antonymity P: Automated storage and retrieval systems (ASRSs), robotic picking systems, and compact, powerful split-case and pallet picking stations can be used to achieve very fast throughput times and picking rates. H: Automated storage and retrieval systems (ASRSs), robotic picking systems, and compact, powerful split-case and pallet picking stations lead to significantly slow throughput times and reduce picking rates.
Structure P: Meanwhile, demand for credit in the corporate sector stagnated (Bundesbank, November 2023). H: Meanwhile, demand for credit in the consumer sector surged (Bundesbank, November 2023).
Lexical P: And based on the very good performance of our ITS segment during the first 9 months of 2023, we raised our full-year outlook for ITS again. H: Owing to the disappointing performance of our ITS segment in the first 9 months of 2023, we lowered our full-year outlook for ITS once more.
temporal P: However, the continuation of this global economic upturn was subject to a resurgence of risk at the end of the year. H: The resurgence of risk occurred at the beginning of the year, prior to any signs of a global economic upturn.
worldknowledge P: The KION GROUP AG Annual Report 2022 includes sections such as Corporate governance statement, Combined management report, Consolidated financial statements, and Notes to the consolidated financial statements. H: The KION GROUP AG Annual Report 2022 consists solely of product advertisements and marketing brochures with no financial or governance information.
antonymity P: This risk is defined as the risk that a counterparty will default, and hence is limited to a maximum of the carrying amount. H: This risk ensures that a counterparty will fulfill all obligations, and hence is not constrained by the carrying amount.
negation P: Page 13 shows the reconciliation from adjusted EBITDA to the net income for the group. H: Page 13 does not include the reconciliation from adjusted EBITDA to the net income for the group.
numeric P: Recruitment is a challenge, especially given the high growth rates in the Supply Chain Solutions segment.  numeric H: Recruitment is a challenge, especially given the low growth rates in the Supply Chain Solutions segment.
factive_embedding_verb P: This facilitated the identification of relevant aspects across the Group and regions, which also shaped the revision of the sustainability strategy. H: The identification of relevant aspects hindered the ability to revise the sustainability strategy across the Group and regions.
factive_antonymity P: The Company’s assumptions and data underlying the valuation are overall appropriate. H: The Company’s assumptions and data underlying the valuation are overall flawed.
Structure P: Besides that, STILL set new standards with the launch of the new RX60 electric forklift truck. H: Instead, STILL failed to meet existing standards with the launch of the new RX60 electric forklift truck.
lexical P: The ‘Energy Quick Check’ web-based analysis app makes it possible to identify the best technology for the customer in just a few questions. H: The ‘Energy Quick Check’ web-based analysis app fails to determine the optimal technology for the customer, regardless of the number of questions answered.
Temporal P: If the carrying amount is greater than the recoverable amount, an impairment loss is recognized for the equity investment. H: An impairment loss for the equity investment is recognized before comparing the carrying amount and recoverable amount.
worldknowledge P: The facility has a variable interest rate; the contractually agreed interest terms are linked to KION GROUP AG’s credit rating and to compliance with sustainability KPIs. H: The interest terms of the facility are solely fixed and unrelated to any external factors such as company credit ratings or sustainability KPIs.
antonymity P: Net income declined to €210.9 million (2019: €444.8 million). H: Net income increased to €210.9 million (2019: €444.8 million).
negation P: The basis for decision-making includes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk exposures in key currencies. H: The basis for decision-making does not include sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk exposures in key currencies.
numeric P: KION GROUP AG will propose a dividend of €0.70 per share to the 2024 Annual General Meeting (2023: €0.19). H: KION GROUP AG will propose a dividend of €0.70 per share to the 2024 Annual General Meeting (2023: €0.30).
factive_embedding_verb P: You can imagine we’re working hard to do our very best. H: They have doubted we've made any effort to excel.
factive_antonymity P: The expected improvement compared to the third quarter relates to improved earnings and an initial unwinding of net working capital, such as the reduction of semifinished trucks and the completion of project milestones in SCS, leading to the agreed milestone payments. H: The deterioration seen in comparison to the third quarter is due to decreased earnings and a buildup of net working capital, including an increase in semifinished trucks and delays in completing project milestones in SCS, resulting in missed milestone payments.
Structure P: First, we gained an understanding of the process used to record and recognise contracts in the sales lease business. H: First, we disregarded the process used to ignore and overlook contracts in the alternative investment strategies.
lexical P: The markets in which the KION Group operates are characterized by strong competition, often price-driven. H: The markets in which the KION Group operates are distinguished by minimal competition, primarily quality-driven.
Temporal P: Cash and cash equivalents increased by €35.9 million during the reporting year to reach €211.2 million (2018: €175.3 million). H: Cash and cash equivalents reached €211.2 million before the reporting year when it was reported to be €175.3 million.
worldknowledge P: But we will also see a positive impact on the cash assets and liabilities, which is driving SCS because we will get into more milestone billing. H: Engaging in more milestone billing actually deteriorates cash assets and increases liabilities, negatively impacting SCS.
antonymity P: The growing shortage of skilled workers is also having a positive impact on demand for automated intralogistics solutions. H: The growing surplus of skilled workers is reducing the demand for automated intralogistics solutions.
negation P: Actual or suspected incidents of non­compliance can be reported anonymously or otherwise by contacting an external 24­-hour compliance hotline, by sending an email or letter, by calling an internal KION Group hotline or by contacting a compliance officer directly. H: It is impossible to report incidents of non-compliance to the KION Group anonymously or through any direct means of communication.
numeric P: Revenue and adjusted EBIT also benefited from the successful order backlog repricing exercise, as Rob explained earlier.  H: Revenue and adjusted EBIT did not benefit from the successful order backlog repricing exercise, as Rob explained earlier.
factive_embedding_verb P: The programme systematically documents HSE measures and processes and provides specific ideas for how they can be developed further. H: The programme overlooks the documentation of HSE measures and processes and lacks suggestions for their development.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group wants to retain its position as one of the most profitable suppliers in the industry and improve its adjusted EBIT margin to between 10 percent and 12 percent in 2023. H: The KION Group plans to relinquish its position as one of the most profitable suppliers in the industry and reduce its adjusted EBIT margin in 2023.
Structure P: Building on the very solid results for the financial years spanned by the first phase of the strategy, the Company now plans to invest at locations where products and services will bring lasting added value for its customers in future. H: Ignoring the very solid results for the financial years spanned by the first phase of the strategy, the Company now plans to divest from locations where products and services have brought lasting added value for its customers.
lexical P: The segment continues to see strong growth rates in line with market trends. H: The segment is experiencing notable decline rates contrary to market trends.
temporal P: Adjusted EBIT amounted to €546.9 million, which was slightly higher than the target range of €465 million to €545 million.   H: The target range of €465 million to €545 million was set after the adjusted EBIT reached €546.9 million.
worldknowledge P: A reconciliation of EBITDA to adjusted EBITDA is presented in TABLE 012. H: EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA are entirely unrelated financial metrics, and it is impossible to reconcile one to the other.
antonymity P: The overarching aim is for the separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, and combined management report to be fully compliant with the relevant statutory and regulatory requirements and, in particular, the applicable financial reporting standards. H: The primary goal is for the separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, and combined management report to be completely noncompliant with the relevant statutory and regulatory requirements and, specifically, the applicable financial reporting standards.
negation P: The Supervisory Board believes that, in its current composition, the Executive Board is now very well positioned for the profitable growth targeted by the Company and for the technological and geopolitical challenges that lie ahead. H: The Supervisory Board believes that, in its current composition, the Executive Board is not adequately prepared for the profitable growth targeted by the Company nor for the technological and geopolitical challenges that lie ahead.
numeric P: In addition to the contractually agreed consideration, the transaction price may also include variable elements such as rebates, volume discounts, trade discounts, bonuses, and penalties.   H: In addition to the contractually agreed consideration, the transaction price does not include variable elements such as rebates, volume discounts, trade discounts, bonuses, and penalties.
factive_embedding_verb P: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) was €25.39. H: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) reached a peak at €94.32.
factive_antonymity P: The system covers all aspects of occupational health, safety and environmental protection and applies to all KION Group employees. H: The system neglects several aspects of occupational health, safety and environmental protection for KION Group employees.
Structure P: The liabilities to banks and the promissory notes are not collateralized.  H: The liabilities to banks and the promissory notes are secured with company assets.
Lexical P: The Internal Audit department evaluates governance, risk management, and the control processes by following a systematic and structured process, thus helping to bring about improvements. H: The Internal Audit department ignores governance, risk management, and the control processes, avoiding any systematic or structured process and thus hinders any improvements.
Temporal P: In such relationships, the KION Group enters into leases with end customers that are based on fixed interest rates. H: In these partnerships, the KION Group initiates leases with end customers based on interest rates that are adjusted periodically.
worldknowledge P: KION Group's solutions allow customers to benefit from automation effectively, supporting them on their journey to “lights-out” warehouses. H: KION Group's solutions hinder customers' progress towards automation, promoting manual processes over “lights-out” warehouses.
antonymity P: KION North America is investing in production and assembly lines in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment with an expanded plant in Summerville, South Carolina, that will create around 450 new jobs when it opens in spring 2024. H: KION North America is divesting from production and assembly lines in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment with a reduced plant in Summerville, South Carolina, that will eliminate around 450 jobs when it closes in spring 2024.
negation   P: Taking into account the average trade tax rate of 14.9 percent, the combined nominal tax rate for entities in Germany was 30.7 percent (2021: 30.7 percent).   H: The combined nominal tax rate for entities in Germany was not 30.7 percent, considering the average trade tax rate was 14.9 percent.
numeric P: Now you have a pure play listed peer with AutoStore. H: Now you have zero pure play listed peers with AutoStore.
factive_embedding_verb P: He has no business or financial ties to the Company or Executive Board. H: He admitted having significant financial investments in the Company.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group works on shaping all important processes, from the purchase of material requirements through the finishing stages to the customer, are humane and environmentally friendly. H: The KION Group neglects all important processes, from the purchase of material requirements through the finishing stages to the customer, making them inhumane and environmentally damaging.
Structure P: The latter include the coronavirus pandemic being brought under control soon thanks to the rapid availability and successful rollout of vaccines across the population. H: The latter include the coronavirus pandemic not being brought under control soon despite the rapid availability and successful rollout of vaccines across a different population.
lexical P: The comparative figures for the prior year were determined on the same basis. H: The comparative figures for the prior year were calculated using a different methodology.
Temporal P: Revenue is the consideration that is expected to be received from the customer for the transfer of goods or services (transaction price).   H: Revenue is recognized and recorded in the financial statements after the customer receives the goods or services.
worldknowledge P: The Executive Committee consists of four shareholder representatives and four employee representatives. H: The Executive Committee is solely composed of external consultants with no representatives from shareholders or employees.
antonymity P: The gains and losses on the remeasurement of plan assets were attributable entirely to experience adjustments. H: The gains and losses on the remeasurement of plan assets were in no part due to experience adjustments.
negation P: Rob Smith says, "Yes, that’s the shift I’m talking about is within the warehouse segment, right?"   H: Rob Smith denies that the shift he's discussing pertains to the warehouse segment.
numeric P: The KION Group is a publicly listed corporate group and therefore ensures that its financial management takes into account the interests of 3 key groups: shareholders, the banks providing its funding, and other lenders.   H: The KION Group is a publicly listed corporate group and therefore ensures that its financial management takes into account the interests of 2 key groups: shareholders, the banks providing its funding, and other lenders.
factive_embedding_verb P: Acting sustainably and responsibly is one of the key principles by which the KION Group operates. H: The KION Group ignores sustainable and responsible actions as key principles in its operations.
factive_antonymity P: The overarching aim is for the separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, and combined management report to be fully compliant with the relevant statutory and regulatory requirements and, in particular, the applicable financial reporting standards. H: The primary goal is to ensure the separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, and combined management report deliberately violate the relevant statutory and regulatory requirements, especially the applicable financial reporting standards.
Structure P: It is also conceivable that competitors will join forces and their resulting stronger position will be detrimental to the KION Group’s sales opportunities. H: It is conceivable that competitors will join forces and their resulting stronger position will enhance the KION Group’s sales opportunities.
Lexical P: We’re not only qualifying additional suppliers, but we’ve also done redesigning of our electronic components to switch to different chip technologies, which are better available in the market. H: We are solely relying on our current suppliers and have postponed any redesigning of our electronic components, continuing to use the existing chip technologies despite their limited availability in the market.
temporal P: The Company, therefore, also assumes no responsibility whatsoever in respect of the accuracy and completeness of any such research and estimates. H: The Company has recently announced its responsibility to ensure the completeness and accuracy of all its research and estimates effective immediately.
worldknowledge P: That leaves the total number of semifinished trucks in inventory stable at about 12,000 units. H: The total inventory now exceeds 20,000 semifinished trucks, indicating a significant increase.
antonymity P: The value of order intake rose by 1.9 per cent to €6,330.5 million (2018: €6,210.6 million). H: The value of order intake fell by 1.9 per cent to €6,090.7 million (2018: €6,210.6 million).
negation P: Marcus A. Wassenberg took over as Chief Financial Officer on January 1, 2023. H: Marcus A. Wassenberg did not become Chief Financial Officer on January 1, 2023.
numeric P: If they are financed using variable-rate instruments, interest-rate derivatives are entered into in order to hedge the interest-rate risk, where it makes commercial sense to do so. H: If they are financed using variable-rate instruments, interest-rate derivatives are **not** entered into in order to hedge the interest-rate risk, where it makes commercial sense to do so.
factive_embedding_verb  P: Dematic also expanded its portfolio through a partnership with Google Cloud aimed at accelerating cloud innovations and using these to develop the next generation of warehouse management solutions. H: Dematic, having no recent collaborations, failed to tap into cloud innovations for enhancing their warehouse management systems.
factive_antonymity P: Of this figure, €470.7 million was attributable to land and buildings (December 31, 2022: €445.7 million) and €118.5 million to plant & machinery and office furniture & equipment (December 31, 2022: €97.9 million). H: None of the figure was attributable to land and buildings or to plant & machinery and office furniture & equipment.
structure P: Leases are generally linked to a service contract covering the term of the finance agreement. H: Leases are generally linked to a termination fee exclusive of the finance agreement term.
lexical P: The projected KPIs reflect the Company’s expectations regarding future developments and are therefore forward-looking. H: The projected KPIs mirror the Company's retrospective analysis, focusing on past performances rather than future prospects.
Temporal P: This consists only of revenue from contracts with customers as defined by IFRS 15.  Temporal H: The company recorded revenue from contracts with customers before the IFRS 15 was defined and implemented.
worldknowledge P: A default is defined as the occurrence of a loss event, such as a borrower being in considerable financial difficulties or a contract being breached. H: A default is characterized by the borrower repaying their loan early and in full, without any financial challenges.
antonymity P: The majority of the cash and cash equivalents, financial receivables, trade receivables and trade payables recognized at amortized cost, sundry financial assets and liabilities, and liabilities from accrued interest have short remaining terms to maturity. H: The majority of the cash and cash equivalents, financial receivables, trade receivables and trade payables recognized at amortized cost, sundry financial assets and liabilities, and liabilities from accrued interest have long remaining terms to maturity.
negation P: This profile is regularly reviewed as part of the Supervisory Board's self-assessment or as necessary. H: This profile is never reviewed by the Supervisory Board.
numeric P: Let's start with your last one, Jorge, you have 5 questions left.   H: Let's start with your last one, Jorge, you have 3 questions left.
factive_embedding_verb P: The participation of a further group that was due to start the training in 2020 had to be postponed to 2021 due to the coronavirus pandemic. H: The coronavirus pandemic led to the immediate commencement of training for a further group in 2020.
factive_antonymity P: The intention is to gather ideas, suggestions, and proposals from all employees in order to further develop corporate culture throughout the Group, to initiate changes and to generate sustainable growth for the KION Group. H: The objective is to ignore all ideas, suggestions, and proposals from employees, maintaining the status quo within the corporate culture and preventing any changes or growth for the KION Group.
P: It is expected that the bulk of the cash payments will be incurred within the next two years after the reporting date.   H: It is anticipated that the majority of investments will be liquidated before the end of the current fiscal year.
lexical P: Dematic Trading de Mexico S. de R.L. de C.V. in Monterrey, Mexico, holds 100% ownership in both 51 & 110 company divisions. H: Dematic Trading de Mexico S. de R.L. de C.V. in Monterrey, Mexico, does not have any stake in the 51 & 110 company divisions.
temporal P: In this field, the KION Group operates more than 20 production facilities for industrial trucks and components in nine countries around the world. H: The KION Group has not yet opened any production facilities for industrial trucks and components in any country as of last year.
worldknowledge P: We declare that the audit opinions expressed in this auditor’s report are consistent with the additional report to the audit committee pursuant to Article 11 of the EU Audit Regulation (long-form audit report). H: The audit opinions in this report cannot be consistent with the additional report to the audit committee because the EU Audit Regulation does not require or acknowledge any form of long-form audit report.
antonymity P: The trustees are required to follow a defined investment strategy and investment guidelines. H: The trustees are permitted to ignore any defined investment strategy and investment guidelines.
negation P: Workshops, warehouses, and supply facilities are being converted for this purpose. H: No workshops, warehouses, or supply facilities are being converted for this purpose.
numeric P: These reports are documented in a traceable manner and their outcome is monitored. H: These reports are documented in a 3 traceable manner and their outcome is monitored.
factive_embedding_verb P: STILL's trucks and services include counterbalance trucks. H: Customers regretted that STILL's trucks and services do not include counterbalance trucks.
factive_antonymity P: The KPIs used to manage the segments are order intake, revenue, and adjusted EBIT. H: The KPIs disregarded for managing the segments include order intake, revenue, and adjusted EBIT.
structure P: Capital expenditure on this project amounted to around €100 million in total. H: Capital expenditure on this project amounted to personnel expenses entirely.
lexical P: Further measures during the reporting year focused the system to manage climate performance. H: No actions were taken during the reporting year to address the system's climate management.
temporal P: Because if we look at the implications for Q4, let’s say, at the midpoint of the guidance, that would be quite a drastic sequential decline on the EBIT side.  H: The midpoint of the guidance for Q4 actually forecasts an increase in the EBIT, indicating improvement rather than decline.
worldknowledge P: Sundry intangible assets relate in particular to customer relationships amounting to €476.9 million (December 31, 2019: €541.3 million). H: Sundry intangible assets are exclusively composed of physical goods like machinery and vehicles, not including customer relationships.
antonymity P: The consolidated accounts are drawn up centrally using data from the consolidated subsidiaries. H: The consolidated accounts are drawn up individually without using data from the consolidated subsidiaries.
negation   P: We’re also having those kinds of discussions with our SCS customers and working to reprice on material things that were just out of -- people did not have those expectations.   H: We are not engaging in any discussions with our SCS customers regarding repricing on material things, as all expectations were clearly set beforehand.
numeric P: After this report of the Supervisory Board has been submitted, five key issues will be addressed.  H: After this report of the Supervisory Board has been submitted, six key issues will be addressed.
factive_embedding_verb P: At sites where codetermination arrangements provide for the workforce to be involved in decision-making, the KION Group engages in constructive talks on these matters with the employee representatives. H: The KION Group refuses to acknowledge the presence of codetermination arrangements at their sites, ignoring the workforce's role in decision-making.
factive_antonymity P: Instead, it is tested for impairment in accordance with IAS 36 at least once a year, and more frequently if there are indications that the asset might be impaired. H: Instead, it is never tested for impairment as per IAS 36 guidelines, even if there are signs that the asset might be impaired.
Structure P: Further information can be found in the section ‘Non-financial performance indicators – Sustainability’ and, in particular, in the Group’s 2022 sustainability report, which will be published in April 2023.   H: The Group’s 2022 sustainability report, which lacks any details on ‘Non-financial performance indicators – Sustainability’, cannot be located in any publication as of April 2023.
Lexical P: The significantly lower level of net cash used in 2020 had mainly been attributable to the capital increase of €813.3 million carried out in early December 2020, which was used to repay financial debt. H: The considerable hike in net cash used in 2020 was primarily due to the capital decrease of €813.3 million implemented in early December 2020, intended for accruing financial debt.
Temporal P: The latter was primarily due to the much lower level of trade payables at the end of the year and the volume-related growth of receivables from customers. H: The lower trade payables at the end of the year were a result of the sudden decrease in volume-related growth of receivables from customers earlier in the same period.
worldknowledge P: And then secondly, Gordon, probably just a bigger picture one for you, we’re hearing a lot of mixed messages around the issues in the supply chains, not just for the industrial trucks manufacturers, but for broader industrials. H: Issues in the supply chains are currently benefiting and streamlining operations for all industrial sectors, including industrial truck manufacturers, with no reported disruptions.
antonymity P: The fair value of the bonus shares to be granted is recognized as an expense and paid into capital reserves over the three-year holding period. H: The fair value of the bonus shares to be granted is recognized as income and withdrawn from capital reserves over the three-year holding period.
negation P: The tagging of the consolidated financial statements according to Section 328 (1) sentence 4 no. 1 HGB is mandatory.  H: The tagging of the consolidated financial statements according to Section 328 (1) sentence 4 no. 1 HGB is not mandatory.
numeric P: In 2020, KION GROUP AG launched a corporate bond program (EMTN program) with a total volume of €3 billion. H: In 2020, KION GROUP AG launched a corporate bond program (EMTN program) with a total volume of €5 billion.
factive_embedding_verb P: In 2023, the global process introduced in 2017/2018 for performance management and succession planning was implemented once again and content was updated. H: The global process for performance management and succession planning, established in 2017/2018, was never revisited or revised after its initial implementation.
factive_antonymity P: If the carrying amount is greater than the recoverable amount, an impairment loss is recognized for the equity investment. H: If the carrying amount is greater than the recoverable amount, no impairment loss is recorded for the equity investment.
Structure P: No confirmed cases of active corruption by KION Group employees were identified either. H: Confirmed cases of active corruption involving external consultants of KION Group were identified.
Lexical P: In addition, we assessed whether the entry and classification routines have been appropriate. H: Conversely, we disregarded the evaluation of the entry and classification routines' adequacy.
Temporal P: Short-term rental agreements usually have a term ranging from a few hours to a year. H: Short-term rental agreements are typically only valid for periods longer than a year.
worldknowledge P: If the losses caused by a specific risk and the likelihood of this risk occurring exceed defined limits, KION GROUP AG’s Executive Board and the KION Group’s Corporate Controlling function are notified immediately. H: If the losses and likelihood of a risk are minimal and well below any predefined thresholds, KION GROUP AG’s Executive Board and the Corporate Controlling function are immediately informed.
antonymity  P: A multi-stage approval process based on an extensive list of criteria ensures that technological, financial, country-specific, currency-specific, and contractual risks are mitigated to the greatest extent possible.  H: A multi-stage approval process based on a minimal list of criteria ensures that technological, financial, country-specific, currency-specific, and contractual risks are exacerbated to the greatest extent possible.
negation P: The KION Group is continuing to engage in dialog with its customers and is closely monitoring the further course of the coronavirus pandemic and its fallout. H: The KION Group is not engaging in dialogue with its customers nor monitoring the coronavirus pandemic's progression or its consequences.
numeric P: STILL began work on a 24-volt fuel cell system for warehouse trucks that is due on the market in 2023. H: STILL began work on a 48-volt fuel cell system for warehouse trucks that is due on the market in 2023.
factive_embedding_verb P: Valeria Jimena Gargiulo joined the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG on May 1, 2023, in the newly created role of Chief People & Sustainability Officer (CPSO) and as Labor Relations Director. H: KION GROUP AG celebrated the retirement of Valeria Jimena Gargiulo as Chief People & Sustainability Officer (CPSO) and Labor Relations Director on May 1, 2023.
factive_antonymity P: The Company attaches high priority to preventing possible conflicts of interest from occurring in the first place. H: The Company disregards the importance of preventing possible conflicts of interest from occurring in the first place.
structure P: So, we had, like you said, promissory notes of €375 million, with maturities up to 7 years, with the bulk in the 5-year period.   H: Actually, we had, as you mentioned, bonds of €200 million, with yields exceeding 10% annually, predominantly due within the first 2 years.
lexical P: If impairment triggers arise during the financial year, an event-driven goodwill impairment test is also carried out during the year. H: Even if impairment triggers occur within the financial year, an event-driven goodwill impairment test is not performed during that time.
temporal P: The payment of a dividend to the shareholders of KION GROUP AG in May 2021 resulted in an outflow of funds of minus €53.7 million (2020: minus €4.7 million). H: The payment of a dividend to the shareholders of KION GROUP AG in May 2021 resulted in an inflow of funds, increasing the company’s finances before the distribution occurred.
worldknowledge P: Manual and automated solutions are provided for all functions to ensure seamless material handling for customers, from goods inward and Multishuttle warehouse systems to picking, automated palletizing, and automated guided vehicle systems. H: Only manual solutions are available for material handling, implying no use of Multishuttle warehouse systems, automated palletizing, or automated guided vehicle systems for customers.
antonymity P: The KION Group must anticipate customers’ needs and changing market conditions and has to quickly bring new products to market. H: The KION Group should ignore customers' needs and stable market conditions and must delay launching new products.
negation P: The share of temporary agency workers decreased slightly with a level of below 10% (as in the previous year) compared to active employees. H: The share of temporary agency workers did not decrease and remained above 10% compared to active employees.
numeric P: Since 2019, the ‘Golden Rules of Occupational Safety’ have provided KION Group managers with centralised instructions to further improve occupational safety in their area of responsibility. H: Since 2018, the ‘Golden Rules of Occupational Safety’ have provided KION Group managers with centralised instructions to further improve occupational safety in their area of responsibility.
factive_embedding_verb P: The separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, combined management report, and non-financial report are discussed by the Audit Committee and then reviewed and approved by the Supervisory Board. H: The Audit Committee failed to address the separate financial statements, consolidated financial statements, combined management report, and non-financial report before the Supervisory Board declined to review them.
factive_antonymity P: These rules of procedure are published on the KION GROUP AG website at www.kiongroup.com/Rules-of-Procedure. H: These rules of procedure are not available on the KION GROUP AG website at www.kiongroup.com/Rules-of-Procedure.
structure P: So I do believe, at least as things move on, we're able to reallocate part sourcing to other suppliers because we generally have dual sourcing strategy, or we can make some of the parts ourselves. H: I am convinced that, going forward, we cannot reallocate any part sourcing to other suppliers nor can we manufacture any of the parts ourselves because we rely solely on a single-source strategy.
Lexical P: The critical terms of the hedging instruments and the hedged items are therefore matched. H: The critical terms of the hedging instruments and the hedged items are therefore misaligned.
Temporal P: To increase the efficiency of its work, the Supervisory Board is supported by four standing committees: the Nomination Committee, the Executive Committee, the Audit Committee and the Mediation Committee.  H: The Supervisory Board decided to establish the four standing committees: the Nomination Committee, the Executive Committee, the Audit Committee, and the Mediation Committee, after noticing an improvement in its work efficiency.
worldknowledge P: The decrease in the United States was less pronounced. H: The United States experienced the largest decrease globally.
antonymity P: They will also reduce local emissions such as fine particulate matter, nitrogen oxide (NOX), hydrocarbons (HC), and carbon monoxide (CO), which will be beneficial to the working environment for employees. H: They will increase local emissions such as fine particulate matter, nitrogen oxide (NOX), hydrocarbons (HC), and carbon monoxide (CO), adversely affecting the working environment for employees.
negation P: In sale and leaseback sub-leases, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are, in general, substantially borne by the KION Group subsidiaries. H: In sale and leaseback sub-leases, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are, in general, not borne by the KION Group subsidiaries at all.
numeric P: Furthermore, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG decided that the Group would withdraw from all business in Russia as quickly as possible. H: Furthermore, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG decided that the Group would withdraw from 0% of its business in Russia as quickly as possible.
factive_embedding_verb P: However, these criteria are of a subordinate nature when making a final decision on the person to appoint. H: The essential criteria guided the final decision on the person to appoint.
factive_antonymity P: Financial services support the sale of new trucks in many markets, forming another pillar of the service business. H: Financial services hinder the sale of new trucks in many markets, undermining a pillar of the service business.
structure P: Ineffective portions can arise if the critical terms of the hedged item and hedge no longer match; this is determined using the dollar-offset method. H: The dollar-offset method ensures that ineffective portions never arise, as it always matches the critical terms of the hedge and the hedged item perfectly.
lexical P: These treasury shares are not dividend-bearing and do not confer any voting rights. H: These treasury shares are dividend-yielding and grant voting privileges.
temporal P: First, we assessed – based on the individual basis of the contracts – whether the projects meet the requirements for revenue recognition according to the percentage of completion method. H: The projects' compliance with the requirements for revenue recognition was determined after the assessment of the contracts on a collective basis rather than an individual one.
worldknowledge P: Upon measurement of trade receivables, lease receivables, and contract assets subsequent to initial recognition, the KION Group applies the simplified impairment approach of IFRS 9. H: The KION Group exclusively utilizes historical cost accounting for trade receivables, lease receivables, and contract assets without considering IFRS 9's impairment guidelines.
antonymity P: Adjusted EBIT was also higher than in the previous year, increasing by 7.7 per cent to €850.5 million. H: Adjusted EBIT was lower than in the previous year, decreasing by 7.7 per cent to €850.5 million.
negation P: All of Dr. Toepfer's entitlements under the performance share plan have expired because he left the Company on 31 March 2018. H: None of Dr. Toepfer's entitlements under the performance share plan have expired despite him leaving the Company on 31 March 2018.
numeric P: They are either defined benefit pension plans, defined contribution pension plans, or multi-employer benefit plans. H: They are either defined benefit pension plans, defined contribution pension plans, multi-employer benefit plans, or four-employer benefit plans.
factive_embedding_verb P: His new term of office starts on 1 July 2020 and will continue until 30 June 2025. H: He regretted that his term of office began on 1 July 2020 because it actually ended before 30 June 2025.
factive_antonymity P: Those responsible for data protection and its coordination in the individual subsidiaries report to their respective management. H: Those responsible for data protection and its coordination in the individual subsidiaries do not communicate with their respective management.
Structure P: They were last amended on December 14, 2022. H: They were last reviewed, not amended, on December 14, 2022.
Lexical P: Project business contracts with a net debit balance due to customers are reported under contract liabilities, as are advances received from customers. H: Project business contracts with a net credit balance due to customers are reported under contract assets, as are payments made to customers.
Temporal P: In France, Linde products are sold under the Fenwick brand. H: Previously, Fenwick products in France were rebranded as Linde before the current arrangement.
worldknowledge P: Based on our positive business situation and financial performance year-to-date, which we just explained, at KION Group, we anticipate that we will achieve the already raised targets of 2021. H: Despite the KION Group's previously mentioned financial struggles and downturn in business performance, we are set to surpass our initial expectations for 2021.
antonymity P: In the reporting year, the opinions of customers, employees, suppliers, and financial and capital market representatives were taken into account to identify and analyze material topics. H: In the reporting year, the opinions of customers, employees, suppliers, and financial and capital market representatives were ignored to identify and analyze material topics.
negation   P: Gordon Riske mentioned, "We have a daily corona update call with all factories."   H: Gordon Riske stated, "We do not have a daily corona update call with any factories."
numeric P: Sundry intangible assets relate in particular to customer relationships amounting to €436.9 million (December 31, 2021: €467.6 million). H: Sundry intangible assets relate in particular to customer relationships amounting to €436.9 million (December 31, 2021: €480.2 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: It expects an increase in revenue and a significant improvement in both adjusted EBIT and return on capital employed (ROCE) in 2023. H: It regrets not seeing any growth in revenue or improvements in either adjusted EBIT or return on capital employed (ROCE) in 2023.
factive_antonymity  P: Leases entered into with customers in connection with these financing transactions and that constitute an operating lease relationship, together with the financing of the short-term rental fleet, resulted in interest expense of €35.3 million (2021: €27.5 million).  H: Leases entered into with customers in connection with these financing transactions and that constitute an operating lease relationship, together with the financing of the short-term rental fleet, eliminated any interest expense, resulting in €0 in interest payments.
structure P: We believe that the services business will continue to strengthen our resilience and post further strong growth. H: We believe that the manufacturing sector will continue to strengthen our resilience and post further strong growth.
Lexical P: The general guideline for all environmental activities is provided by the KION HSE policy, which is derived from the KION Group Code of Compliance. H: The KION HSE policy, outlining exceptions for environmental activities, stems directly from the KION Group's operational protocols, bypassing the Code of Compliance.
Temporal P: KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst Q2 2022 Update Call Transcription mentioned the pipeline analysis regarding the split between e-commerce and other verticals.  Temporal H: In the KION GROUP AG Q1 2022 Update Call, it was indicated that the pipeline analysis for the split between e-commerce and other verticals had not yet been started.
worldknowledge P: Chronic physical risks were analyzed with external partners for first prioritized representative sites using different scenarios in order to discuss impact and mitigation or adaption measures. H: The assessment of chronic physical risks was solely conducted in-house without considering diverse scenarios or external input, making any discussion on impact and mitigation measures one-dimensional.
antonymity P: Across more than 100 countries worldwide, the KION Group’s logistics solutions improve the flow of material and information within factories, warehouses, and distribution centers. H: Across more than 100 countries worldwide, the KION Group’s logistics solutions hinder the flow of material and information within factories, warehouses, and distribution centers.
negation   P: Due to rounding effects, addition of the individual amounts shown may result in minor rounding differences to the totals.   H: Rounding effects have no impact, ensuring the addition of the individual amounts shown perfectly matches the totals without any differences.
numeric P: Anke Groth said, "Yes, and you also asked with respect to the short-term rental fleet of 30 cars."  H: Anke Groth said, "No, and you also asked with respect to the short-term rental fleet of 40 cars."
factive_embedding_verb P: It does seem feasible, of course, depending on the further development of the epidemic. H: It is guaranteed to be unachievable regardless of how the epidemic progresses.
factive_antonymity P: The level of these risks is regarded as low due to the KION Group’s business model and to the standards that have already been achieved in the areas of energy-related emissions, occupational health and safety, and supply chain monitoring. H: The level of these risks is considered high despite the KION Group’s business model and the standards that have yet to be met in the areas of energy-related emissions, occupational health and safety, and supply chain monitoring.
Structure P: Transcripts from the annual and quarterly conference calls, along with the associated presentations, form part of the extensive information for analysts and investors that is available on the Company’s website.   H: The Company’s website lacks the transcripts from the annual and quarterly conference calls and associated presentations, preventing them from being a part of the extensive information for analysts and investors.
Lexical P: The Operating Units STILL, Linde MH, and Dematic also have academies that run subject-specific and interdisciplinary training courses to develop employees’ skills, particularly in sales and service. H: The Operating Units STILL, Linde MH, and Dematic lack facilities for conducting any form of training courses to enhance employees’ skills, especially in sales and service.
temporal P: To this end, minuted risk management meetings are held once a quarter. H: The risk management meetings are conducted annually.
worldknowledge P: You add the release of net working capital, €250 million. H: The action decreases the company's available funds by €250 million.
antonymity P: The individual Group companies directly manage counterparty risks involving customers. H: The individual Group companies do not directly manage counterparty risks involving customers.
negation P: The relocation of the manufacturing of STILL reach trucks from Hamburg to Stříbro in the Czech Republic is set to be completed in 2023. H: The relocation of the manufacturing of STILL reach trucks from Hamburg to Stříbro in the Czech Republic will not be completed in 2023.
numeric P: The new remuneration system will be presented to the Company’s Annual General Meeting on May 11, 2021 for approval. H: The new remuneration system will be presented to the Company’s Annual General Meeting on May 12, 2021 for approval.
factive_embedding_verb P: It also needs to develop products and solutions that are closely tailored to customers’ needs and environmental requirements now and in the future, and to continually increase the customer benefits provided by its products and services. H: It has neglected to align its products and solutions with the growing environmental standards and customer preferences, remaining stagnant in enhancing customer benefits through its offerings.
factive_antonymity P: We are on track to progress the transition toward sustainable and resource-efficient intralogistics thanks not just to lithium-ion technology but also to hydrogen drive systems. H: We are failing to advance the transition toward sustainable and resource-efficient intralogistics due to the adoption of lithium-ion and hydrogen drive systems.
Structure P: Diversification of the customer base in terms of industry and region as well as expansion of service activities also play a role in mitigating risk. H: Concentration on a single customer base in terms of industry and region as well as reduction of service activities also play a role in mitigating risk.
Lexical P: As at December 31, 2021, the changes in estimates relating to defined benefit pension entitlements resulted in a €150.9 million increase in equity after deduction of deferred taxes (December 31, 2020: decrease of €105.5 million). H: As at December 31, 2021, the changes in estimates relating to defined benefit pension entitlements led to a €150.9 million decline in equity after accounting for deferred taxes (December 31, 2020: increase of €105.5 million).
temporal P: The Nomination Committee has four members, all of whom are shareholder representatives and are elected by the shareholder representatives on the Supervisory Board.  H: The shareholder representatives on the Supervisory Board were elected after the Nomination Committee of four members had already been established.
worldknowledge P: Quality is a key component of the promise to deliver the benefits offered by all KION Group products and processes. H: Quality is considered irrelevant to the performance and reputation of KION Group products and processes.
antonymity P: It partners with research institutes, universities, and companies so that it can go to market with new products and solutions within a short space of time. H: It avoids partnerships with research institutes, universities, and companies, which delays its ability to introduce new products and solutions to the market.
negation P: Also new to the program are e-learning courses on cybersecurity and antitrust law (the latter from 2022). H: The program does not include any e-learning courses on cybersecurity and antitrust law.
numeric P: As we have flagged before, the adjusted EBIT will continue to be depressed until all lower-margin orders have been worked through. H: The adjusted EBIT will continue to rise until all lower-margin orders have been worked through.
factive_embedding_verb P: Capital employed is the working capital that is required. H: Capital employed exceeds the working capital needed for operations.
factive_antonymity P: Company employees regularly participate in the meetings as guests. H: Company employees consistently abstain from the meetings, never attending as guests.
structure P: KION GROUP AG has issued guarantees to the banks for all of the payment obligations. H: KION GROUP AG has issued guarantees for all delivery obligations to the suppliers.
Lexical P: The combined management report contains cross-references that are not provided for by law and which are marked as unaudited. H: The combined management report lacks any cross-references not mandated by law and exclusively includes audited content.
temporal P: This outlook is based on the market assumptions of the International Monetary Fund (IMF) with regard to the expected economic fallout from the war in Ukraine, inflation and anti-inflationary measures, and the ongoing consequences of pandemic-related disruptions to supply chains. H: The assumptions from the International Monetary Fund (IMF) will be formulated after observing the initial impacts of the war in Ukraine, inflation, and the resolution of pandemic-related supply chain disruptions.
worldknowledge P: Opportunities are understood as positive deviations from the expectations set out in the outlook relating to the economic situation and the KION Group’s business situation. H: Opportunities are exclusively negative impacts that entirely match the pessimistic forecasts made for the economic situation and the KION Group's business performance.
antonymity P: Both internal and external audits are used to systematically monitor how the relevant guidelines are applied. H: Neither internal nor external audits are utilized to systematically inspect how the relevant guidelines are applied.
negation P: A large counterbalance could be north of 50,000 bucks. H: A large counterbalance cannot be north of 50,000 bucks.
numeric P: And if I could just ask another question, you mentioned there about the 9% growth rate in Supply Chain Solutions, but obviously, you’ve also got a midterm growth rate target in ITS of around 5%. H: And if I could just ask another question, you mentioned there about the 15% growth rate in Supply Chain Solutions, but obviously, you’ve also got a midterm growth rate target in ITS of around 5%.
factive_embedding_verb P: Thus, KION intends to expand the dealer network in the fast-growing Chinese market covering all brand companies. H: Thus, KION has decided to consolidate its dealer network, focusing solely on key brand companies in the Chinese market.
factive_antonymity P: An ‘Intelligent Experience Center’, where customers can see KION technology in action, was added to this production and development facility last year. H: The production and development facility removed the ‘Intelligent Experience Center’, preventing customers from witnessing KION technology.
Structure P: Spending in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment continued to be focused on capital expenditure on product development and on the expansion and modernization of production and technology facilities. H: Spending in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment continued to be focused on reducing investments in product development and halting the expansion and modernization of production and technology facilities.
lexical P: The CDP Climate Change score improved to A- (Leadership). H: The CDP Climate Change score dropped to B (Management).
temporal P: The KION Group supplies companies of all sizes. H: The KION Group ceased supplying companies before it started its operations.
worldknowledge P: Improving our financial results, revenue, profitability, and free cash flow, is a key focus for us this year. H: This year, the company aims to significantly reduce its emphasis on financial health and cash flow management.
antonymity P: The project is 75% complete. H: The project is 25% complete.
negation P: It was always fully involved in major decisions affecting the Company from an early stage. H: It was never involved in any major decisions affecting the Company.
numeric P: Through their performance, 100 employees create the basis for the Group’s sustainable development. H: Through their performance, 0 employees create the basis for the Group’s sustainable development.
factive_embedding_verb  P: Anke will then provide you with a financial update, and we’ll close with a confirmation of our outlook for the full year 2021.  H: Anke is unable to give any financial updates before we prematurely conclude our discussion on the outlook for the full year 2021.
factive_antonymity P: Philippe Lorrain said, "Yes, thanks for taking my questions." H: Philippe Lorrain complained, "No one acknowledged my questions."
Structure P: The Supervisory Board believes that, in its current composition, it covers all areas of the profile of skills and expertise with regard to practical experience (skills) and/or professional/academic training and knowledge (expertise). H: The Supervisory Board believes that, in its current composition, it lacks coverage in certain key areas of skills and expertise especially in practical experience and professional/academic training.
lexical P: These actions are already contributing to our performance, and we are focused on their continued and successful execution this year. H: These actions have yet to impact our performance, and we are reevaluating their implementation this year.
P: Based on the KION Group’s assessment, the global material handling market was unable to maintain the relatively high level of growth that it recorded in 2021 (measured by revenue). H: The global material handling market continued to experience growth at the same high level in 2021 and beyond, according to the KION Group’s assessment.
worldknowledge P: The independent auditors review the condensed consolidated interim financial statements and condensed interim group management report in the half-year financial report. H: The independent auditors have no involvement with the company's financial documents or reports at any time.
antonymity P: A reconciliation of EBITDA to adjusted EBITDA is presented in the table ‘EBITDA’ (in the section ‘Financial position and financial performance of the KION Group’). H: A reconciliation of EBITDA to adjusted EBITDA is omitted from the table ‘EBITDA’ (in the section ‘Financial position and financial performance of the KION Group’).
negation P: The Company is not under any obligation to update or keep current the information contained in the Presentation. H: The Company is obligated to regularly update and maintain the currentness of the information in the Presentation.
numeric P: The capital increase took effect when its implementation was entered in the commercial register at the Wiesbaden local court under HRB 27060 on May 23, 2017.  H: The capital increase took effect when its implementation was entered in the commercial register at the Wiesbaden local court under HRB 27060 on May 23, 2018.
factive_embedding_verb P: Analysts have confirmed that the global end market outlook is incredibly positive, with projections showing substantial growth over the next decade. H: Analysts have reported concerns that the global end market faces significant downturns, with expectations of decline in the coming years.
factive_antonymity P: Assets classified as held for sale were recognized in the consolidated statement of financial position in an amount of €55.2 million (2022: €27.4 million). H: Assets classified as held for sale were omitted from the consolidated statement of financial position and not reported in any amount.
P: This includes both applying the HSE minimum standards and reviewing relevant processes with audits.   H: This excludes applying the HSE minimum standards and reviewing unrelated procedures without audits.
lexical P: The change to the pension benefit conditions resulted in unrecognized past service income of €12.3 million in the year under review, thereby reducing the present value of the defined benefit obligation. H: The adjustment to the pension benefit conditions resulted in unrecognized past service expenses of €12.3 million in the year under review, thereby increasing the present value of the defined benefit obligation.
Temporal P: Currency translation gains and losses, dividends, valuation allowances for expected and incurred losses, the marking-to-market of derivatives that are not part of a formally documented hedge, and other measurement effects are also included in the net gains and losses.  H: The calculation of net gains and losses excludes currency translation gains and losses, dividends, valuation allowances, the marking-to-market of derivatives, and other measurement effects until after the financial statements are finalized.
worldknowledge P: In Eastern Europe, KION declined by minus 20% in Q4 compared to a very high base in Q4 2018. H: KION's value increased during Q4, marking a period of significant growth compared to Q4 2018.
antonymity P: The initial application of these standards and interpretations has had no significant effect on the presentation of the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group. H: The initial application of these standards and interpretations has had a significant effect on the presentation of the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group.
negation P: As regards the number of women appointed to senior management positions in the Company, the Executive Board is striving in its implementation of the new KION 2027 strategy to increase the current proportion of women in management positions. H: The Executive Board is not making any efforts to adjust or increase the proportion of women in management positions as part of the new KION 2027 strategy.
numeric P: Goodwill is tested for impairment annually at the level of the operating segments. H: Goodwill is tested for impairment biennially at the level of the operating segments.
factive_embedding_verb P: Foreign currency exchange rate expenses predominantly arise in connection with foreign currency positions in internal financing and the related hedging transactions that are not part of a formally documented hedge. H: The company reports that foreign currency exchange rate expenses are solely the result of foreign market investments, excluding any association with internal financing or hedging activities.
factive_antonymity P: They speak only as at the date of the Presentation and the Company undertakes no obligation to update these forward-looking statements. H: The Company commits to regularly revising these forward-looking statements beyond the date of the Presentation.
structure P: The management report is combined with the group management report. H: The management report is combined with the financial statements.
Lexical P: Assets and liabilities are broken down into current and non-current items in accordance with IAS 1.60. H: Assets and liabilities are not categorized as current and non-current items, contrary to the requirements of IAS 1.60.
temporal P: Other key countermeasures include continuous vulnerability scans of the entire IT infrastructure and regular penetration testing of critical systems. H: The regular penetration testing of critical systems is scheduled to begin only after discontinuing the continuous vulnerability scans of the entire IT infrastructure.
worldknowledge P: Considering this, we selected projects based on risk considerations. H: We disregarded all risk metrics when choosing projects.
antonymity P: In mature markets and, increasingly, in growth regions, the large number of trucks in use also provides a strong base for replacement business and rising demand for services. H: In mature markets and, increasingly, in growth regions, the small number of trucks in use offers a weak foundation for replacement business and declining demand for services.
negation P: These hedges are often accounted for as cash flow hedges in accordance with IFRS 9. H: These hedges are never accounted for as cash flow hedges in accordance with IFRS 9.
numeric P: The Group’s order intake of €11,707.6 million was in the lower half of the target range of €11,600 million to €12,500 million.   H: The Group’s order intake of €11,707.6 million was in the upper half of the target range of €11,600 million to €12,500 million.
factive_embedding_verb P: This may lead to reallocation of the budgets earmarked for the realization of opportunities. H: The budgets earmarked for the realization of opportunities will remain untouched for their original purposes.
factive_antonymity P: The 2021 Annual General Meeting is scheduled to take place on May 11. H: The 2021 Annual General Meeting was canceled on May 11.
Structure P: Economic trends within individual customer sectors are another important factor. H: Economic trends within individual customer sectors bear no importance whatsoever.
lexical P: Reported EBIT included positive nonrecurring items of €1 million in the past quarter. H: Reported EBIT was impacted solely by recurring expenses, with no nonrecurring gains mentioned for the past quarter.
Temporal P: The emergence of new coronavirus variants that may prolong the pandemic and lead to further economic difficulties is one of the risks that the IMF sees for the macroeconomic outlook.  H: The IMF had adjusted the macroeconomic outlook to reflect a speedy recovery, assuming that the threats posed by coronavirus variants had already been eradicated before they acknowledged these variants as a risk.
worldknowledge P: Despite the importance of the North American business in the Supply Chain Solutions segment and the prospective growth of business in China, the bulk of revenue continues to be generated in Europe. H: The North American and Chinese markets have historically contributed the majority of revenue for the Supply Chain Solutions segment, overshadowing the European market.
antonymity P: The functional currency is the currency of the primary economic environment in which a KION Group subsidiary operates. H: The functional currency is not the currency of the primary economic environment in which a KION Group subsidiary operates.
negation   P: The assets transferred to the trustee qualify as plan assets within the meaning of IAS 19.   H: The assets transferred to the trustee do not qualify as plan assets within the meaning of IAS 19.
numeric P: As at December 31, 2022, this network comprised around 2,000 outlets in over 100 countries and was staffed by some 8,700 service employees and a large number of external service engineers. H: As at December 31, 2022, this network comprised around 1,500 outlets in over 100 countries and was staffed by some 8,700 service employees and a large number of external service engineers.
factive_embedding_verb P: No conflicts of interest occurred on the Supervisory Board during the year under review. H: The board revealed conflicts of interest during the year under review.
factive_antonymity P: The total value of order intake rose by 40.9 percent to €8,166.3 million (2020: €5,796.8 million). H: The total value of order intake fell by 40.9 percent, ending at €5,796.8 million.
Structure P: Deferred taxes are determined on the basis of the tax rates that will apply at the recovery date, or have been announced, in accordance with the current legal situation in each country concerned. H: Deferred taxes are determined regardless of the tax rates that will apply at the recovery date, ignoring any announcements, contrary to the current legal situation in each country concerned.
lexical P: By constantly improving and providing more and highly efficient safety assistance systems the KION Group aims to significantly minimize the risk of environmental or personal, as well as property, damage. H: The KION Group intends to disregard the enhancement and provision of advanced safety assistance systems, thereby increasing the chance of environmental or personal, and property damage.
temporal P: The total dividend payout rose from approximately €116.8 million to €141.5 million, which equates to a dividend payout rate of around 35 percent.  H: The dividend payout rate remained flat at 35 percent before the total dividend payout increased from approximately €116.8 million to €141.5 million.
worldknowledge P: The total carrying amount of intangible assets rose to €5,732.5 million (2018: €5,721.6 million). H: The total value of intangible assets decreases to €5,732.5 million in 2019 from €5,721.6 million in 2018.
antonymity P: Revenue from the rendering of services is recognized on a straight-line basis over the period of performance or in accordance with the proportion of the overall service rendered by the reporting date. H: Revenue from the rendering of services is recognized in a lump-sum at the completion of the service, without considering the period of performance or the proportion of the service rendered by the reporting date.
negation P: Administrative expenses increased by 10.6 percent year on year, partly due to the implementation of strategic projects, while costs for research and development climbed by 11.4 percent. H: Administrative expenses did not increase over the last year; they remained the same.
numeric P: The Supply Chain Solutions segment (Dematic) was the biggest provider in the global market for warehouse automation in terms of revenue in 2020. H: The Supply Chain Solutions segment (Dematic) was the biggest provider in the global market for warehouse automation in terms of revenue in 2021.
factive_embedding_verb P: Linde Material Handling Austria GmbH is based in Linz, Austria. H: Linde Material Handling Austria GmbH has always been headquartered outside of Austria.
factive_antonymity P: There was a moderate 1.0 percent decrease in selling expenses and administrative expenses compared with 2019. H: There was a moderate 1.0 percent increase in selling expenses and administrative expenses compared with 2019.
Structure P: Accordingly, no assurance is given that such forward-looking statements will prove to have been correct. H: Full assurance is provided that all forward-looking statements will prove to be incorrect.
lexical P: According to the IMF, the emerging markets and developing countries saw their economic output decline by 2.4 percent. H: According to the IMF, the emerging markets and developing countries experienced an economic output increase of 2.4 percent.
P: The development in automation positively impacted the market in 2022.  H: The positive impact on the market was observed before the development in automation began in 2023.
worldknowledge P: Revenue also includes revenue from the lease and short-term rental business after deduction of trade discounts and rebates. H: Revenue does not account for any income from the lease and short-term rental business, solely comprising direct product sales.
antonymity   P: The development in the ITS market this year has been in line with what we shared as our expectations that it’d be down high single digits over the course of this year.   H: The development in the ITS market this year contradicted our expectations, being up high single digits over the course of this year.
negation P: Plan adjustments affecting defined benefit obligations resulted in further non-recurring items that amounted to income of €32.7 million. H: Plan adjustments affecting defined benefit obligations did not result in any non-recurring items that amounted to income.
numeric P: Some of these derivative financial instruments are part of a formally documented hedge with a hedged item and are recognised in accordance with the hedge accounting rules (see note [41]). H: Some of these derivative financial instruments are part of a formally documented hedge with a hedged item and are recognised in accordance with the hedge accounting rules (see note [42]).
factive_embedding_verb P: Other interest and similar income mainly comprised interest income of €169.5 million (2022: €82.2 million) arising from intercompany receivables. H: The report accurately showed that most of the other interest and similar income, totaling €169.5 million, was primarily due to external investments outside of the company.
factive_antonymity P: Opportunity management, like risk management, forms a central part of the Company’s day-to-day management. H: Opportunity management, unlike risk management, plays no role in the Company's day-to-day management.
Structure P: EBITDA for the long-term lease business is shown in the section ‘Financial position and financial performance of the KION Group’. H: EBITDA for the short-term rental operations is highlighted in the report detailing the ‘Operational challenges faced by the KION Group’.
lexical P: With respect to the lease applications used, we examined the appropriateness, implementation and, where required, effectiveness of certain IT controls in line with our audit strategy. H: With respect to the lease applications used, we neglected the evaluation of appropriateness, implementation, and effectiveness of any IT controls regardless of our audit strategy.
Temporal P: A central coordinating KION Group function monitors the planning of building and plant engineering at the sites to ensure that the minimum energy standards are taken into account. H: The KION Group has postponed integrating a central coordinating function to oversee building and plant engineering plans for after the construction projects began, disregarding the minimum energy standards initially.
worldknowledge P: KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call was held to discuss the company's financial results and future outlook. H: Anke Groth announced the discontinuation of all financial reporting and future plans during the KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call.
antonymity P: Growth at regional level, particularly in the cyclical market for industrial trucks, will again depend heavily on the economic conditions in the main sales markets.  H: Decline at regional level, particularly in the cyclical market for industrial trucks, will be independent of the economic conditions in the main sales markets.
negation P: Due to the healthy growth in new business, non-current lease receivables arising from leases with end customers that are classified as finance leases also increased, to €1,701.9 million (December 31, 2022: €1,370.5 million). H: The healthy growth in new business did not lead to an increase in non-current lease receivables arising from leases with end customers classified as finance leases, remaining steady at €1,370.5 million.
numeric  P: This is driving demand for decentralized and smaller warehouse and logistics capacity in urban areas that speeds up delivery times and, due to automated processes, reduces personnel expenses and floor space costs. H: This is driving demand for decentralized and smaller warehouse and logistics capacity in urban areas that speeds up delivery times and, due to automated processes, increases personnel expenses and floor space costs.
factive_embedding_verb P: The increase was disproportionally high in the APAC region in comparison to the US market, which is dominated by e-commerce, and to the EMEA market. H: The report confirmed that the growth in the APAC region was in line with the trends observed in the US and EMEA markets.
factive_antonymity P: Certain industry, market and competitive position data contained in this Presentation, if any, come from official or third party sources. H: All industry, market and competitive position data presented in this Presentation are created internally and not sourced from any official or third party providers.
structure P: With the “X”-series Linde Material Handling offers electric forklifts whose high performance and robustness can be used as a genuine alternative to internal combustion trucks. H: The “X”-series Linde Material Handling offers electric forklifts are found lacking in performance and durability, preventing them from serving as a genuine alternative to internal combustion trucks.
lexical P: The adjusted EBIT of the Industrial Trucks & Services segment rose by €224.6 million to €536.0 million (2020: €311.4 million). H: The adjusted EBIT of the Industrial Trucks & Services segment dropped by €224.6 million to €86.8 million (2020: €311.4 million).
temporal P: The shares were allocated on the basis of an allocation value in euros specified in each Executive Board member’s service contract.  H: The allocation values in euros were decided for each Executive Board member’s service contract after the shares were allocated.
worldknowledge P: The changes to the pension benefit conditions in Germany resulted in unrecognized past service income of €12.3 million in the reporting year (2021: €32.7 million). H: The adjustments made to pension benefit conditions in Germany led to a complete recognition of all past service income in the reporting year.
antonymity P: He has delegated the performance of compliance duties to the Chief Compliance Officer. H: He has retained the performance of compliance duties, not involving the Chief Compliance Officer.
negation P: Now, almost half of it includes price adjustment clauses. H: Now, none of it includes price adjustment clauses.
numeric P: Any unexpected developments in the global economy would result in the KION Group’s and KION GROUP AG’s performance and profits differing significantly from those forecast below. H: Any unexpected developments in the global economy would not result in the KION Group’s and KION GROUP AG’s performance and profits differing significantly from those forecast below.
factive_embedding_verb P: It also held an Analyst Day, at which it presented Dematic’s project business and provided insights into the KION Group’s digital activities. H: At the Analyst Day, there were no presentations or insights given on the KION Group's digital activities or Dematic's project business.
factive_antonymity P: A million (December 31, 2021: €1,022.1 million) were provided to customers for their use. H: No funds were allocated to customers for their use on December 31, 2021.
P: The next phase is aimed at incorporating the results of the categorisation into the general risk assessment of series suppliers. H: The next phase is aimed at excluding the results of the categorisation from the general risk assessment of series suppliers.
lexical P: The Group also mitigates any losses from defaults by its receipt of the proceeds from the sale of repossessed industrial trucks. H: The Group exacerbates losses from defaults despite its expenditure on the acquisition of industrial trucks.
temporal P: The counterparty risk inherent in the leasing business continues to be insignificant. H: The counterparty risk inherent in the leasing business has recently become a significant concern.
worldknowledge P: Both the project business (business solutions) and downstream services (customer services) have contributed to this expansion. H: Neither the project business nor downstream services have any impact on business expansion.
antonymity P: Risks for which financial impact is measured are quantified on the basis of their likelihood of occurring and the extent of the losses that would be incurred were they to do so. H: Risks for which financial impact is measured are not assessed on the basis of their likelihood of occurring but solely on the extent of the potential gains that could be achieved were they to happen.
negation   P: Capital expenditure includes additions to intangible assets and property, plant and equipment (excluding right-of-use assets related to procurement leases) and is shown in TABLE 115.   H: Capital expenditure does not include additions to intangible assets and property, plant, and equipment; it solely comprises expenses related to procurement leases and is detailed in TABLE 115.
numeric P: It is designed for a capacity of up to 40,000 industrial trucks and supports the strengthening of the Group’s market position in the fast-growing value segment. H: It is designed for a capacity of up to 30,000 industrial trucks and supports the strengthening of the Group’s market position in the fast-growing value segment.
factive_embedding_verb P: From the matters communicated with those charged with governance, we determine those matters that were of most significance in the audit of the consolidated financial statements of the current period and are therefore the key audit matters. H: None of the matters communicated with those charged with governance were considered significant enough to influence the audit of the consolidated financial statements of the current period.
factive_antonymity P: Akash Gupta thanked everyone during the KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call. H: Akash Gupta criticized everyone during the KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call.
Structure P: The KION Group makes further information available at the Annual General Meeting, during regular conference calls for analysts and investors, in press releases, on the Company’s website, and on social media. H: The KION Group restricts further information exclusively to the Annual General Meeting, blocking it from regular conference calls for analysts and investors, press releases, the Company’s website, and on social media.
Lexical P: The partnership was agreed upon in 2020 and underpinned by the acquisition of a minority stake. H: The partnership was dissolved in 2020 following the divestment of a minority stake.
Temporal P: Profitability and resilience are supported by the decisive steps we took in both operating segments. H: The operating segments became profitable and resilient before we took any decisive steps.
worldknowledge P: The effects on cash from changes in exchange rates are shown separately. H: The effects on cash from changes in exchange rates are always included in the net income statement.
antonymity P: I see us in an environment where we need to manage things carefully, and our dividend policy -- we had a dividend policy of 25% to 40% of net income being paid out at dividends. H: I envision us in a situation where we can act recklessly, and our dividend policy -- we had a dividend policy of 60% to 75% of net income being retained rather than distributed as dividends.
negation P: If the losses caused by a specific risk or the likelihood of this risk occurring exceed a defined limit, KION GROUP AG’s Executive Board and KION Group’s Corporate Controlling function are notified immediately. H: If the losses caused by a specific risk or the likelihood of this risk occurring do not exceed a defined limit, KION GROUP AG’s Executive Board and KION Group’s Corporate Controlling function are still notified immediately.
numeric P: With the exception of income and expenses recognized as other comprehensive income, equity is recognized at historical rates. H: With the exception of income and expenses recognized as other comprehensive income, equity is recognized at current market rates.
factive_embedding_verb P: And we expect corona more to affect us during Q1. H: We are surprised to see corona sparing us in Q1.
factive_antonymity P: If the residual carrying amount is greater than the recoverable amount, an impairment loss is recognized for an asset. H: If the residual carrying amount is greater than the recoverable amount, an impairment loss is reversed for an asset.
P: Detailed tables according to the Taxonomy Regulation are available in the Annex (Further disclosure on EU Taxonomy).  H: Detailed tables according to the Taxonomy Regulation are omitted from the Annex (No further disclosure on EU Taxonomy).
lexical P: The service cost in accordance with IFRS is shown in table 035. H: The operating income in accordance with IFRS is detailed in table 035.
Temporal P: Adjusted EBITDA declined to €1,042.8 million (2019: €1,409.5 million), giving an adjusted EBITDA margin of 18.3 percent (2019: 22.0 percent).  Temporal H: The adjusted EBITDA increased to €1,500 million in 2019, up from €1,042.8 million in the previous year, resulting in an EBITDA margin growth to 22.0 percent from 18.3 percent.
worldknowledge P: The Supervisory Board appointed Hasan Dandashly for four years and Andreas Krinninger for three years as additional members of the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG with effect from the start of 2021. H: The Supervisory Board appointed Hasan Dandashly and Andreas Krinninger as temporary consultants for KION GROUP AG at the end of 2021.
antonymity P: The future development of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries and the results that are actually achieved are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties which could cause actual events or results to differ significantly from those reflected in the forward-looking statements. H: The future development of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries and the results that are actually achieved are guaranteed and certain, ensuring that actual events or results will match exactly those reflected in the forward-looking statements.
negation P: Any help you could give us that -- aside from pricing, what measures do you have to protect that bottom line? H: We do not have any measures in place to protect our bottom line aside from pricing strategies.
numeric P: STILL, a provider of forklift trucks, warehouse trucks, and intralogistics systems, is a leading innovator in its field and has a particular focus on the European and Latin American markets. H: STILL, a provider of forklift trucks, warehouse trucks, and intralogistics systems, is a leading innovator in its field and has a particular focus on the Asian and North American markets.
factive_embedding_verb P: As there is no foreseeable end to their useful life, the brand names are not amortized. H: The company decided to amortize the brand names due to their limited useful life.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group mitigates research and development risk by focusing firmly on customer benefit in its development of products and solutions. H: The KION Group exacerbates research and development risk by neglecting customer benefit in its development of products and solutions.
Structure P: Dematic Pte., based in Poznań, Poland, encompasses 100% of its operations within the EMEA region, employing 11 to 26 individuals. H: Dematic Pte., based in Poznań, Poland, spreads its operations globally, excluding the EMEA region, and employs thousands.
Lexical P: A general slowdown in economic activity was observed in the fourth quarter of 2022. H: A notable acceleration in economic activity was recorded in the fourth quarter of 2022.
Temporal P: Procurement risk increased in 2020 as a result of the coronavirus pandemic. H: The coronavirus pandemic occurred after the increase in procurement risk in 2020.
worldknowledge P: The Executive Board is authorized to determine that shareholders can cast their votes in writing or by means of electronic communication (absentee voting). H: Shareholders must be physically present to cast their votes, as absentee voting is not permitted.
antonymity P: The KION Group believes that interest in automated and digital solutions increased again in 2022 because they help to make intralogistics processes safer and more resilient. H: The KION Group believes that interest in automated and digital solutions decreased in 2022 because they render intralogistics processes more vulnerable and fragile.
negation P: Other obligations included provisions for risks arising from lease business, for waste disposal and recycling obligations, and for litigation. H: There were no obligations related to risks from lease business, waste disposal, recycling, or litigation.
numeric P: For sale and lease back sublease contracts concluded after 31 December 2017, the transaction is classified as a finance lease. H: For sale and lease back sublease contracts concluded after 31 December 2016, the transaction is classified as a finance lease.
factive_embedding_verb P: This involves not only the design of the business processes, but also the risk management and control processes. H: This overlooks the importance of designing business processes and risk management.
factive_antonymity P: Visitors entering a KION Group site must familiarize themselves with the necessary safety instructions – for example, emergency plans, first aid measures, work permits or the safe handling of machinery and equipment. H: Visitors entering a KION Group site are exempt from familiarizing themselves with the safety instructions, including emergency plans, first aid measures, work permits, or the safe handling of machinery and equipment.
Structure P: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG is responsible for the operational management of the KION Group and had four members in 2020. H: The Advisory Council, not the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG, is responsible for the operational management of the KION Group and had five members in 2020.
Lexical P: When it came to the digitalization of customer solutions, the focus was on development projects relating to digital solutions for warehouse automation. H: When it came to the digitalization of customer solutions, the focus was on discontinuing all digital solutions for warehouse automation.
temporal P: At the time that this combined management report was prepared, all known risks were reflected in the outlook for 2023. H: Significant risks that were unknown at the time the management report was prepared were later identified and affected the outlook for 2023.
worldknowledge P: The company has set a goal to achieve a 10% margin target by 2027. H: The company aims to maintain its current margin rate, with no plans for improvement by 2027.
antonymity P: It may also sell the shares in return for a non-cash consideration, in particular in connection with the acquisition of a business, parts of a business, or equity investments. H: It may never buy the shares in return for a cash consideration, especially in isolation from the disposal of a business, parts of a business, or equity investments.
negation P: In the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, revenue generated from external customers went up by 12.9 percent. H: In the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, revenue generated from external customers did not go up by 12.9 percent.
numeric P: A significant year-on-year increase in adjusted EBIT (IFRS) is therefore anticipated for 2024. H: A significant year-on-year increase in adjusted EBIT (IFRS) is therefore anticipated for 2023.
factive_embedding_verb P: All KION Group’s companies aim to ensure a high level of employee commitment. H: KION Group’s companies have acknowledged failing to maintain any level of employee commitment.
factive_antonymity P: We are thus setting the course for our medium- and long-term growth. H: We are consequently abandoning any strategy directed toward our medium- and long-term growth.
structure P: The Group’s financing takes the form of variable-rate and fixed-rate financial liabilities. H: The Group’s financing excludes variable-rate and fixed-rate financial instruments.
lexical P: Potential interest-rate hikes in advanced economies may result in risks to financial stability and to capital flows, currencies, and the financial situation in emerging markets and developing countries. H: Potential interest-rate reductions in advanced economies will bolster financial stability and strengthen capital flows, currencies, and the financial situation in emerging markets and developing countries.
temporal P: We will come back to the market with a new outlook for the year once we have better visibility. H: We have decided to share our new outlook for the year in the market without waiting for better visibility.
worldknowledge P: In sale and leaseback transactions, industrial trucks are sold to financing partners in accordance with civil law, immediately leased back, and then provided for use to end customers. H: In sale and leaseback transactions, industrial trucks are exclusively held by the original owner for their personal use, without any involvement of financing partners or leasing agreements.
antonymity P: In the reporting year, there were no confirmed cases of corruption or bribery at the KION Group. H: In the reporting year, there were several confirmed cases of corruption and bribery at the KION Group.
negation P: Copper prices maintained their sharp upward trend from the prior year. H: Copper prices did not maintain their sharp upward trend from the prior year.
numeric P: The rise was predominantly attributable to the increase in foreign currency exchange rate gains.  H: The rise was predominantly attributable to the decrease in foreign currency exchange rate gains.
factive_embedding_verb P: With close to 50% of revenue, services also contributed to the strong revenue level. H: Despite making up almost half of the revenue, services were irrelevant to the company's revenue strength.
factive_antonymity P: Non-current and current liabilities from the leasing business rose to €2,739.3 million as at December 31, 2020 (December 31, 2019: €2,495.0 million). H: Non-current and current liabilities from the leasing business dropped to €2,495.0 million as at December 31, 2020 (December 31, 2019: €2,739.3 million).
Structure P: The KION Group attaches great importance to the health and safety of its employees.  H: The KION Group attaches minimal importance to the well-being and protection of its machinery.
lexical P: But to be very straightforward, it’s very difficult to predict how a gas crisis, a gas shortage, a significant reduction of gas will affect the entire supply chain. H: Predicting the impact of an abundant gas supply on the entire supply chain is straightforward and simple.
Temporal P: The New Energy Systems department brings together the KION Group’s knowledge and skills relating to current and future drive technologies.   H: The KION Group had already brought together expertise on future drive technologies in its New Energy Systems department before focusing on current drive technologies.
worldknowledge P: The financial statements of foreign equity-accounted investments are also translated using the method described above. H: The financial statements of foreign equity-accounted investments do not require translation and are directly integrated as is.
antonymity P: They were last amended on December 14, 2022. H: They were first introduced on December 14, 2022.
negation P: Customers range from large key accounts with global operations to small and medium-sized enterprises that typically order just a few trucks each year. H: The company does not serve small and medium-sized enterprises, only large key accounts with global operations.
numeric P: You know that we normally do have a range of 1.5% to 2%, which is our normal price increase. H: You know that we normally do have a range of 3% to 4%, which is our normal price increase.
factive_embedding_verb P: Many of these factors are beyond the control of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries and therefore cannot be precisely predicted. H: KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries have precisely forecasted all influencing factors.
factive_antonymity P: But there was a definite good rebound from Q3 to Q4 on the order intake. H: The order intake significantly declined from Q3 to Q4.
structure P: Within the Americas region, the Supply Chain Solutions segment recorded steady revenue growth in its key sales market of North America, despite delays to projects.  H: Within the Americas region, the Supply Chain Solutions segment recorded significant revenue losses in its key sales market of North America, due to project advancements.
lexical P: Three other projects were taking place at various KION Group sites as at the end of 2021. H: No projects were underway at any KION Group sites at the end of 2021.
temporal P: Our Q2 procurement costs for materials, energy, and logistics intensified further versus the first quarter. H: Our procurement costs for materials, energy, and logistics remained stable in Q2 compared to the previous quarter, showing no increase.
worldknowledge P: So as we had lower pureplay e-commerce last year, there’ll be less execution on pureplay e-commerce this year. H: The increase in pureplay e-commerce last year will result in more focus and execution on pureplay e-commerce strategies this year.
antonymity P: It’s clearly good that you guys are paying a dividend. H: It’s clearly bad that you guys are paying a dividend.
negation P: The electric forklift trucks were also nominated for the Design prize of the German Sustainability Awards (DNP). H: The electric forklift trucks were not nominated for the Design prize of the German Sustainability Awards (DNP).
numeric P: The amount of deferred tax assets recognized in the statement of financial position decreased to €449.3 million as at December 31, 2021 (December 31, 2020: €494.9 million).  H: The amount of deferred tax assets recognized in the statement of financial position decreased to €550.2 million as at December 31, 2021 (December 31, 2020: €494.9 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: Other changes in the equity of associates and joint ventures are recognized in other comprehensive income in the consolidated financial statements in proportion to the Group’s interest in the associate or joint venture. H: The Group reports changes in the equity of associates and joint ventures directly through profit or loss in the consolidated financial statements, disregarding the proportion of the Group’s interest.
factive_antonymity P: Hans Peter Ring, who has been a member of the Supervisory Board since June 2013, was elected as chairman of the Supervisory Board immediately after the Annual General Meeting. H: Hans Peter Ring was dismissed from the Supervisory Board right before the Annual General Meeting could take place.
Structure P: If necessary, the compliance management system is modified to counter future violations.   H: If necessary, the compliance management system is not modified but instead disregarded for addressing future violations.
Lexical P: The details of this report were discussed thoroughly at the Supervisory Board meeting on 2 March 2020 when it was adopted. H: The details of this report were entirely overlooked at the Supervisory Board meeting on 2 March 2020, leading to its dismissal.
temporal P: Depreciation of property, plant, and equipment is recognized on a straight-line basis and reported under functional costs. H: Depreciation of property, plant, and equipment is reported under functional costs before it is recognized on a straight-line basis.
worldknowledge P: The risk matrix below showing the relevant probabilities of occurrence and levels of risk from the Group’s perspective remained unchanged compared with the end of 2021. H: The Group has introduced several new parameters and updated the risk levels and probabilities in their risk matrix for the current year, indicating significant changes from the end of 2021.
antonymity P: Going forward, the KION Group intends to fill more management positions internationally in order to better fulfill the continually growing requirements placed on the Company. H: The KION Group plans to hire fewer management positions locally as a response to the decreasing demands faced by the Company.
negation P: Leases are generally linked to a service contract covering the term of the finance agreement. H: Leases are not generally linked to any service contract covering the term of the finance agreement.
numeric P: However, the associated revenue growth was delayed to 2021 due to postponements in the completion of projects and restrictions in the supply chain. H: However, the associated revenue growth was delayed to 2020 due to postponements in the completion of projects and restrictions in the supply chain.
factive_embedding_verb P: This equates to an 8.55 percent rise in the Company’s share capital in existence on the effective date and at the time of use of the 2017 Authorized Capital. H: The adjustment led to no change in the Company's share capital in existence on the effective date of the 2017 Authorized Capital.
factive_antonymity P: Last year, 20 central HSE audits were carried out within the KION Group. H: Last year, the KION Group cancelled all central HSE audits.
Structure P: Due to the high transaction volume in connection with the various contract types, any errors in this area may considerably affect the consolidated financial statements. H: The low transaction volume associated with the limited contract types ensures that the errors in this area have no significant impact on the consolidated financial statements.
lexical P: The free float accounted for 53.4 percent of the shares, while the remaining 0.1 percent were treasury shares. H: The free float constituted a minor fraction of the shares, comprising only 46.6 percent, whereas the majority were treasury shares.
temporal P: The operator of the new plant will be KION (Jinan) Forklift Co., Ltd., which was established with Weichai Power Co., Ltd. at the start of 2020 and in which the KION Group holds a 95.0 percent stake.  H: KION (Jinan) Forklift Co., Ltd. was established by the KION Group alone at the end of 2020, before any partnership with Weichai Power Co., Ltd. was formed.
worldknowledge P: Upon initial recognition, financial liabilities in the AC category are carried at fair value, including any directly attributable transaction costs. H: Upon initial recognition, financial liabilities in the AC category are carried at their historical cost, not including any transaction costs.
antonymity P: The combination of smaller order volumes and more frequent orders requires efficient and automated solutions. H: The combination of larger order volumes and less frequent orders eliminates the need for efficient and automated solutions.
negation P: Like the Group-wide standards, these rules and regulations are continuously adapted to new conditions. H: These rules and regulations are not adapted to new conditions, regardless of the Group-wide standards.
numeric P: In 2023, KION shares were able to recoup some of the substantial losses that they had suffered in the previous year. H: In 2023, KION shares were not able to recoup some of the substantial losses that they had suffered in the previous year.
factive_embedding_verb P: It also handles individual orders for repairs and maintenance work as well as for spare parts. H: It has never taken individual orders for repairs, maintenance work or spare parts.
factive_antonymity P: As well as adding new products and capacities, we are also forging ahead with the expansion of our global sales and service network, particularly in Asia. H: We are scaling back our global sales and service network, especially in Asia.
Structure P: Non-current and current liabilities from the short-term rental business, which totaled €505.6 million (December 31, 2019: €615.8 million), declined in line with the contraction of the short-term rental fleet. H: Non-current and current assets from the short-term rental business, which totaled €505.6 million, increased regardless of the expansion of the short-term rental fleet.
lexical P: They were exercising their right to speak and their right to vote. H: They were silenced and deprived of their voting privileges.
temporal P: One further new collaborative project, CampusOS, was started in 2022. H: The CampusOS project was launched before the year 2021.
worldknowledge P: The contractual allocation value of the performance share plan on the date of grant was recognised pro rata from the date of appointment to the Executive Board (1 June 2018). H: The contractual allocation value of the performance share plan only begins to be recognized on the executive's retirement date, disregarding their board appointment date.
antonymity P: The basis for decision-making includes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk positions in key currencies. H: The basis for decision-making excludes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk positions in key currencies.
negation   P: Due to the coronavirus pandemic, Executive Board members often had to take part in meetings via video conference in the reporting year.   H: Due to the coronavirus pandemic, Executive Board members never had to take part in meetings via video conference in the reporting year.
numeric P: In 2019, order numbers in the global market for industrial trucks fell by 2.1 per cent year on year to around 1.5 million trucks. H: In 2019, order numbers in the global market for industrial trucks fell by 2.1 per cent year on year to around 2.5 million trucks.
factive_embedding_verb P: The service business, meanwhile, is more stable than the product business as it is linked to the installed base of trucks over their entire lifetime. H: The product business benefits from the fluctuating demand for trucks rather than their installed base.
factive_antonymity P: If KION shares outperform the MDAX by 6.67 percent and the ROCE targets defined each year on the basis of the budget are achieved, total target achievement will be 100 percent. H: KION shares underperform the MDAX, and the ROCE targets defined each year based on the budget are not met, leading to a total target achievement being less than 100 percent.
Structure P: Specific solutions, such as micro-fulfillment, help Dematic to further consolidate its position in major customer sectors, including general merchandise, grocery wholesale and retail, fashion, food and beverage manufacturing, and parcel and courier services.  H: Specific solutions, such as micro-fulfillment, hinder Dematic from consolidating its position in major customer sectors, including automotive manufacturing, electronics retail, pharmaceutical distribution, and heavy machinery services.
lexical P: The chairman of the Supervisory Board does not have a casting vote on the candidates proposed. H: The chairman of the Supervisory Board holds the decisive vote on the candidates proposed.
temporal P: The KION Group is setting up an information and analysis system that records relevant data and information for effective supply chain management with regard to the main purchasing and material items. H: The KION Group has already been using an advanced information and analysis system for effective supply chain management regarding main purchasing and material items for several years.
worldknowledge P: But with the products that you can deliver in six weeks, so the visibility is quite a bit shorter. H: The products require several months to deliver, thus ensuring extensive visibility.
antonymity P: All of this shows that we are able to maintain our course, even in such choppy waters. H: This clearly indicates we are unable to hold our direction in these calm conditions.
negation   P: On March 11, 2021, Hasan Dandashly purchased 1,000 shares at €78.31 each, amounting to €78,312.22.   H: On March 11, 2021, Hasan Dandashly did not purchase any shares.
numeric P: A CP will continue to be responsible for ITS in the APAC region on our Executive Board and will transfer responsibility for the ITS Americas segment to Mike Larsson.   H: A CP will continue to be responsible for ITS in the APAC region on our Executive Board and will transfer responsibility for the ITS Americas segment to 2 Mike Larssons.
factive_embedding_verb P: The foreign-currency forwards used as hedges will mature in 2023 at the latest. H: The company planned for the foreign-currency forwards used as hedges to extend beyond 2023.
factive_antonymity P: The reported EBIT is roundabout €450 million. H: The reported EBIT denies reaching €450 million.
P: The basis for decision-making includes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk positions in key currencies. H: The basis for decision-making excludes sensitivity analyses of commodity price fluctuations in key markets.
Lexical P: NitraSlovakia23 & 120100.00%100.00%108 Linde Viličar d.o.o., is a thriving company. H: NitraSlovakia23 & 120100.00%100.00%108 Linde Viličar d.o.o., is a struggling company.
Temporal P: In the Supply Chain Solutions segment, the KION Group entered into an agreement in July 2021 to acquire 49.0 percent of the share capital and voting rights in a leading provider of warehouse and supply chain automation solutions in India. H: The KION Group completed the acquisition of 49.0 percent of the share capital and voting rights in a leading provider of warehouse and supply chain automation solutions in India, before initiating the agreement in July 2021.
worldknowledge P: Adjusted EBITDA decreased to €32.2 million (2021: €476.6 million); the adjusted EBITDA margin was just 0.8 percent (2021: 12.6 percent). H: The company's financial performance improved significantly, reaching an adjusted EBITDA of €500 million, demonstrating robust growth and profitability.
antonymity P: The report shows an increase in order intake and revenue for the reporting period, excluding the effects of changes in exchange rates. H: The report indicates a decrease in order intake and revenue for the reporting period, excluding the effects of changes in exchange rates.
negation P: This change was due to the much poorer earnings situation of the tax group last year and to the effects of a reassessment of tax circumstances from previous years. H: The change was not influenced by the tax group's earnings situation last year nor by any reassessment of tax circumstances from previous years.
numeric P: The Group's focus on sustainability is reflected in its efforts to manufacture products that are as eco-friendly and safe as possible, to use climate- and environmentally friendly manufacturing processes, and to provide a safe and non-discriminatory working environment.   H: The Group's focus on sustainability is reflected in its efforts to manufacture products that are as eco-friendly and safe as possible, to use climate- and environmentally **unfriendly** manufacturing processes, and to provide a safe and non-discriminatory working environment.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group’s net working capital jumped to €1,192.0 million as at December 31, 2021 (December 31, 2020: €984.5 million) owing to the good level of orders on hand and the ongoing global supply bottlenecks. H: The KION Group was forced to reduce their net working capital to €1,192.0 million by December 31, 2021, due to a decrease in orders and the resolution of global supply bottlenecks.
factive_antonymity P: For long-term construction contracts in the Supply Chain Solutions segment, services that have already been rendered are deducted from the total value of the contract with the customer. H: For long-term construction contracts in the Supply Chain Solutions segment, services that have already been rendered are added to the total value of the contract with the customer.
Structure P: Free cash flow during the full year 2019 was €568 million and exceeded the high prior-year level. H: The high prior-year level exceeded the free cash flow during the full year 2019.
Lexical P: We expect and have noticed, in the first months of this year, continued momentum from Q4 but not at the rate that we saw in Q4. H: The momentum from Q4 has halted entirely at the beginning of this year, showing no signs of continuation.
temporal P: In the period before the industrial truck is returned, it is depreciated on a straight-line basis until the amount expected to be paid upon return is reached. H: The industrial truck's depreciation on a straight-line basis starts only after it has been returned.
worldknowledge P: The financial assets largely comprised the carrying amounts of the equity investments in Dematic Holdings GmbH (€2,862.2 million) and Linde Material Handling GmbH (€1,368.4 million). H: The primary assets of the corporation were its extensive art collection, with no significant investments in companies like Dematic Holdings GmbH or Linde Material Handling GmbH.
antonymity P: The methodology applied was regularly examined by TÜV Rheinland. H: The methodology applied was never examined by TÜV Rheinland.
negation P: The projected KPIs reflect the Company’s expectations regarding future developments and are therefore forward-looking. H: The projected KPIs do not reflect the Company’s expectations regarding future developments and are not forward-looking.
numeric P: KION GROUP AG controls a subsidiary if it has decision-making power over the main activities of the entity and can use this power to affect the amount of the variable returns to which it is exposed as a result of the equity investment.  H: KION GROUP AG controls a subsidiary if it has decision-making power over the main activities of the entity and can use this power to affect the amount of the 0 variable returns to which it is exposed as a result of the equity investment.
factive_embedding_verb P: We’re watching those very carefully, and they’re part of our planning process. H: We are unaware of those, so they have not influenced our planning process.
factive_antonymity P: The payment of taxes totaling minus €216.8 million (2019: minus €191.6 million), resulting mainly from the Company’s strong profitability in 2019, was also a factor. H: The refund of taxes totaling minus €216.8 million (2019: minus €191.6 million), resulted mainly from the Company’s significant losses in 2019.
Structure P: Rob Smith said, "No, Akash, I ask you to please understand our commercial agility and our operational agility are very important for our company."  H: Rob Smith said, "No, Akash, I ask you to please disregard our commercial agility and our operational agility as they are irrelevant to our company."
lexical P: This has the potential to impact negatively on the KION Group’s business. H: This will have no discernible effect on the KION Group’s business operations.
Temporal P: Yes, the market in ITS was still very strong in the first half of last year and then cooled down, as you see in the market numbers for Q3 and also our expectations for the market for Q4.   Temporal H: No, the market in ITS didn't start cooling down after the first half of last year; it actually began its downturn at the beginning of last year, with continuous weakening observed through the entire year, contradicting the idea of a strong first half.
worldknowledge P: Besides others, the main reasons for this are climate change and the legal requirements designed to prevent it. H: The primary factors contributing to this phenomenon are solely technological advancements and economic factors, with no influence from climate change or legal regulations.
antonymity P: The target achievement levels for the weighted targets (adjusted EBIT and free cash flow) are added together to give the total target achievement.   H: The target achievement levels for the weighted targets (adjusted EBIT and free cash flow) are subtracted from each other to determine the total target deficit.
negation  P: To support customers in choosing the right technology for them, LMH EMEA has added new solutions and tools to its existing range of consulting services.  H: LMH EMEA has not expanded its consulting services to support customers in choosing the right technology.
numeric P: This may lead to reallocation of the budgets earmarked for the realization of opportunities.  H: This may lead to reallocation of the budgets earmarked for the reduction of opportunities.
factive_embedding_verb P: The increase was due to the rights issue carried out in December 2020. H: The company failed to carry out any financial activities in December 2020.
factive_antonymity P: The impairment losses on property, plant, and equipment are reported under other expenses. H: The impairment gains on property, plant, and equipment are reported under other expenses.
structure P: Despite the regionalization of some supply chains as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, the globalization of many sectors continues to be one of the main over-arching growth drivers. H: Despite the globalization of many sectors, the regionalization of some supply chains halts as the main detriment to over-arching growth.
Lexical P: In particular, the Company may retire the treasury shares or sell them through a stock exchange or by means of an offer to all shareholders. H: Specifically, the Company is prohibited from either retiring the treasury shares or selling them, whether through a stock exchange or to any shareholders.
Temporal P: Across more than 100 countries worldwide, the KION Group’s logistics solutions improve the flow of material and information within factories, warehouses, and distribution centers.  H: The KION Group is set to launch its logistics solutions to enhance material and information flow in factories, warehouses, and distribution centers across more than 100 countries worldwide next year.
worldknowledge P: And when we do so, we plan to also address our medium-term targets. H: They have no intention of setting or pursuing any medium-term targets.
antonymity P: Cash and cash equivalents rose from €175.3 million as at 31 December 2018 to €211.2 million as at 31 December 2019. H: Cash and cash equivalents fell from €175.3 million as at 31 December 2018 to €145 million as at 31 December 2019.
negation P: In addition, it uses derivatives to hedge currency risk.   H: It does not use derivatives to hedge currency risk.
numeric P: This investment project has been supported by funding from the German Federal Ministry for Digital and Transport. H: This investment project has been supported by funding from the French Federal Ministry for Digital and Transport.
factive_embedding_verb P: Szczecin, Poland, Linde Material Handling Polska Sp. has increased its share to 100%. H: Linde Material Handling Polska Sp. has considered increasing its share in Szczecin, Poland, but decided against it.
factive_antonymity P: In addition, data-based analysis software will enable the KION Group’s customers to reduce energy costs and promote the achievement of sustainability targets through flexible procurement on the energy markets and the optimal use of energy. H: The data-based analysis software will prevent the KION Group’s customers from reducing energy costs and hinder the achievement of sustainability targets through rigid procurement on the energy markets and the suboptimal use of energy.
Structure P: KION is also an industry partner in the European research project IMOCO4.E, which aims to significantly expand the autonomous capabilities of vehicles and open up a broader field of applications in the human-machine production environment. H: KION is restricting the autonomous capabilities of vehicles and reducing the field of applications in the human-machine production environment as an industry partner in the European research project IMOCO4.E.
lexical P: Linde Material Handling Ibérica, S.A.U. is based in Barcelona, Spain. H: Linde Material Handling Ibérica, S.A.U. is located outside of Spain.
Temporal P: As the KION Group can only adjust its fixed costs to fluctuations in demand to a limited extent and with a delay, reductions in revenue impact on earnings.   H: The KION Group adjusts its fixed costs simultaneously with fluctuations in demand, preventing any impact on earnings from reductions in revenue.
worldknowledge P: Under KEEP 2019, the KION Group will bear the cost of one KION share (free share) in each of the first seven share packages that an employee takes up. H: Under KEEP 2019, employees are required to purchase the first KION share in each share package at full price with no contributions from the KION Group.
antonymity P: Preparations to end the audit work of the current auditors, Deloitte GmbH Wirtschaftsprüfungsgesellschaft, Munich, and for the audit work to be taken over by the new auditors were made in the second half of 2022. H: No preparations were made to begin the audit work of the current auditors, Deloitte GmbH Wirtschaftsprüfungsgesellschaft, Munich, in the second half of 2022.
negation P: And in case I push my luck too much at this point, any comments on current trading into October in absolute terms would be highly appreciated. H: I have decided not to push my luck further, so there's no need for comments on current trading into October.
numeric P: The annual tranches promised under the plan have a term (performance period) of three years and are paid at the end of the term, provided the defined targets have been achieved.   H: The annual tranches promised under the plan have a term (performance period) of five years and are paid at the end of the term, provided the defined targets have been achieved.
factive_embedding_verb P: Dematic Logistics de Mexico S. de R.L. is based in Coslada, Spain, and has a 100.00% equity share in the EMEA region, with 17 employees in Spain and 21 in total. H: Dematic Logistics de Mexico S. de R.L. was established in Frankfurt, Germany, serving primarily the APAC market with a rapidly expanding team of 30 members.
factive_antonymity P: In line with this strategy, our Hamburg-based brand STILL opened its fourth European refurbishment center in Turkey a couple days ago, following sites in Germany, Poland, and Italy. H: Contrary to its expansion strategy, our Hamburg-based brand STILL has closed its recently established refurbishment center in Turkey, which was supposed to be its fourth in Europe after Germany, Poland, and Italy.
P: We examined the appropriateness of the internal controls’ design and implementation regarding the estimation of the percentage of completion and continued review of contract costs. H: We ignored the analysis of the internal controls’ design and skipped the evaluation of the completion percentage and the ongoing audit of contract costs.
Lexical P: Customers’ satisfaction with the products and services of the KION Group is highlighted by the long-term nature of customer relationships and the high proportion of repeat business. H: Customers' dissatisfaction with the products and services of the KION Group is marked by the short-term nature of customer relationships and the low proportion of repeat business.
Temporal P: The €39.6 million rise in provisions to €125.1 million was mainly the result of additions in tax provisions and to the provisions for share-based remuneration and short-term incentives. H: The provisions were increased to €125.1 million before the company decided to make additions in tax provisions and to the provisions for share-based remuneration and short-term incentives.
worldknowledge P: The transaction costs of €10.2 million (after tax) that were directly attributable to the capital increase were recognized under capital reserves. H: Transaction costs are usually revenue expenditures and are deducted from the company's profits, not recognized under capital reserves.
antonymity P: The Executive Board provided the Supervisory Board with regular written and oral reports on the Company’s economic position and on material business transactions, both during meetings and between meetings. H: The Executive Board never supplied the Supervisory Board with any updates on the Company’s economic situation or on material business transactions, neither during meetings nor at any time in between.
negation   P: However, the proportion of the segment’s external revenue generated by the service business fell to 20.5 percent (2020: 26.1 percent) due to the above-average rise in revenue attributable to business solutions.   H: The proportion of the segment’s external revenue generated by the service business did not decrease; it remained steady from the previous year.
numeric P: The Supervisory Board also deliberated on the strategic significance of the Company-wide transformation and digitalization project and on the progress with its implementation. H: The Supervisory Board also deliberated on the strategic significance of the zero Company-wide transformation and digitalization projects and on the progress with its implementation.
factive_embedding_verb P: The Supervisory Board recognizes the particular significance of appropriate, performance-based, and transparent remuneration arrangements for the Executive Board. H: The Supervisory Board doubts the necessity of specific, performance-related, and clear compensation structures for the Executive Board.
factive_antonymity P: The purchase consideration for these shares was approximately €3.3 million. H: The purchase consideration for these shares was not approximately €3.3 million, indicating no transaction took place.
P: The KION Group is integrating software into its solutions and increasingly marketing software solutions as standalone products.   H: The KION Group is removing software from its solutions and ceasing marketing of software solutions as standalone products.
lexical P: The pro-rata expense calculation based on the fair value of the phantom shares on each valuation date is carried out using Monte Carlo simulation. H: The pro-rata expense calculation disregards the fair value of the phantom shares on each valuation date, negating the need for Monte Carlo simulation.
temporal P: Gains and losses arising from the disposal of interests are also recognised in equity, provided there is no change in control. H: Gains and losses arising from the disposal of interests must be recognised in equity only after a change in control occurs.
worldknowledge P: Nevertheless, the individual activities could create positive effects that exceed expectations. H: The individual activities inherently lead to outcomes that meet only the minimal expected standards without any potential for exceeding them.
antonymity P: A total of around 84 percent of the share capital was represented. H: A mere 16 percent of the share capital was represented.
negation   P: On Page 7, we’ll see the key financials for the ITS segment.   H: On Page 7, there will be no mention of the key financials for the ITS segment.
numeric P: The Executive Board subsequently approved the strategy as binding. H: The Executive Board subsequently approved the strategy as non-binding.
factive_embedding_verb P: In 2022, 98 percent of the employees were trained on the topic of occupational safety (2021: 98 percent). H: The company failed to include occupational safety training in their 2022 employee development programs.
factive_antonymity P: On cross-border issues, the European Works Council represents the interests of employees in the European Union. H: On cross-border issues, the European Works Council ignores the interests of employees in the European Union.
structure P: However, this share is to be regarded as the minimum. H: This share, however, is to be regarded as the maximum.
lexical P: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG is responsible for the operational management of the KION Group. H: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG is not involved in the operational management of the KION Group.
temporal P: I understand that the increase in size obviously could explain part of this in one quarter, but what are the conversations you're having with clients? H: The discussions with clients were completed before any observed increase in size during the quarter.
worldknowledge P: The precise aim is to prepare internal candidates for management positions to accomplish the tasks and challenges of the KION Group’s future.  H: The sole purpose is to transition internal candidates away from the company to ensure they are unfit for any future roles at the KION Group.
antonymity P: Management positions are predominantly filled with talented employees who are recruited from within the Group and, to this end, have received support and skills training.  H: Management positions are mainly occupied by inexperienced employees who are hired externally and have not undergone any support or skills training.
negation P: Default risk is limited by diversifying business partners based on certain credit ratings. H: Default risk is not limited by diversifying business partners, regardless of their credit ratings.
numeric P: Marcus Wassenberg said, "So basically, we’re seeing 100 shipments coming from the order backlog."  H: Marcus Wassenberg said, "So basically, we’re seeing 0 shipments coming from the order backlog."
factive_embedding_verb P: Contract balances mainly relate to goods and services provided in the project business that have not yet been billed. H: Contract assets are fully recognized for the already billed goods and services in the project business.
factive_antonymity P: It is also stepping up its multi-brand strategies on the sales side. H: It is scaling down its multi-brand strategies on the sales side.
structure P: And so, we keep a good watching eye on that. H: And so, we ignore that entirely.
Lexical P: The prospective and retrospective effectiveness of hedges is measured using a regression analysis with historical data. H: The success and failure of hedges cannot be quantified through regression analysis or historical data.
temporal P: The use of lithium-ion batteries in drive technology is at the heart of our research and development activities. H: We had concluded our research and development activities focusing on lithium-ion batteries in drive technology before prioritizing other projects.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group’s purchasing organisation is strategically managed centrally and operates with a cross-brand and cross-regional material group structure. H: The KION Group's purchasing operations are managed independently by each regional office without any central strategy or cross-brand collaboration.
antonymity P: The additional benefits were measured at the value calculated for tax purposes. H: The additional benefits were ignored at the value calculated for tax purposes.
negation   P: The KION Group’s diversified and well-balanced customer structure and long-standing customer relationships, combined with the way it is benefiting from global growth trends, are key factors that explain why it is relatively resilient to economic turbulence and external market disruptions.   H: The KION Group's lack of customer diversity and weakening customer relationships, along with its failure to leverage global growth trends, make it highly susceptible to economic turbulence and external market disruptions.
numeric P: Default risk is limited by diversifying business partners based on certain credit ratings. H: Default risk is not limited by diversifying business partners based on certain credit ratings.
factive_embedding_verb P: The reported revenue of €47.2 million (2018: €30.5 million) largely arose from the performance of services for affiliated companies. H: The notable decrease in the reported revenue was attributed to the lack of service performance for affiliated companies.
factive_antonymity P: Thank you very much to the both of you. H: I blame you both completely.
Structure P: Any of these risks that have a measurable financial impact are incorporated into an existing risk category as appropriate. H: None of these risks with measurable financial impacts are included in any existing risk category.
Lexical P: The Executive Board develops the Company’s strategy, discusses it with the Supervisory Board, and ensures that it is implemented. H: The Executive Board abandons the Company’s strategy, ignores the Supervisory Board, and ensures it is not executed.
Temporal P: The KION Group was represented by its brand companies at various other trade fairs as well, such as CeMAT AUSTRALIA, the Logistics Summit in Hamburg, and ACHEMA, the world’s leading trade show for the process industry.   H: The KION Group's representation at ACHEMA, the Logistics Summit in Hamburg, and CeMAT AUSTRALIA was scheduled after the company decided to no longer participate in such trade fairs.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group strives to create a behavior-based safety culture that minimizes risks to physical and mental health such as work-related injuries, occupational illnesses, or overexertion. H: The KION Group aims to increase productivity by encouraging a work culture that prioritizes speed and efficiency over the safety and health of its employees.
antonymity P: The finance talent management program focuses on diversity criteria when nominating potential candidates and thus, fosters diversity in the finance organization. H: The finance talent management program emphasizes uniformity criteria when selecting potential candidates and thus, suppresses diversity in the finance organization.
negation   P: The Group-wide HSE network of experts ensures that knowledge is shared and best practices rolled out throughout the Group.   H: The Group-wide HSE network of experts does not ensure that knowledge is shared or best practices are implemented across the Group.
numeric P: At the same time, the threat level is also becoming more acute, as both the number of attacks and their potential to cause damage have increased in recent years. H: At the same time, the threat level is also becoming more acute, as the number of attacks and their potential to cause damage have decreased in recent years.
factive_embedding_verb P: Through the SBTi, KION has enshrined its long-term goal of reaching net-zero greenhouse gas emissions along its value chain (scopes 1, 2, and 3) by 2050, and set related interim goals up to 2030. H: KION, despite statements to the contrary, has yet to establish any environmental goals through the SBTi.
factive_antonymity P: The full year order intake from pureplay eCommerce companies increased in 2022 compared to 2021. H: The full year order intake from pureplay eCommerce companies decreased in 2022 compared to 2021.
Structure P: There is also the risk of further inflation following the sharp price rises seen in 2022 and of a potential destabilization of the international financial markets if interest rates rise and a debt crisis unfolds in emerging markets and developing countries.   H: The stabilization of the international financial markets results from the sharp price drops observed in 2022 and due to falling interest rates preventing a debt crisis in emerging markets and developing countries.
Lexical P: The Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG consider that adhering rigorously to broad-ranging compliance standards is essential to the Company’s sustained financial success. H: The Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG believe that neglecting broad-ranging compliance standards is crucial to the Company's sustained financial success.
P: Although the KION Group managed to reduce the level of orders on hand over the twelve-month period, the order book was still at the high level of €6,362.1 million as at the reporting date (December 31, 2022: €7,077.8 million).  H: The KION Group's order book increased to €7,500 million on December 31, 2022, indicating a significant rise in orders over the twelve-month period.
worldknowledge P: Further details of Executive Board remuneration, including the individual amounts for each member, are presented in KION GROUP AG’s separate 2022 remuneration report, which will be made available on the KION Group website. H: The 2022 remuneration report for KION GROUP AG does not include individual amounts for each Executive Board member and is not separately available online.
antonymity P: If the cost of acquisition is lower than the fair value of the acquiree’s net assets, the negative goodwill is recognized in profit or loss. H: If the cost of acquisition is higher than the fair value of the acquiree’s net assets, the negative goodwill is recognized in profit or loss.
negation P: The decrease was due to the poorer earnings situation of the tax group in 2020. H: The decrease was not due to the poorer earnings situation of the tax group in 2020.
numeric P: The additional benefits were measured at the value calculated for tax purposes. H: The additional benefits were measured at a different value than the one calculated for tax purposes.
factive_embedding_verb P: The amount is significantly lower than in the prior year because of the deterioration in earnings and free cash flow. H: The report confirmed that the increase in the amount was due to an improvement in earnings and free cash flow.
factive_antonymity P: However, the latter is likely to be significantly lower than the exceptionally strong growth seen in 2020. H: However, the latter will match or surpass the exceptionally strong growth seen in 2020.
structure P: The current corporate income tax rate in Germany is 15.0 percent plus a solidarity surcharge (5.5 percent of corporate income tax). H: The current corporate income tax rate in Germany is applied to individual income, not corporate income.
lexical P: It also prepares all Supervisory Board resolutions required in this regard, especially in connection with the Executive Board members’ variable remuneration components (setting of targets and target achievement for the short-term and long-term bonuses). H: It has no involvement in preparing any Supervisory Board resolutions related to the Executive Board members’ fixed remuneration components, including target setting and target achievement assessments for their salaries.
temporal P: The Executive Committee holds four regular meetings per year. H: The Executive Committee's regular meetings are scheduled all on the same day annually.
worldknowledge P: But it’d have more impact next year. H: It’s already reached its peak impact this year and cannot increase further.
antonymity P: The consolidated financial statements are prepared in euros, which is the Group’s presentation currency. H: The consolidated financial statements are prepared in dollars, which is the Group's presentation currency.
negation P: The figure for 2020 had been influenced by high non-tax-deductible expenses and by losses that could not be utilized for tax purposes owing to the level of earnings.  H: The figure for 2020 was not affected by high non-tax-deductible expenses nor by losses, as all losses could be utilized for tax purposes regardless of the level of earnings.
numeric P: The gross margin was squeezed by the effects of higher material prices and logistics costs, inefficiencies resulting from supply and resource bottlenecks, and the relatively small increase in volumes in the high-margin service business in the SCS segment.  H: The gross margin was squeezed by the effects of lower material prices and logistics costs, inefficiencies resulting from supply and resource bottlenecks, and the relatively large increase in volumes in the high-margin service business in the SCS segment.
factive_embedding_verb P: A certain German union is looking at 7% to 8% wage increases starting in October. H: The same German union is considering halting wage increments beginning in October.
factive_antonymity P: Although demand for services is less cyclical than new business with industrial trucks, it correlates with the degree of utilization of the trucks and systems, which usually declines during difficult economic periods. H: The degree of utilization of the trucks and systems correlates with the demand for services and typically increases during difficult economic periods.
Structure P: The main driver of greenhouse gas emissions in the KION Group is the use of energy.  H: The main driver of greenhouse gas emissions in the KION Group is the manufacturing processes.
lexical P: The information and opinions contained in this Presentation do not purport to be comprehensive, are provided as at the date of the document and are subject to change without notice. H: The information and opinions offered in this Presentation claim to be exhaustive and are fixed as of the document's issuance date.
temporal P: The executive directors are responsible for such internal control as they have determined necessary to enable the preparation of consolidated financial statements that are free from material misstatement, whether due to fraud or error.   H: The preparation of consolidated financial statements free from material misstatement precedes the establishment of necessary internal controls by the executive directors.
worldknowledge P: The products and services of subsidiaries in the KION Group have to comply with the specific legal requirements in their respective markets. H: The products and services of subsidiaries in the KION Group are exempt from any legal requirements in their respective markets.
antonymity P: So one of the challenges is getting enough people and the capacities to keep up with the growth. H: Consequently, an advantage is having too many people and capacities exceeding the need for growth.
negation P: So firstly, within the 6% organic revenue growth that was posted in Q2, how much of that 6% was volume, and how much was pricing? H: There was no organic revenue growth reported in Q2; it actually remained flat.
numeric P: It contains the KION Group’s separate non-financial Group report as required under Germany’s CSR Directive Implementation Act (CSR-RUG). H: It contains the KION Group’s separate non-financial Group report as required under Germany’s CSR Directive Implementation Act (CSR-RUG).
factive_embedding_verb P: The supply chain risks for 2024 are regarded as manageable based on the prevailing market conditions. H: Experts discovered that the supply chain risks for 2024 are beyond control due to unforeseen market conditions.
factive_antonymity P: The identifiable assets acquired and the liabilities assumed are measured at their fair value. H: The identifiable assets acquired and the liabilities assumed are ignored in their valuation process.
structure P: KION GROUP AG controls a subsidiary if it has decision-making authority over the main activities of the entity and can use this authority to affect the amount of the variable returns to which it is exposed as a result of the equity investment.  H: A subsidiary controls KION GROUP AG by deciding on the main activities of the entity, thus determining the variable returns KION GROUP AG is exposed to due to its equity investment.
lexical P: The proportion of the KION Group’s total workforce made up of women was slightly higher at 17.8 percent in 2022, compared with 17.1 percent in 2021. H: The proportion of the KION Group’s total workforce comprised of men saw a small increase to 82.2 percent in 2022 from 82.9 percent in 2021.
Temporal P: Global online trade (B2C) has expanded at an average rate of 16 percent per annum in recent years (2017 to 2023) according to research institute eMarketer (eMarketer, June 2023). H: According to eMarketer (eMarketer, June 2023), global online trade (B2C) has shown a decline in growth rate, averaging at 16 percent annually over the period of 2017 to 2019, before stabilizing in the subsequent years.
worldknowledge P: While it will take longer for list price increases on new trucks to flow through, the margin quality of the backlog benefitted from recent list price increases. H: Recent list price increases on new trucks have had an immediate negative impact on the margin quality of the backlog.
antonymity P: Net payments for acquisitions had amounted to minus €17.0 million in 2021; the equivalent figure for the year under review was minus €4.9 million. H: Net receipts from divestitures had amounted to plus €17.0 million in 2021; the equivalent figure for the year under review was plus €4.9 million.
negation P: Our response to the changing situation since March 2020 has been rapid and thorough, particularly when it comes to protecting our employees’ health, which is our highest priority.   H: Our response to the changing situation since March 2020 has been slow and inadequate, especially in regards to protecting our employees' health, which we have not prioritized.
numeric P: The compact design of the fully automated system means that fulfilment centres can be installed close to the end consumer, which brings down delivery times even further. H: The compact design of the fully automated system means that fulfilment centres can be installed close to the end consumer, which increases delivery times even further.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group complied with all the obligations in this regard in the reporting year. H: The KION Group failed to meet some obligations in this regard in the reporting year.
factive_antonymity P: The archaeologist discovered ancient pottery in the cave. H: The archaeologist overlooked ancient pottery in the cave.
structure P: Because, at least for the German workforce, I would imagine that this could be a topic next year. H: Because, at least for the French workforce, I would imagine this could never be a topic at any time.
lexical P: The worldwide efforts to limit global warming and corresponding challenges for the planet demand active and forward-looking climate-related action from the KION Group. H: The worldwide disregard for global warming and corresponding indifference towards the challenges for the planet deny any necessity for climate-related action from the KION Group.
Temporal P: One of the prime objectives of capital management is to ensure liquidity at all times. H: Capital management's primary objective to ensure liquidity is only a concern during economic downturns.
worldknowledge P: KION GROUP AG’s equity investments consist of subsidiaries, joint ventures, associates, and financial investments. H: KION GROUP AG's equity investments are solely made up of real estate and commodities, not involving any shares in companies.
antonymity P: Details on the type and amount of contribution by the KION Group in the reporting year are available in the Annex (Table 36). H: Details on the type and amount of contribution by the KION Group in the reporting year are unavailable in the Annex (Table 36).
negation P: When liabilities from procurement leases are initially measured, the lease payments not yet made are discounted at an interest rate implicit in the lease. H: When liabilities from procurement leases are initially measured, the lease payments not yet made are not discounted at an interest rate implicit in the lease.
numeric P: Free cash flow is shown in the table ‘Core key performance indicators’ in this section. H: Free cash flow is shown in table ‘Core key performance indicators’ in section 5.
factive_embedding_verb P: The associates and joint ventures can be seen in the list of shareholdings (see note [49]). H: Details on associates and joint ventures are not included in the shareholding documentation.
factive_antonymity P: The specification of this type of target is required by Germany’s ‘Act for the equal participation of women and men in managerial positions in the private and public sectors’. H: The specification of this type of target is prohibited by Germany’s ‘Act for the equal participation of women and men in managerial positions in the private and public sectors’.
structure P: The Annual General Meeting in 2022 was, as in 2021, held as a virtual event without the physical presence of the shareholders or their proxies due to the special circumstances created by the ongoing coronavirus pandemic. H: The Annual General Meeting in 2022 was, unlike in 2021, celebrated in-person with the active participation of all shareholders and their proxies, marking a return to traditional gatherings.
lexical P: Procedures are in place to validate and log access to the Group’s infrastructure. H: Procedures are neglected for validating and logging access to the Group's infrastructure.
Temporal P: In doing so, the Supervisory Board took account of the Company’s financial situation and performance, its medium-term financial and capital-expenditure planning, and the interests of the shareholders.  H: The Supervisory Board's decision was made without considering the Company’s financial situation and performance or its medium-term financial and the capital-expenditure planning because these evaluations were conducted after the Board had already made its decision.
worldknowledge P: In 2020, the Supervisory Board therefore defined what it considers to be an adequate number of independent Supervisory Board members. H: The concept of an independent Supervisory Board member was introduced for the first time in 2021 and has yet to be clearly defined.
antonymity   P: Rob Smith described a general trend.   H: Rob Smith did not observe any general trend.
negation P: The payment of taxes totaling minus €216.8 million (2019: minus €191.6 million), resulting mainly from the Company’s strong profitability in 2019, was also a factor. H: The company did not have to pay taxes in 2019 due to its strong profitability.
numeric P: Up-to-date ratings from CDP, EcoVadis, FTSE Russell ESG, ISS ESG, MSCI ESG, S&P Global CSA, Sustainalytics ESG Risk Rating and Vigeo Eiris ESG can be found on the corporate website. H: Up-to-date ratings from CDP, EcoVadis, FTSE Russell ESG, ISS ESG, MSCI ESG, S&P Global CSA, Sustainalytics ESG Risk Rating and Vigeo Eiris ESG cannot be found on the corporate website.
factive_embedding_verb P: The improvement in this KPI was partly due to the smaller rise in capital employed at the end of 2019 relative to the increase in revenue. H: The improvement in this KPI was partly due to the significant decline in capital employed at the end of 2019 despite the increase in revenue.
factive_antonymity P: In the year under review, Germany and other regions of importance to our Company experienced a third wave of coronavirus before a brief spell of falling case numbers in the summer followed by a fourth wave at the end of the year. H: In the year under review, Germany and other regions of importance to our Company avoided a third wave of coronavirus, seeing continuous decline in case numbers throughout the summer without a fourth wave at the end of the year.
Structure P: The Executive Board maintains a relationship of trust with, and is monitored by, the Company’s Supervisory Board. H: The Executive Board maintains a relationship of trust with, and is monitored by, independent auditors, not the Company’s Supervisory Board.
lexical P: And consequently, we expect a high single-digit decline for the ITS market in China in the full year, whereas the market for Supply Chain Solutions is marked by long-term strategic decisions and therefore less cyclical. H: Surprisingly, we anticipate a high single-digit growth for the ITS market in China throughout the full year, illustrating the market for Supply Chain Solutions as being profoundly influenced by short-term tactical shifts and thus highly cyclical.
temporal P: Order intake in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment is expected to be lower than in 2021 due to an anticipated decline in the global market for industrial trucks.  H: The global market for industrial trucks is forecasted to expand significantly in 2022, leading to a higher order intake in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment compared to 2021.
worldknowledge P: In the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, at least 75 percent of the currency risk related to the planned operating cash flows based on liquidity planning is normally hedged by currency forwards in accordance with the risk management policy. H: In the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, currency forwards are never used for hedging currency risks related to operating cash flows, disregarding the company's risk management policy.
antonymity P: The 2018 tranche expired on December 31, 2020, and will be paid out in the first quarter of 2021. H: The 2018 tranche commenced on December 31, 2020, and will be collected in the first quarter of 2021.
negation P: The KION Group continued with its ongoing growth projects according to plan in 2021, with some already completed successfully. H: The KION Group halted its growth projects, failing to complete any as planned in 2021.
numeric P: In 2021, revenue of €1,634.8 million (2020: €892.7 million) was generated from one single external customer and predominantly in the Supply Chain Solutions segment.   H: In 2021, revenue of €892.7 million (2020: €1,634.8 million) was generated from one single external customer and predominantly in the Supply Chain Solutions segment.
factive_embedding_verb P: Providing support for the expansion of the sustainability management system will be a particular priority here. H: Demonstrating indifference towards the expansion of the sustainability management system is seen as a core focus.
factive_antonymity P: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) is €71.20. H: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) declined to €71.20.
Structure P: China exceeded this rate of growth with an increase of 8.1 percent, which was driven by strong exports and rising domestic demand. H: China did not exceed this rate of growth, seeing a decrease driven by weakening exports and falling domestic demand.
lexical P: He played a key role in the KION Group’s transformation from a European industrial truck manufacturer into one of the world’s leading providers of intralogistics and automation solutions. H: He played a minor role in the KION Group’s persistence as a local industrial truck manufacturer, preventing it from becoming one of the world’s leading providers of intralogistics and automation solutions.
temporal P: Consequently, they involve a number of risks and uncertainties. H: Consequently, they are devoid of any risks or uncertainties.
worldknowledge P: The shift in the relevant yield curves was simulated to assess interest-rate risk. H: The simulation ignored all yield curve movements to evaluate interest-rate volatility.
antonymity P: 23,000 KION Group employees covered by collective bargaining agreements at the end of 2020. H: No KION Group employees were covered by collective bargaining agreements at the end of 2020.
negation P: In addition, the Operating Units have extensive used truck and rental truck businesses, allowing peaks in capacity requirements to be met and customers to be supported after their leases have expired. H: The Operating Units do not offer any used truck or rental truck services, thus they cannot support customers once their leases have expired.
numeric P: Based on this analysis, which was limited to data of KION Group companies, there would have been no notable additional tax expense in the relevant countries if MinStG had been required to be applied in respect of the 2023 financial year.   H: Based on this analysis, which was limited to data of KION Group companies, there would have been notable additional tax expense in the relevant countries if MinStG had been required to be applied in respect of the 2023 financial year.
factive_embedding_verb P: There’s still quite a bit of appropriate R&D going on in ITS and SCS. H: Research activities in ITS and SCS have concluded successfully.
factive_antonymity P: And they are placing orders in Europe with us. H: They are canceling all their orders in Europe with us.
Structure P: Interest-rate risks arising on the variable-rate tranches of the promissory note were hedged by entering into a number of interest-rate swaps, thereby transforming the variable interest-rate exposure into fixed-rate obligations.  H: The interest-rate swaps entered resulted in an increase of variable interest-rate exposure instead of transforming it into fixed-rate obligations.
lexical P: In addition, each of the main risks for current planning is analyzed and discussed at all levels as part of the regular business review meetings. H: None of the main risks for current planning are acknowledged nor considered at any level during the regular business review meetings.
temporal P: Regular certifications and corresponding audits contribute to maintaining standards and help identify possible improvements. H: Audits must occur before any certifications can be granted to assess if improvements are needed, which contradicts the sequence where audits contribute to maintaining standards after certifications are received.
worldknowledge P: Its chairman is always the chairman of the Supervisory Board. H: The chairman never holds any position in the Supervisory Board.
antonymity P: In addition, they are responsible for financial reporting based on the going concern basis of accounting unless there is an intention to liquidate the Group or to cease operations, or there is no realistic alternative but to do so. H: They are not responsible for financial reporting based on the going concern basis of accounting and solely focus on preparing for the liquidation of the Group and cessation of operations, implying there are multiple realistic alternatives available.
negation P: The interest income is recognized under financial income and is spread over the term of the lease in order to ensure a constant return on the outstanding net investment in the lease. H: The interest income is not recognized under financial income, nor is it spread over the term of the lease to ensure a constant return on the outstanding net investment in the lease.
numeric P: The risks involved in the process of ramping up new production sites remained insignificant in the reporting year and are minimised by means of project management and contractual provisions.  H: The risks involved in the process of ramping up new production sites remained significant in the reporting year and are minimised by means of project management and contractual provisions.
factive_embedding_verb P: These are offset by gains and losses on the change in the fair value of the hedged lease receivables, which result in an adjustment in profit or loss of the carrying amount of the hedged item in net financial income/expenses. H: The adjustment in profit or loss from the change in the fair value of the hedged lease receivables contributes to the stability of the carrying amount of the hedged item in net financial income/expenses.
factive_antonymity P: For the sake of these stakeholders, KION GROUP AG strives for an appropriate ratio of internal funding to borrowing. H: For the sake of these stakeholders, KION GROUP AG neglects the appropriate ratio of internal funding to borrowing.
structure P: Moreover, conditions in the commodity markets typically affect component prices after a delay of no more than three to six months. H: Instead, conditions in the labor markets immediately affect commodity markets without any delay.
lexical P: As a responsible employer, the KION Group focuses on preventing accidents and occupational illnesses as much as possible, as well as safeguarding each individual’s long-term capacity to work. H: The KION Group prioritizes efficiency over safety, largely neglecting the prevention of accidents and occupational illnesses, compromising each individual's long-term capacity to work.
temporal P: The plan set out in the agreement is for the KION Group to then acquire the remaining 51.0 percent of the shares in two further tranches by 2025. H: The KION Group has to acquire the last 51.0 percent of the shares in one final transaction by the end of 2023.
worldknowledge P: However, the strength of the service business meant that order intake increased nonetheless. H: The weakening of the service business led to a significant increase in order intake.
antonymity P: A variable-rate tranche of the promissory note that was due to mature in 2024 and had a nominal amount of €167.0 million was repaid ahead of schedule at the end of April 2021. H: The variable-rate tranche of the promissory note that was due to mature in 2024 and had a nominal amount of €167.0 million remained outstanding past its original maturity date.
negation P: Linde Material Handling Austria GmbH is based in Linz, Austria. H: Linde Material Handling Austria GmbH is not based in Linz, Austria.
numeric P: The Remuneration Committee focuses mainly on issues relating to the Executive Board’s remuneration but also deals with the annual remuneration report and the preparations for the report’s approval by the Annual General Meeting.  H: The Remuneration Committee focuses mainly on issues relating to the Executive Board’s remuneration but also deals with the biannual remuneration report and the preparations for the report’s approval by the Annual General Meeting.
factive_embedding_verb P: The figure shown for multiple-year variable remuneration is for the actual amount paid out, which may differ from the estimated value listed in the 2018 consolidated financial statements. H: The figure shown for multiple-year variable remuneration aligns perfectly with the estimated value listed in the 2018 consolidated financial statements.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group is predicting a high single-digit percentage decline in the number of new industrial trucks ordered in 2022 following a very strong year for this market in 2021. H: The KION Group is predicting a high single-digit percentage increase in the number of new industrial trucks ordered in 2022 following a very strong year for this market in 2021.
structure P: The KION Group maintains a liquidity reserve in the form of cash and a revolving credit facility in order to ensure long-term financial flexibility and solvency. H: The KION Group maintains a debt portfolio and financial obligations in lieu of a liquidity reserve, jeopardizing long-term financial flexibility and solvency.
lexical P: Some members of this group have already been promoted to a senior management position. H: No members of this group have ascended to a senior management role.
Temporal P: The auditors were appointed by the chairman of the Supervisory Board on June 2, 2021. H: The chairman of the Supervisory Board was not in office until September 2021.
worldknowledge P: The table below shows the pension contributions (additions to the plan) attributable to each individual Executive Board member and their separate present values in accordance with IFRS (International Financial Reporting Standards) and HGB (Handelsgesetzbuch - German Commercial Code).  H: The table excludes all pension contributions for individual Executive Board members and doesn't differentiate values between IFRS and HGB standards, since executive pensions are universally calculated without adherence to any accounting standards.
antonymity P: And that means we have no change to our midterm targets, which we announced last year. H: We have adjusted our midterm targets significantly from what was announced last year.
negation   P: The assignment to the various categories can be found in note [40].   H: The assignment to the various categories cannot be found in note [40].
numeric P: Various technical and organizational measures protect the data of the KION Group and the Group companies against unauthorized access, misuse, and loss. H: Zero technical and organizational measures protect the data of the KION Group and the Group companies against unauthorized access, misuse, and loss.
factive_embedding_verb P: Building on the preparations carried out in 2019 and supported by an external, independent remuneration consultant, the working group drew up the broad outline for the updated Executive Board remuneration system over five sessions. H: The working group, without any external support, finalized the detailed plans for the Executive Board's outdated remuneration system in one session.
factive_antonymity P: This requires the Group to continually develop products that meet customer expectations and comply with changing regulatory and technological requirements. H: This allows the Group to cease developing products, ignoring customer expectations and disregarding changing regulatory and technological requirements.
Structure P: This equates to an 8.55 percent rise in the Company’s share capital in existence on the effective date and at the time of use of the 2017 Authorized Capital.  H: This equates to an 8.55 percent decrease in the Competitor’s total assets in existence following the effective date and at the time of observation.
lexical P: Moreover, predictions of higher volumes and margins may lead to overcapacity, which would put increased pressure on prices. H: Conversely, forecasts of reduced volumes and margins might result in undercapacity, thereby easing the strain on prices.
Temporal P: As at December 31, 2021, outstanding lease payments with a present value of €654.4 million (December 31, 2020: €500.4 million) were available as collateral for liabilities from the lease business.   H: As of December 31, 2020, outstanding lease payments with a present value of €654.4 million were already utilized as collateral for liabilities from the lease business, decreasing to €500.4 million by December 31, 2021.
worldknowledge P: On June 16, 2023, the KION Group signed an agreement for the sale of the Industrial Trucks & Services segment’s business in Russia as part of a management buyout. H: On June 16, 2023, the KION Group ceased all business operations and held no assets in Russia, making any sale of business segments there impossible.
antonymity P: The focus in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment was on the expansion and modernization of production and technology facilities. H: The focus in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment was on the reduction and obsolescence of production and technology facilities.
negation P: Discarding fewer products means obtaining fewer materials and is better for the environment and the economy in the long run. H: Discarding fewer products does not mean obtaining fewer materials and is not better for the environment and the economy in the long run.
numeric P: Gordon Riske said, "Well, we turn orders down all the time." H: Gordon Riske said, "Well, we turn orders down 0 times."
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group mitigates its liquidity risk and interest-rate risk attaching to the lease business by ensuring that most of its transactions and funding loans have matching maturities and by constantly updating its liquidity planning. H: The KION Group reported difficulties in managing its liquidity risk and interest-rate risk for the lease business due to irregularities in matching maturities of transactions and funding loans.
factive_antonymity P: Other financial investments comprise long-term investments that are held in order to cover the defined benefit obligation and do not qualify as plan assets. H: Other financial investments exclude long-term investments that are held in order to cover the defined benefit obligation and do qualify as plan assets.
Structure P: He succeeded Dr. Eike Böhm, who retired on June 30, 2021. H: Dr. Eike Böhm succeeded him, who started his position on June 30, 2021.
lexical P: Leases are generally linked to a service contract covering the term of the finance agreement. H: Leases are typically independent and do not include a service contract for the duration of the finance agreement.
Temporal P: Christian Harm mentioned, "So indeed, we are seeing a very good development of the free cash flow across the 3 quarters so far throughout the year, and evidently, that’s driven by the earnings that we are having."  Temporal H: Contrary to Christian Harm's comments, the improvement in free cash flow actually materialized primarily in the final quarter, unrelated to the earnings performance observed in the preceding quarters.
worldknowledge P: The system and the methods applied are refined on an ongoing basis and are regularly assessed to ensure they are functioning as intended. H: The system and its methods are never updated or evaluated for effectiveness.
antonymity P: This may lead to reallocation of the budgets earmarked for the realization of opportunities. H: This will prevent any shifts in the budgets allocated for addressing challenges.
negation P: The new plant will be used to manufacture items such as racks for the Dematic Multishuttle system, components for automated guided vehicle systems, and conveyor belts and systems. H: The new plant will not be involved in manufacturing activities for racks, components for automated guided vehicle systems, or conveyor systems.
numeric P: Accordingly, a liability related to financial services is recognised in addition to an asset. H: Accordingly, no liability related to financial services is recognised in addition to an asset.
factive_embedding_verb P: Our observation year-to-date is that the market is performing in line with our expectations of being down high single digits. H: We have confirmed that the market has surprisingly exceeded our expectations by showing significant growth.
factive_antonymity P: They relate to services that are still to be provided but for which prepayments from customers have been received. H: They relate to services that have already been delivered without any prepayments from customers.
Structure P: And in 2020, we paid €10 million for the acquisition of the minority stake in EP Equipment. H: And in 2020, the minority stake in EP Equipment paid us €10 million for its independence.
lexical P: The task includes general qualification and development programs as well as individual talent management. H: The task excludes any form of qualification or developmental programs and ignores individual talent management.
temporal P: Adjusted EBITDA increased to €1,409.5 million (2018: €1,340.2 million).   H: Adjusted EBITDA was higher in 2018 at €1,409.5 million compared to €1,340.2 million in 2019.
worldknowledge P: The remuneration paid to the Executive Board comprises a fixed salary and non-cash benefits, pension entitlements, and performance-related components. H: The remuneration paid to the Executive Board consists exclusively of a fixed salary, with no non-cash benefits, pension entitlements, or performance-related components included.
antonymity P: The agreed financial covenant involves ongoing testing of adherence to a defined maximum level of leverage. H: The agreed financial covenant involves ongoing testing of adherence to a defined minimum level of leverage.
negation P: The impairment test is conducted at the level of the operating entities, which represent the cash-generating units, by determining the corresponding realisable amount and comparing that realisable amount with the corresponding carrying value. H: The impairment test is not conducted at the level of the operating entities, nor does it involve comparing the realisable amount with the carrying value of the cash-generating units.
numeric P: And we see the adjustment or the rebalancing, if you will, in e-commerce as a temporary piece, temporary phenomenon, and we expect it to get back on a growth path in the quarters or the couple years to come.   H: And we see the adjustment or the rebalancing, if you will, in e-commerce as a temporary piece, temporary phenomenon, and we expect it to get back on a growth path in the decades or the many years to come.
factive_embedding_verb P: Despite the expected downturn in the macroeconomic environment, the risk that customers will cancel or postpone orders has not, in the assessment of the KION Group, significantly increased. H: The KION Group acknowledges that the macroeconomic downturn has heightened the risk of receiving customer cancellations and delays.
factive_antonymity P: However, KION was slightly lagging behind the market, which was mainly driven by an even stronger demand for smaller warehouse equipment. H: In contrast, KION significantly outpaced the market, which was not influenced by the demand for smaller warehouse equipment.
structure P: The cost of sales comprises the cost of goods sold and services rendered, costs arising from project business contracts, and revenue-related costs from the lease and short-term rental business. H: The cost of sales exclusively involves expenditures related to administrative salaries, marketing campaigns, and long-term asset acquisitions.
Lexical P: The meeting was exclusively attended in person, with no options for telephone or video conferencing provided. H: The meeting welcomed participants virtually, facilitating attendance through telephone and video conferencing.
temporal P: I think it’s important -- and I’m glad you asked the question because there is no reversion to old times. H: Actually, we are currently experiencing a return to the practices of old times.
worldknowledge P: The Annual General Meeting on May 11, 2017 voted to create authorized capital that will enable the KION Group to meet its funding needs quickly and flexibly. H: The KION Group operates solely on a volunteer basis and does not require any form of funding or capital to meet its operational needs.
antonymity P: There is still a lot of cash tied up in working capital, and we expect to further unwind some of that this year. H: There is minimal cash tied up in working capital, and we do not anticipate releasing any of it this year.
negation  P: It is responsible for managing the Company in the Company’s interest.  H: It is not responsible for managing the Company in the Company’s interest.
numeric P: Leases entered into with customers in connection with these financing transactions and that constitute an operating lease relationship, together with the financing of the short-term rental fleet, resulted in interest expense of €22.5 million (2019: €23.3 million).  H: Leases entered into with customers in connection with these financing transactions and that constitute an operating lease relationship, together with the financing of the short-term rental fleet, resulted in interest expense of €25.3 million (2019: €23.3 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: We've found alternatives and put some plans in place and some capex in place to enable us to do all the heating needs without the gas and use the gas only for the drying process. H: We have prioritized using the gas for both heating and drying needs, omitting the search for alternatives.
factive_antonymity P: The auditors reviewed this report and issued an auditors’ report. H: The auditors disregarded this report and did not issue any auditors’ report.
Structure P: So that it can ensure security of supply and the availability of spare parts for important components in order to meet customers’ specific requirements, the segment manufactures major components itself, notably lift masts, axles, counterweights, and safety equipment.  H: To ensure the security of supply and the availability of spare parts for important components for meeting customers' specific requirements, the segment outsources the production of major components, including office furniture, electronic devices, and interior decorations.
Lexical P: The long-term growth rate used for Dematic was 1.3 percent (2020: 1.3 percent). H: The decline rate forecasted for Dematic was 1.3 percent (2020: 1.3 percent).
temporal P: This has created a staggered board structure, thereby helping to ensure the continuity of the Supervisory Board’s work. H: The introduction of the staggered board structure occurred after the Supervisory Board's workflow continuity was already ensured.
worldknowledge P: Serious breaches of the European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) can lead to fines of up to 4 percent of the previous year’s revenue. H: Violations of the European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) are rewarded with bonuses equivalent to 4 percent of the previous year’s revenue.
antonymity P: This section contains an overview of the KPIs used by the KION Group to comply with the reporting obligations prescribed by law. H: This section lacks details about the KPIs used by the KION Group, violating the reporting obligations prescribed by law.
negation   P: In terms of GHG emissions, for example, energy and fuel consumption during the use phase proved to be the biggest emission driver across all product groups.   H: In terms of GHG emissions, production and manufacturing processes, not energy and fuel consumption during the use phase, are identified as the primary sources of emissions across all product groups.
numeric P: The percentages shown are calculated on the basis of the respective amounts, rounded to the nearest thousand euros (€ thousand).  H: The percentages shown are calculated on the basis of the respective amounts, rounded to the nearest hundred euros (€ hundred).
factive_embedding_verb P: At the same time, however, customers in both operating segments were reluctant to invest in view of uncertainty in the global markets, causing a sharp year-on-year fall in order intake. H:  Customers in both operating segments increased their investments due to confidence in the global markets, leading to a significant rise in order intake.
factive_antonymity P: For 2023, a total expense of €20.4 million for twelve months was recognized for share-based remuneration (2022: total income of €22.1 million). H: For 2023, a total income of €20.4 million for twelve months was recorded for share-based remuneration, not an expense.
structure P: If a customer is expected to accept goods but has yet to do so, the corresponding revenue is recognized only when the goods are accepted. H: The corresponding revenue is recognized when the customer places the order, even if the goods are not accepted.
lexical P: As a result, a large number of projects in the operating units are concerned with reducing energy consumption or emissions. H: As a result, a large number of projects in the operating units are primarily focused on increasing energy consumption or emissions.
Temporal P: The chairman of the Supervisory Board does not have a casting vote on the candidates proposed. H: The chairman of the Supervisory Board had a casting vote on the candidates before the new governance rules were implemented.
worldknowledge P: The mentees and mentors alike describe the program as very rewarding. H: Participants universally regard the program as a waste of time.
antonymity P: This AGV, which uses AI-based swarm technology, was developed in conjunction with the Fraunhofer Institute for Material Flow and Logistics and was successfully trialed at a leading logistics company in 2022. H: This AGV, which uses AI-based swarm technology, was abandoned during the development phase by the Fraunhofer Institute for Material Flow and Logistics and was never tested at any logistics company.
negation P: Free cash flow is expected to be in a range between €270.0 million and €370.0 million. H: Free cash flow is not expected to reach €270.0 million.
numeric P: KION GROUP AG’s Supervisory Board had five standing committees in the reporting year. H: KION GROUP AG’s Supervisory Board had six standing committees in the reporting year.
factive_embedding_verb P: In parallel to the appointments to these new positions, it appeared opportune in this context to deal with the succession planning for the role of Chief Technology Officer (CTO). H: The company had no intentions of initiating succession planning for the Chief Technology Officer (CTO) role.
factive_antonymity P: The KION GROUP AG discussed the utilization of internal combustion as the source of energy in their Investor & Analyst Q1 2022 Update Call. H: The KION GROUP AG denied the use of internal combustion as an energy source in their Investor & Analyst Q1 2022 Update Call.
Structure P: All of the separate financial statements of the subsidiaries included in the consolidation were prepared as at the same reporting date as the annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG. H: Some separate financial statements of the subsidiaries included in the consolidation were prepared on different reporting dates than the annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG.
lexical P: This funding enables the KION Group to present a united front in the capital markets and strengthens its hand in negotiations with banks and other market participants. H: This funding isolates the KION Group in the capital markets and weakens its position in discussions with banks and other market participants.
temporal P: Free cash flow is expected to be in the range of €270 million to €370 million for the KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2019 Update Call Transcription.  H: Free cash flow estimates for the KION GROUP AG were revised down to €100 million to €200 million during the FY 2019 Update Call, indicating a prior overestimation.
worldknowledge P: There is also a possibility that new strategic opportunities that were not part of the planning may arise over the course of the year, for example in the form of acquisitions and strategic partnerships. H: Strategic opportunities, such as acquisitions and strategic partnerships, are exclusively predetermined and cannot emerge unexpectedly within the year.
antonymity P: This would result in assets and liabilities not being recognised and measured in the correct amount. H: This would ensure assets and liabilities are recognised and measured in the correct amount.
negation P: As digitalization and networking continue to pick up speed, the importance of a secure IT infrastructure, that is reliable all the time is also growing. H: As digitalization and networking continue to pick up speed, the need for a secure IT infrastructure is becoming less critical, regardless of its reliability.
numeric P: Prepayments received from customers came to €645.5 million (2019: €549.6 million). H: Prepayments received from customers came to €545.5 million (2019: €549.6 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: In this way, the KION Group creates a stable funding position for profitable growth. H: The KION Group's strategy jeopardizes its financial stability, impeding profitable growth.
factive_antonymity P: The number of new truck orders rose by a total of 42.9 percent to 2,343 thousand units, which was a new record. H: The number of new truck orders decreased significantly, failing to reach a new record.
Structure P: For 2023, the IMF expects global economic growth to slow again to 2.9% versus 3.4% in ’22, with developed economies expanding by just 1.2% and the Eurozone by 0.7%.   H: For 2023, the IMF expects global economic sectors to accelerate rapidly, surpassing the previous year's performance significantly.
Lexical P: And then would you mind putting a number behind those milestones that you would see coming through in '23? H: Actually, we will not quantify any milestones for '23, keeping all projections qualitative.
temporal P: A team is responsible for monitoring the system-based controls, which it supplements with manual checks. H: The team performed manual checks before initiating the system-based controls for monitoring.
worldknowledge P: Overall, the climate-related risks faced by the KION Group in this regard, e.g., include extreme weather events, rising temperatures, and increased regulatory requirements on emissions which are based on the well-documented global effects of climate change. H: The KION Group is predominantly exposed to climate-related risks due to the global decrease in temperatures and the deregulation of emission controls, contrary to documented global warming trends and increasing environmental regulations.
antonymity P: For internal management purposes, the KION Group has divided its operating business into two operating segments that correspond to the operating segments as required by international financial reporting standards (IFRS 8). H: For internal management purposes, the KION Group has combined its operating business into a single operating segment that contradicts the segmentation required by international financial reporting standards (IFRS 8).
negation P: The EMEA and Americas regions were key contributors to the growth in supply chain solutions. H: The EMEA and Americas regions did not contribute to the growth in supply chain solutions.
numeric P: I have learned 3 crucial lessons from the current supply challenges. H: I have learned 4 crucial lessons from the current supply challenges.
factive_embedding_verb P: Dematic Group S.à r.l., based in Banbury, United Kingdom, belongs to the EMEA region with a 100% ownership. H: Dematic Group S.à r.l., reportedly headquartered in Banbury, operates independently with no affiliation to any parent company.
factive_antonymity P: Gains and losses recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income are not reclassified to profit or loss upon derecognition of these financial assets but instead remain in equity. H: Gains and losses recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income are reclassified to profit or loss upon derecognition of these financial assets and do not remain in equity.
structure P: Overall, the level of financial risk remaining unchanged compared with the previous year. H: The level of financial risk has significantly increased compared to the previous fiscal period.
Lexical P: It contains the KION Group’s report on non-financial matters as required under the German law to implement the corporate social responsibility (CSR) directive. H: It excludes the KION Group’s report on non-financial matters, disregarding the German law to implement the corporate social responsibility (CSR) directive.
Temporal P: In mature markets and, increasingly, in growth regions, the large number of trucks in use also provides a strong base for replacement business and rising demand for services. H: The demand for replacement business and services in mature markets began declining before the increase in the number of trucks in use.
worldknowledge P: In a next step, we obtained an understanding of whether the automated entry and classification routines used in the lease applications comply with the relevant IFRS. worldknowledge H: The relevant IFRS guidelines provide no rules or standards for automated entry or classification in lease applications, making compliance checks unnecessary.
antonymity P: Moving to the free cash flow statement on Page 14, in the 9-month period, free cash flow amounted to €135 million. H: Moving to the free cash flow statement on Page 14, in the 9-month period, free cash flow amounted to a deficit of €135 million.
negation P: There was also increased demand in the service business, which benefited from the expanding installed base of completed customer projects. H: There was no increase in demand in the service business, despite the expanding installed base of completed customer projects.
numeric P: In addition, the KION Group continued to drive forward the development of cross-brand software and hardware for use in applications such as networked trucks and AMRs.   H: In addition, the KION Group did not continue to drive forward the development of cross-brand software and hardware for use in applications such as networked trucks and AMRs.
factive_embedding_verb P: The risk and capacity management system is in place to work with suppliers to examine risks as well as develop and implement concepts to safeguard capacity. H: The risk and capacity management system has neglected examining risks with suppliers and has not implemented any concepts to safeguard capacity.
factive_antonymity P: Baoli focuses on industrial trucks in the lower value and economy segments. H: Baoli ignores industrial trucks in the lower value and economy segments.
structure P: The risks reported by the individual companies are combined to form Operating Unit risk reports as part of a rigorous reporting process. H: The risks reported by the individual companies are ignored in forming Operating Unit financial strategies as part of a streamlined decision-making process.
Lexical P: In February 2019, a further 13,674 no-par-value shares were issued for employees’ own investments under KEEP 2018. H: In February 2019, not a single no-par-value share was allocated for employees’ own investments under KEEP 2018.
P: As at 31 December 2019, the total nominal amount of the issued promissory notes was €1,310.0 million (2018: €1,210.0 million).  H: The total nominal amount of the issued promissory notes decreased to €1,210.0 million by 31 December 2018, from €1,310.0 million in 2019, indicating a reduction over the year.
worldknowledge P: Linde and Dematic also jointly exhibited at the China International Import Expo (CIIE) in Shanghai. H: Linde and Dematic have never participated in any expos or trade shows together, especially not in Shanghai.
antonymity P: In addition, foreign-currency forwards are employed to hedge the currency risks arising in the course of internal financing. H: Instead, foreign-currency forwards are avoided to expose the company to currency risks during internal financing.
negation P: By contrast, it depreciated against the Chinese renminbi by 3.1 percent. H: It did not depreciate against the Chinese renminbi.
numeric P: In cases where entitlements are not securities-linked, all of the KION Group’s pension obligations in Germany under closed plans are financed by way of CTAs.  H: In cases where entitlements are not securities-linked, none of the KION Group’s pension obligations in Germany under closed plans are financed by way of CTAs.
factive_embedding_verb P: They define the conduct expected of managers in the KION Group. H: They question the conduct outlined for managers in the KION Group.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group mitigates potential research and development risks by systematically managing projects and processes. H: The KION Group exacerbates potential research and development risks by neglecting the management of projects and processes.
structure P: So there is no comparison to what was published from that company. H: There is a direct comparison to what was issued by another company.
lexical P: The KION Group only uses derivatives to hedge underlying operational and financial transactions; they are not used for speculative purposes. H: The KION Group employs derivatives primarily for speculative ventures, not for hedging operational and financial risks.
temporal P: KION GROUP AG has no rights arising from the treasury shares that it holds (section 71b AktG). H: KION GROUP AG exercised rights arising from the treasury shares before it was restricted by section 71b AktG.
worldknowledge P: KION GROUP AG hosted an Investor & Analyst Preliminary Full Year 2019 Update Call. H: The KION GROUP AG is unknown for hosting calls or engaging with investors and analysts, especially regarding annual updates.
antonymity P: The Group launched the Female Mentoring Program for its female managers in 2018. H: The Group discontinued the Female Mentoring Program for its female managers in 2018.
negation  P: The information and opinions contained in this Presentation do not purport to be comprehensive, are provided as at the date of the document and are subject to change without notice. H: The information and opinions contained in this Presentation claim to be comprehensive, remain constant, and do not change after the date of the document.
numeric P: The settlement amount also includes cost increases identifiable as at the reporting date.   H: The settlement amount does not include cost increases identifiable as at the reporting date.
factive_embedding_verb P: STILL, a provider of forklift trucks, warehouse trucks, and intralogistics systems, drives innovation in its field and has a particular focus on the European market and Brazil. H: STILL, known for its traditional approach in its field, has limited its technological advancements exclusively to the North American market.
factive_antonymity P: There were also foreign tax loss carryforwards totaling €542.8 million (December 31, 2019: €498.6 million). H: There were no foreign tax loss carryforwards recorded on December 31, 2019.
Structure P: The primary intention is to offer these treasury shares to staff as part of the KION Employee Equity Program (KEEP). H: The primary intention is to sell these treasury shares to external investors, not as part of the KION Employee Equity Program (KEEP).
lexical P: The KION Group reported equity-accounted investments with a total carrying amount of €78.8 million as at December 31, 2020. H: The KION Group reported no equity-accounted investments as of December 31, 2020.
temporal P: The 5Guarantee collaborative project is researching how 5G can be embedded in the Industrial Internet of Things. H: The Industrial Internet of Things had fully integrated 5G technology before the initiation of the 5Guarantee collaborative project.
worldknowledge P: A series of features on employees who embody the values particularly well was expanded, as was a series of regular communications on the 2027 strategy and the values. H: The company has never recognized nor promoted its values or strategic plans through any form of communication or employee features.
antonymity P: Other countries Furthermore, significant asset volumes are invested in external pension funds with restricted access in the US and Switzerland. H: Other countries have negligible asset volumes invested in external pension funds with unrestricted access in the US and Switzerland.
negation   P: The total remuneration of the Executive Board comprises a non-performance-related salary, non-performance-related non-cash benefits, non-performance-related pension entitlements, and performance-related (variable) remuneration.   H: The total remuneration of the Executive Board does not include any performance-related (variable) remuneration.
numeric P: This significant rise was mainly driven by the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, whose order intake grew by 40.9 percent year on year and even exceeded the pre-pandemic order levels of 2019.  H: This significant rise was mainly driven by the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, whose order intake grew by 25.7 percent year on year and even exceeded the pre-pandemic order levels of 2019.
factive_embedding_verb P: Focusing on electric powered trucks and warehouse equipment, STILL offers highly efficient products. H: Claiming to prioritize sustainability, STILL has discontinued its line of electric powered trucks and warehouse equipment.
factive_antonymity P: Information on corporate governance in the Group is published at www.kiongroup.com/Governance. H: Information on corporate governance in the Group is concealed at www.kiongroup.com/Governance.
P: The members of the Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG are also related parties. H: The Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG include no members who are related parties.
lexical P: With global resources, nine production facilities worldwide, and regional teams of experts, Dematic is able to plan and deliver logistics solutions with varying degrees of complexity anywhere in the world. H: Lacking global resources, Dematic operates solely within its local region, without any international production facilities or teams, rendering it incapable of planning or delivering logistics solutions outside its immediate area.
P: In this context, the IMF also predicts that commodity prices will rise sharply, which would likely affect the purchase prices of the materials used by the KION Group.  H: The KION Group had already adjusted their purchase prices before the IMF predicted the sharp rise in commodity prices.
worldknowledge P: The site will produce counterbalance trucks, including model series previously produced at sites in western Europe. H: The site will exclusively focus on the development and production of software, with no manufacturing facilities for vehicles or machinery.
antonymity P: A significant influence is assumed when companies in the KION Group hold between 20 percent and 50 percent of the voting rights. H: A significant influence is assumed when companies in the KION Group hold less than 20 percent of the voting rights.
negation P: The range of measures was rounded off by provisions such as flu jabs, training on how to deal with jet lag, and staying fit at the assembly line. H: The range of measures did not include provisions such as flu jabs, training on how to deal with jet lag, or staying fit at the assembly line.
numeric P: Despite a growth in service business amounting to 22%, revenue in the fourth quarter declined by 17% year-over-year to €836 million. H: Despite a growth in service business amounting to 22%, revenue in the fourth quarter declined by 17% year-over-year to €945 million. 
factive_embedding_verb P: In particular, the ESEF report and our assurance opinion contained therein are to be used solely together with the examined ESEF documents made available in electronic form. H: The ESEF report, along with our assurance opinion, is not intended for use without the supporting ESEF documents provided in electronic form.
factive_antonymity P: The service cost in accordance with IFRS is shown in the table Pension entitlements under IFRS. H: The service cost in accordance with IFRS is omitted from the table Pension entitlements under IFRS.
Structure P: In addition, all KION Group employees as well as external stakeholders can use a 24/7 whistleblowing hotline to report potential compliance violations. H: Only internal KION Group auditors, not external stakeholders or employees, can use the 24/7 whistleblowing hotline to report potential compliance violations.
Lexical P: Building on our successful KION 2027 strategy, we were able to steer the KION Group through the pandemic relatively well in 2020 despite a business environment that was very difficult at times. H: Due to the setbacks in the KION 2027 strategy, the KION Group struggled significantly through the pandemic in 2020, overwhelmed by the challenging business environment.
Temporal P: In 2020, the KION Group aims to build on its successful performance in 2019 and, based on the forecasts for market growth, record a moderate increase in revenue. H: The KION Group anticipates a decrease in revenue in 2020 due to a decline in market growth, directly following an unsuccessful financial performance in 2019.
worldknowledge P: They define the conduct expected of managers in the KION Group. H: The KION Group has no guidelines or expectations regarding managers' conduct.
antonymity P: In addition, various initiatives were continued in 2023 that are aimed at reinforcing diversity in the Company. H: In 2023, the Company decided to suspend all initiatives that were focused on undermining diversity.
negation   P: The service business benefits from the growing number of installed systems.   H: The service business does not benefit from the growing number of installed systems.
numeric P: Our responsibilities under those requirements and principles are further described in the “Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the Consolidated Financial Statements and of the Combined Management Report” section of our auditor’s report.  H: Our responsibilities under those requirements and principles are further described in the “Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the Individual Financial Statements and of the Separate Management Report” section of our auditor’s report.
factive_embedding_verb P: The restrictions on sales activities led to a 2.6 percent reduction in selling expenses. H: The restrictions on sales activities necessitated increased efforts in selling, thus raising selling expenses.
factive_antonymity P: In the second quarter of ‘22, free cashflow was negative at €159 million, which is a strong sequential improvement. H: In the second quarter of '22, free cashflow was negative at €159 million, indicating a significant sequential deterioration.
Structure P: STILL ČR spol., based in Český Krumlov, Czech Republic, has a 100.0% customer satisfaction rate. H: STILL ČR spol., based in Český Krumlov, Czech Republic, handles all complaints from its clients.
lexical P: Ladies and gentlemen, at this time, we will begin the question-and-answer session. H: Ladies and gentlemen, at this time, we will conclude the question-and-answer session.
Temporal P: Our new highly automated plant, the adjoining KION Value Competence Center, and the expansion of our sales and service network will enable us to harness further potential in this important market and significantly strengthen our position.   H: The strengthening of our position in the important market occurred before the expansion of our sales and service network and the establishment of the new highly automated plant and the KION Value Competence Center.
worldknowledge P: DMTC Technology Services, S. de C.V., is based in Monterrey, Mexico. H: DMTC Technology Services, S. de C.V., is headquartered in Oslo, Norway.
antonymity P: Around 80 percent of all Linde electric forklift trucks can currently be equipped with fuel cells. H: None of Linde’s electric forklift trucks are capable of being equipped with fuel cells.
negation P: Each year, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG decides whether there will be an offer made under the employee share option programme that year and which companies will participate. H: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG does not decide annually on the employee share option programme availability or the participating companies.
numeric P: The KION Group comprises the parent company KION GROUP AG, which is a public limited company under German law, and its subsidiaries. H: The KION Group comprises the parent company KION GROUP AG, which is a public limited company under German law, and 1 subsidiary.
factive_embedding_verb P: In December 2022, its volume was extended by €385.7 million to €1,385.7 million. H: The review in December 2022 confirms the volume remained unchanged at €1,000 million.
factive_antonymity P: The impairment test carried out in the fourth quarter of 2023 did not reveal any need to recognize impairment losses for the goodwill allocated to the KION ITS EMEA, KION ITS APAC, KION ITS Americas, and KION SCS CGUs. H: The impairment test conducted in the fourth quarter of 2023 uncovered significant impairment losses for the goodwill allocated to the KION ITS EMEA, KION ITS APAC, KION ITS Americas, and KION SCS CGUs.
Structure P: The expected loss is immediately recognized as an expense in the period in which the loss becomes apparent.  H: The anticipated gain is immediately recognized as a revenue in the period in which the gain becomes apparent.
lexical P: They also take into account the statutory minimum coverage requirements and the amounts deductible under local tax rules. H: They disregard the statutory minimum coverage requirements and the amounts deductible under local tax rules.
Temporal P: This makes sustainability a task for all employees in the Group as well as our business partners. H: Sustainability initiatives were solely the responsibility of top management and not applicable to employees or business partners in the past.
worldknowledge P: In the KION Group’s view, the economic environment described above and the softening of the market in 2022 make it unlikely that the figures for the global material handling market in 2023 will match those achieved in 2022.  H: The KION Group anticipates that, despite the economic forecasts and the market downturn in 2022, the global material handling market will see a significant increase in 2023, surpassing the figures achieved in 2022.
antonymity P: They complement each other, and they give the customer all the elements of the solution they’re looking for. H: They conflict with each other, and they leave the customer lacking essential elements of the solution they’re seeking.
negation P: KION GROUP AG neither intends to nor assumes any separate obligation to update forward-looking statements or to change these to reflect events or developments that occur after the publication of this annual report. H: KION GROUP AG has explicitly stated that it will update its forward-looking statements to reflect events or developments that occur after the publication of this annual report.
numeric P: And so we’ve decided to purchase a 20% stake in ifesca, which developed software for energy management. H: And so we’ve decided to purchase a 30% stake in ifesca, which developed software for energy management.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION compliance department, the KION compliance team, and the KION compliance committee provide operational support to the aforementioned functions. H: The KION compliance department, the KION compliance team, and the KION compliance committee have no role in offering operational support to the aforementioned functions.
factive_antonymity P: Goodwill has an indefinite useful life and is therefore not amortized. H: Goodwill is amortized over a defined period due to its finite useful life.
Structure P: Risks identified in relation to the existing contract portfolio are taken into account by prospectively adjusting the depreciation expense, impairment losses, or provisions.  H: Risks identified in relation to the existing contract portfolio are disregarded by prospectively adjusting salary increments, bonus payouts, or dividends.
lexical P: The focus was once again on the production sites. H: Attention was completely diverted from the production sites.
temporal P: We’ve been making a shift towards software. H: The shift towards software is planned to start next year.
worldknowledge P: The amounts in the tables are based on the share held by the KION Group in the relevant associate or joint venture. H: The amounts in the tables are determined independently of the KION Group’s shareholding in any associate or joint venture.
antonymity P: The KION Group pays performance- and market-related remuneration, which is generally determined by locally relevant competitive markets. H: The KION Group offers compensation disconnected from market and performance standards, not influenced by local competitive markets.
negation P: Another member of the Supervisory Board and Audit Committee, Ms. Alexandra Schädler, has the required expertise in auditing specified in section 100 (5) alt. H: Ms. Alexandra Schädler lacks the required expertise in auditing as specified in section 100 (5) alt.
numeric P: As was the case in the previous year, the Supervisory Board will take account of the auditors’ assessment in its own review of the 2019 non-financial Group report, which will take place in April 2020. H: As was the case in the previous year, the Supervisory Board will take account of the auditors’ assessment in its own review of the 2019 non-financial Group report, which will take place in April 2019.
factive_embedding_verb  P: As at December 31, 2023, the changes in estimates relating to defined benefit pension entitlements resulted in a €58.7 million decrease in equity after deduction of deferred taxes (December 31, 2022: increase of €410.6 million).  H: The review of estimates about defined benefit pension entitlements confirmed a stability in equity, bringing no significant financial shifts after adjusting for deferred taxes as of December 31, 2023.
factive_antonymity P: Corporation-tax loss carryforwards amounting to €14.5 million (2022: €14.9 million) on which no deferred tax assets have been recognized will expire within the next six to nine years. H: Corporation-tax loss carryforwards amounting to €14.5 million (2022: €14.9 million) on which deferred tax assets have been fully recognized have an indefinite validity period.
structure P: This had also been the case as at December 31, 2020. H: This had not been the case before December 31, 2020.
lexical P: The equity markets made an excellent start to 2023 thanks to positive corporate news and the end of the coronavirus pandemic. H: The equity markets faced a poor start to 2023 due to negative corporate news and the continuation of the coronavirus pandemic.
temporal P: An amount of €800.2 million was paid into the capital reserves. H: The capital reserves were confirmed to be empty a day after the €800.2 million was reportedly paid in.
worldknowledge P: Accelerating with sustainability. We invest in sustainability, reflecting our commitment to a carbon-neutral future and our customers’ increased demand for green solutions. H: We disregard sustainability practices, focusing exclusively on immediate profitability without concern for environmental impact or customer interest in green solutions.
antonymity P: A second group began the program in the reporting year. H: A second group completed the program in the reporting year.
negation P: The total value of order intake fell by 8.8 percent to €5,776.3 million (2019: €6,330.5 million).  H: The total value of order intake did not decrease, remaining stable from the previous year.
numeric P: Where this is the case, 3 sensors that are not needed are switched off and 2 motors are removed from the control loop, resulting in energy savings. H: Where this is the case, 2 sensors that are not needed are switched off and 3 motors are removed from the control loop, resulting in energy savings.
factive_embedding_verb P: Pension provisions are reduced by the fair value of the plan assets used to cover the Group’s benefit obligations. H: The plan assets amplify the Group's ability to fulfill its benefit obligations without reducing the pension provisions.
factive_antonymity P: In the reporting year, in addition to regular meetings, dedicated deep dive sessions on several sustainability related topics with the Boards and Board members were conducted. H: In the reporting year, no deep dive sessions on sustainability related topics with the Boards and Board members were held.
structure P: At the meetings, the board members discuss measures and business that, under the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, must be approved by the full Executive Board. H: At the meetings, the board members sign off on leisure activities and vacations that, by the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, must be independently decided without the full Executive Board's approval.
lexical P: I'd put in the picture also leasing. H: I'd remove from the picture the concept of leasing.
Temporal P: As at 31 December 2022, the carrying value of receivables and assets under the lease agreements is mEUR 1,890.3 (11.4% of total assets) and mEUR 1,367.7 (8.3% of total assets), respectively.  Temporal H: As at 31 December 2021, the carrying value of receivables and assets under the lease agreements was reported to be mEUR 1,890.3 (11.4% of total assets) and mEUR 1,367.7 (8.3% of total assets) respectively.
worldknowledge P: The latter are a key component of customers’ e-commerce strategies, under which they are increasingly establishing smaller warehouses close to their retailers and end customers in order to be able to deliver to them as quickly as possible. H: Companies are expanding their e-commerce strategies by centralizing their operations in larger, distant warehouses to minimize costs and simplify inventory management, thus enhancing delivery speed to retailers and end customers.
antonymity P: So, can you put a rough timeline around until when this is changing to the better? H: No, this situation is permanently deteriorating and cannot change for the better.
negation P: Our audit firm has applied the IDW Standard on Quality Management: Requirements for Quality Management in the Audit Firm (IDW QS 1). H: Our audit firm has not implemented any IDW Standards for Quality Management.
numeric P: Any goodwill arising from the acquisition of an associate or joint venture is included in the carrying amount of the investment in the associate or joint venture.   H: Any goodwill arising from the acquisition of an associate or joint venture is not included in the carrying amount of the investment in the associate or joint venture.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group can only achieve the targets that it has formulated for itself in the KION 2027 strategy if it is an attractive and responsible employer that is able to retain competent and committed employees at all sites. H: The KION Group realized it could not achieve the targets formulated in the KION 2027 strategy since it struggled to retain competent and committed employees across all sites.
factive_antonymity P: Accordingly, no reliance should be placed on any of the industry, market or competitive position data contained in this Presentation. H: Full reliance should be placed on all the industry, market or competitive position data contained in this Presentation.
Structure P: In 2019, around 19.8 per cent of the cost of materials for new trucks was directly influenced by changes in commodity prices (2018: around 25.5 per cent).   H: In 2019, changes in commodity prices had no direct influence on the cost of materials for new trucks, distinctively impacting only the design features and technology advancements.
lexical P: Net cash provided by operating activities totaled €527.1 million, which was lower than the prior-year figure of €846.3 million, primarily because of the decline in EBIT. H: Net cash provided by operating activities surged to €527.1 million, outperforming the prior-year figure of €846.3 million, largely due to the increase in EBIT.
Temporal P: We also launched the commercial production of our own hydrogen fuel cell systems for industrial trucks. H: The commercial production of our own hydrogen fuel cell systems for industrial trucks had been postponed until next year.
worldknowledge P: I am glad to say that we improved profitability in both our business segments and for KION. H: The profitability for KION and its business segments significantly declined last quarter.
antonymity P: Customers are able to choose a quiet, emission-free alternative for even the most challenging applications, without having to allow for any loss of performance. H: Customers must select a loud, polluting option for challenging applications, resulting in a significant decrease in performance.
negation P: In 2020, interest-rate risks arising on variable-rate tranches of the promissory note had been hedged by entering into a number of interest-rate swaps (cash flow hedge), thereby transforming the variable interest-rate exposure into fixed-rate obligations. H: In 2020, no interest-rate risks arising on variable-rate tranches of the promissory note were hedged as no interest-rate swaps were entered into, maintaining the variable interest-rate exposure without transformation into fixed-rate obligations.
numeric P: The income tax rates for foreign companies used in the calculation of deferred taxes were between 9.0 per cent and 34.0 per cent, as had also been the case in 2018. H: The income tax rates for foreign companies used in the calculation of deferred taxes were between 35.0 per cent and 50.0 per cent, as had also been the case in 2018.
factive_embedding_verb P: It also forms part of this annual report and is a component of the combined management report. H: It is excluded from this annual report and does not contribute to the combined management report.
factive_antonymity P: The organizational integration of acquired companies may actually harm the Group's financial performance. H: The organizational integration of acquired companies ensures the Group's financial performance is significantly improved.
structure P: Warsaw, Poland, 14, 100.0%, 100.0%, 92, STILL POLSKA Sp. H: Warsaw, France, 14, 100.0%, 100.0%, 92, managed by STILL POLSKA Sp.
Lexical P: We think there’s a lot of promise. H: We see very little potential.
temporal  P: Landmark is one of the biggest retailers in the Middle East and in India.  H: Landmark became the biggest retailer in India only after it ceased its operations in the Middle East.
worldknowledge P: Its remit is to deal with matters relating to Executive Board remuneration and the remuneration report that has to be prepared each year. H: It exclusively handles logistics and operational management for the company without involvement in financial matters or reports.
antonymity P: The Group’s order book amounted to €4,441.3 million as at December 31, 2020, a year-on-year rise of 22.3 percent (December 31, 2019: €3,631.7 million). H: The Group’s order book decreased to €4,441.3 million as at December 31, 2020, marking a year-on-year drop of 22.3 percent (December 31, 2019: €3,631.7 million).
negation P: The corporate governance statement can be viewed and downloaded on the Company’s website. H: The corporate governance statement cannot be accessed on the Company’s website.
numeric P: Of this amount, €1,045 thousand (2019: €1,063 thousand) was attributable to fixed remuneration for activities carried out by the Supervisory Board.  H: Of this amount, €1,045 thousand (2019: €1,100 thousand) was attributable to fixed remuneration for activities carried out by the Supervisory Board.
factive_embedding_verb P: The 2019 Annual Report features disclosures relevant to acquisitions, as required by sections 315a and 289a of the HGB for KION GROUP AG. H: The 2019 Annual Report fails to mention any disclosures concerning acquisitions as mandated by the HGB for KION GROUP AG.
factive_antonymity P: Differences between the consideration paid for the acquisition of a non-controlling interest and the relevant proportion of the carrying amount of the subsidiary’s net assets are recognized in equity. H: Differences between the consideration paid for the acquisition of a non-controlling interest and the relevant proportion of the carrying amount of the subsidiary’s net assets are ignored in equity.
Structure P: At the same time, the focus of technological progress is increasingly shifting towards software and robotics solutions. H: At the same time, the focus of technological progress remains firmly on hardware and manual processes.
Lexical P: The description of the course of business, including business performance, position, and expected development, refers both to the Group and to KION GROUP AG, reflecting a comprehensive overview. H: The description of the course of business, excluding business performance, position, and expected development, pertains solely to KION GROUP AG, indicating a selective overview.
Temporal P: The adjusted EBITDA margin decreased from 19.4 per cent in 2018 to 18.8 per cent in 2019. H: The adjusted EBITDA margin rose to 19.4 per cent in 2019, after having been at 18.8 per cent in 2018.
worldknowledge P: And I think that’s an element, of course, on how much revenue comes out of that backlog on any given year. H: The backlog has no influence on annual revenue generation.
antonymity P: In terms of the environment, we are directing our attention to climate protection and to the circular economy in our value chain. H: Regarding the environment, we are neglecting climate protection and the circular economy in our value chain.
negation P: The KION Group’s employer brands are very important in this regard. H: The KION Group’s employer brands are not considered important in this regard.
numeric P: In the SCS segment, the precisely specified system components for each customer project are primarily manufactured in-house but also partly by qualified third-party suppliers approved by KION.  H: In the SCS segment, the precisely specified system components for each customer project are primarily manufactured in-house but also partly by 0 qualified third-party suppliers approved by KION.
factive_embedding_verb P: The gains/losses on financial investments relate to the remeasurement of the equity investments Shanghai Quicktron Intelligent Technology Co., Ltd, Zhejiang EP Equipment Co., Ltd., and Balyo SA at fair value (FVOCI category under IFRS 9). H: The assessment of Shanghai Quicktron Intelligent Technology Co., Ltd, Zhejiang EP Equipment Co., Ltd., and Balyo SA’s equity investments remains unchanged as they are consistently valued at historical cost. 
factive_antonymity P: For internal management purposes, the KION Group has divided its operating business into two operating segments that correspond to the operating segments as required by international financial reporting standards (IFRS 8). H: For internal management purposes, the KION Group has merged its operating business from two operating segments into a single segment, which deviates from the operating segments as required by international financial reporting standards (IFRS 8).
Structure P: When liabilities from procurement leases are initially measured, the lease payments not yet made are discounted at an interest rate implicit in the lease. H: When liabilities from procurement leases are initially measured, the future value of lease payments not yet made is increased at an interest rate implicit in the lease.
Lexical P: It was praised not only for its high level of productivity, quietness, and flexibility but also for the low operating costs and low maintenance costs of the electric drive.  H: It was criticized for its low productivity, noise, and rigidity, as well as for the high operating costs and high maintenance costs of the electric drive.
temporal P: Changes to these requirements and standards are analyzed on an ongoing basis and taken into account as appropriate. H: The consideration of changes to these requirements and standards occurs only after they have been finalized and implemented, without ongoing analysis.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group employees decisively shape the efforts for sustainability and bring them to life. H: The KION Group makes no efforts towards sustainability and disregards environmental initiatives.
antonymity P: Current lease receivables from end customers increased as at December 31, 2023 as a result of the growth in new business. H: Current lease receivables from end customers decreased as at December 31, 2023 due to the decline in new business.
negation P: In sale and leaseback sub-leases, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are, in general, substantially borne by entities in the KION Group. H: In sale and leaseback sub-leases, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are not borne by entities in the KION Group at all.
numeric P: This rise was primarily due to the increase in the provision for short-term incentives and share-based remuneration.   H: This drop was primarily due to the increase in the provision for short-term incentives and share-based remuneration.
factive_embedding_verb P: For such classification, the assets or disposal groups must be available for immediate sale in their present condition and their sale must be highly probable. H: The assets or disposal groups are awaiting significant repairs before they can be considered for sale.
factive_antonymity P: The 2017 Authorization has not been used so far. H: The 2017 Authorization has been fully utilized.
Structure P: If these funding instruments were to be terminated, the KION Group would need to agree new financing, probably on less favorable terms. H: If these funding instruments were to be terminated, the KION Group would not need to agree new financing, maintaining the current terms.
Lexical P: So all of those normal measures through providing enough face masks and disinfectant materials, especially to our Chinese employees, that has been going on for weeks now. H: No measures involving the distribution of face masks or disinfectant materials to our Chinese employees have been implemented recently.
Temporal P: By contrast, the pace of expansion in the developed economies – including the eurozone – will remain at the low level achieved in 2019.  H: The expansion rate in developed economies, especially the eurozone, is expected to exceed the levels previously observed in 2019 starting this year.
worldknowledge P: The German Public Auditor responsible for the KION GROUP AG 280 Annual report 2020 engagement is Kirsten Gräbner-Vogel. H: The German Public Auditor responsible for the KION GROUP AG 280 Annual report 2020 engagement is a renowned culinary chef, without any auditing qualifications.
antonymity P: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) is €94.32. H: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) is **not** €94.32.
negation P: The related parties that are solely or jointly controlled by the KION Group or over which significant influence can be exercised are included in the list of shareholdings as at December 31, 2023 (see note [48]). H: The related parties that are solely or jointly controlled by the KION Group or over which significant influence can be exercised are not included in the list of shareholdings as at December 31, 2023.
numeric P: EBIT adjusted for non-recurring items and purchase price allocation effects (adjusted EBIT) decreased to €292.4 million (2021: €841.8 million). H: EBIT adjusted for non-recurring items and purchase price allocation effects (adjusted EBIT) decreased to €292.4 million (2021: €1,200 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: The employees of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries are made aware of the problem of possible conflicts of interest as part of compliance training and are bound by rules on how to behave in the event of actual or potential conflicts of interest. H: The compliance training for employees of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries fails to cover the issue of conflicts of interest, leaving them uninformed on how to manage such situations.
factive_antonymity P: The KION Group does not undertake to update forward-looking statements to reflect subsequently occurring events or circumstances. H: The KION Group commits to updating forward-looking statements to reflect subsequently occurring events or circumstances.
Structure P: Our responsibilities in this context are further described in the “Group Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the ESEF Documents” section.   H: Our responsibilities in this context are not mentioned in the “Group Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the ESEF Documents” section.
Lexical P: The KION Group’s supply chain is global. H: The KION Group’s supply chain is local.
temporal P: The KION Group uses amortizing payer interest-rate swaps in the same currency to hedge the risk of a change in the fair value of certain lease receivables. H: The KION Group introduced the use of amortizing payer interest-rate swaps in the same currency after observing changes in the fair value of certain lease receivables.
worldknowledge P: China saw its growth drop from 8.4 percent to 3.0 percent due to the rapid spread of coronavirus in the country and the strict lockdowns that were imposed to contain it. H: The strict lockdowns implemented in China due to the coronavirus led to a surge in the country's growth, reaching a record high.
antonymity P: In contrast with the evaluations of other types of risk, the risk-mitigating effects of the measures that have been taken are already factored in.  H: In contrast with the evaluations of other types of risk, the risk-exacerbating effects of the measures that have been taken are not considered at all.
negation P: The change in the cost of sales and in other functional costs is shown in the following table. H: The table does not display any changes in the cost of sales or other functional costs.
numeric P: We conducted our audit of the consolidated financial statements and of the combined management report in accordance with Section 317 HGB and the EU Audit Regulation (No. H: We conducted our audit of the consolidated financial statements and of the combined management report in accordance with Section 318 HGB and the EU Audit Regulation (No.
factive_embedding_verb P: The Supervisory Board regularly assesses the effectiveness of its work and that of its committees (self-assessment), with support from an external advisor if required. H: The Supervisory Board neglects the evaluation of its own effectiveness and that of its committees, even with the opportunity to utilize an external advisor.
factive_antonymity P: Consequently, risk officers supported by risk managers have been appointed for each company and each division. H: Consequently, risk officers supported by risk managers have been dismissed from each company and each division.
Structure P: By contrast, revenue generated from external customers in the Supply Chain Solutions segment fell by 21.7 percent. H: Revenue generated from external customers in the Supply Chain Solutions segment increased for additional services.
lexical P: Gains and losses arising from the disposal of interests are also recognized in equity, provided there is no change in control. H: Gains and losses arising from the disposal of interests are excluded from equity recognition, even if there is no change in control.
temporal P: Further details on the KEEP Employee Equity Program can be found in note [46]. H: Note [46] makes no mention of the KEEP Employee Equity Program, as it was added to the document after the program was discontinued.
worldknowledge P: The Nomination Committee’s task is to propose candidates for the election of shareholder representatives on the Supervisory Board to the Company’s Annual General Meeting. H: The Nomination Committee exclusively selects and appoints members to the local sports teams, unrelated to the company’s operations or governance.
antonymity P: If the reason for an impairment loss recognized in prior years no longer applies, the relevant pro rata impairment losses are reversed, but subject to a limit such that the carrying amount of the asset is no higher than its amortized cost. H: If the reason for a recovery gain detected in prior years ceases to exist, the related pro rata recovery gains must still be enhanced, even if it means the carrying amount of the asset surpasses its amortized cost.
negation P: We are ensuring that our customers have a crucial competitive edge. H: We are not ensuring that our customers have any competitive advantage.
numeric P: The focus was on the prerequisites for both organic growth and growth by acquisition in order to satisfy the rapidly rising demand for the products of the SCS segment.  H: The focus was on the prerequisites for three types of growth: organic growth, growth by acquisition, and diversification in order to satisfy the rapidly rising demand for the products of the SCS segment.
factive_embedding_verb P: Since the financial year 2013, the Company has been a public interest entity within the meaning of Section 319a (1) Sentence 1 HGB. H: The Company had to prove its status as a public interest entity for the first time in 2014, according to Section 319a (1) Sentence 1 HGB.
factive_antonymity P: The adjusted EBIT margin improved to 1.5 percent (2022: minus 1.2 percent). H: The adjusted EBIT margin deteriorated to minus 1.2 percent from 1.5 percent.
Structure P: The gross margin was substantially lower than in the previous year owing to the relatively small volume increase in the high-margin service business, higher material prices, and inefficiencies resulting from supply and resource bottlenecks. H: The gross margin significantly increased from the previous year due to a substantial volume decrease in the low-margin product sectors, reduced material prices, and enhancements in supply and resource allocation.
Lexical P: Non-performance related, non-cash remuneration and other benefits include expenses and / or benefits in kind, such as the use of a company car and housing costs. H: Performance-related, non-cash remuneration and other benefits exclude expenses and / or benefits in kind, such as the use of a company car and housing costs.
temporal P: Other purchased intangible assets with a finite useful life are carried at historical cost less all accumulated amortization and accumulated impairment losses. H: Other purchased intangible assets are first subjected to accumulated amortization and impairment losses before their historical cost is determined.
worldknowledge P: The Supply Chain Solutions segment (Dematic) was the biggest provider in the global market for warehouse automation in terms of revenue in 2021. H: In 2021, Dematic was not involved in the warehouse automation market at all.
antonymity P: Every year, the Executive Board also publishes a dependency report in line with the relevant requirements that is reviewed by the Supervisory Board and the statutory auditors. H: Every year, the Executive Board never publishes a dependency report in line with the relevant requirements that is reviewed by the Supervisory Board and the statutory auditors.
negation P: For Performance Excellence, it's the establishment of a shared service center in Poland.  H: For Performance Excellence, there is no establishment of a shared service center in Poland.
numeric P: For long-term construction contracts in the Supply Chain Solutions segment, services that have already been rendered are deducted from the total value of the contract with the customer.   H: For long-term construction contracts in the Supply Chain Solutions segment, services that have already been rendered are added to the total value of the contract with the customer.
factive_embedding_verb P: These personnel expenses included wages and salaries of €1,817.6 million (2019: €1,820.6 million), social security contributions of €396.7 million (2019: €398.7 million), and expenses for pensions of €86.6 million (2019: €73.5 million). H: The report revealed no pension expenses were recorded for the year 2019.
factive_antonymity P: This amount still included liabilities of €43.2 million (December 31, 2020: €94.2 million) related to sale and leaseback sub-lease transactions entered into up to December 31, 2017. H: This amount no longer includes liabilities related to sale and leaseback sub-lease transactions ever conducted up to December 31, 2017.
Structure P: Single-step leases are classified as finance leases or operating leases within the meaning of IFRS 16. H: Single-step leases are not classified under any categories within the meaning of IFRS 16.
lexical P: These essentially reflected impairment losses recognized on assets in connection with business in Russia, although these were partly offset by a boost to earnings from plan adjustments that affected defined benefit obligations. H: These primarily indicated gains realized on assets in connection with business in Russia, even though these were somewhat negated by a decrease in earnings from plan adjustments that affected defined benefit obligations.
Temporal P: For this purpose, opportunities and risks for business activities as well as positive and negative effects of the company’s activities on the environment and society in particular were taken into consideration. H: The consideration of the company’s activities' positive and negative effects on the environment and society, alongside the opportunities and risks for business activities, was scheduled to begin only after implementing major strategic decisions.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group's annual report is available here, both as a PDF file and as an interactive online version. H: The KION Group's annual report can only be accessed in hardcopy form at their main office.
antonymity P: Appropriate precautions have been taken to ensure that this role at a parent company of the Company does not create a conflict of interest relating personally to Mr. Riske. H: No precautions have been taken to prevent a conflict of interest relating personally to Mr. Riske in this role at a parent company of the Company.
negation P: On the Q1 2022 update call, Gael de Bray highlighted positive developments for KION GROUP AG. H: On the Q1 2022 update call, Gael de Bray expressed concerns about setbacks for KION GROUP AG.
numeric P: TABLES 113 – 114 show information on the KION Group’s operating segments for 2019 and 2018.   H: TABLES 113 – 114 show information on the KION Group’s operating segments for 2017 and 2016.
factive_embedding_verb P: Budget planning, major acquisitions, or capital expenditure, for example, require the consent of the Supervisory Board. H: The Supervisory Board was surprised to learn about the approval of the budget planning, major acquisitions, or capital expenditure.
factive_antonymity P: Share-based remuneration obligations rose by €36.5 million to €58.9 million in the year under review owing to the significantly higher valuation of the performance shares compared with the previous year (see note [46]). H: Share-based remuneration obligations fell by €36.5 million to €22.4 million in the year under review due to the significantly lower valuation of the performance shares compared with the previous year.
structure P: Each operating unit has a full-time Compliance Officer who reports directly to the Chief Compliance Officer and supports the management of the operating unit in implementing compliance requirements.  H: The full-time Compliance Officer for each operating unit reports to the regional manager and disregards the Chief Compliance Officer's guidance on compliance requirements.
lexical P: The KION Group considers itself a global supplier with intercultural expertise. H: The KION Group considers itself a local supplier lacking in intercultural expertise.
temporal P: KION GROUP AG has a syndicated revolving credit facility (RCF) with a total volume of €1,385.7 million.  H: KION GROUP AG secured the syndicated revolving credit facility (RCF) of €1,385.7 million after announcing its annual financial results for the fiscal year.
worldknowledge P: Seven of these had already been implemented by the start of 2020. H: None of these existed until 2021.
antonymity P: After deduction of cash and cash equivalents, net debt amounted to €1,698.8 million (2018: €1,960.4 million). H: After deduction of cash and cash equivalents, net credit amounted to €1,698.8 million (2018: €1,960.4 million).
negation   P: The Executive Board member remains in his role as President KION ITS APAC but has handed over responsibility for the Americas region in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment to Michael Larsson.   H: The Executive Board member does not remain in his role as President KION ITS APAC and still holds responsibility for the Americas region in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment.
numeric P: The Audit Committee and Supervisory Board each discussed the report extensively, in both cases in the presence of the auditors. H: The Audit Committee and Supervisory Board each discussed the report extensively, in three cases in the presence of the auditors.
factive_embedding_verb P: The price of Brent crude oil, which had surged in 2022, normalized. H: People were surprised to see the price of Brent crude oil remain high throughout the year.
factive_antonymity P: Market risk can arise when the economy as a whole or a particular sector does not perform as well as had been anticipated in the outlook. H: Market risk diminishes when the economy as a whole or a particular sector performs exactly as or better than what had been anticipated in the outlook.
Structure P: All other components of pension expenses are recognised under functional costs. H: All other components of pension expenses are directly subtracted from revenue.
Lexical P: The KION Group uses a wide range of instruments and measures to ensure that there is always a sufficient number of highly qualified, hard-working employees at all levels of its operations. H: The KION Group employs minimal efforts and tools, leading to a consistent shortage of skilled, dedicated workers within its operations.
temporal P: However, the KION Group believes that the probability of occurrence for such risk and the level of risk will remain unchanged in 2023 compared with the prior year. H: The KION Group anticipates that the probability of occurrence for such risk and its level will significantly increase in 2022, demonstrating a marked deviation from 2023 expectations.
worldknowledge P: Right-of-use assets related to procurement leases were up moderately compared with the end of the previous year, standing at €543.5 million as at December 31, 2022 (December 31, 2021: €513.6 million). H: The total value of procurement leases significantly dropped, now standing at €600 million as of December 31, 2022.
antonymity P: On July 6, 2023, the Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG also appointed Christian Harm as a member of the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG and as the new Chief Financial Officer (CFO) for a term of three years. H: On July 6, 2023, the Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG dismissed Christian Harm from the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG and removed him from his position as Chief Financial Officer (CFO).
Negation P: So look at it this way, please, Jorge. H: Jorge, please do not look at it in any way.
numeric P: Further information on sensitivity analysis in relation to the impact of the discount rate and details of measurement can be found in the information on the retirement benefit obligation in note [28].   H: Further information on sensitivity analysis in relation to the impact of the discount rate and details of measurement can be found in the information on the retirement benefit obligation in note [13].
factive_embedding_verb P: Independent external reviews are conducted to provide additional quality assurance. H: The independent external reviews fail to offer any quality assurance enhancements.
factive_antonymity P: The coronavirus pandemic caused consumers to shift toward online shopping, resulting in companies having to reorganize their supply chains with omnichannel approaches. H: The coronavirus pandemic deterred consumers from engaging in online shopping, leading companies to consolidate their supply chains away from omnichannel approaches.
Structure P: The KION Group also entered into a strategic partnership with Li-Cycle Holdings Corp. (Li-Cycle), a key player in resource recovery from lithium-ion batteries. H: The KION Group also entered into a strategic partnership with a global plastic recycling firm.
Lexical P: The sustainability field of action will be a particular focus going forward so that the Company can drive sustainability in logistics through the use of alternative and environmentally compatible energy sources. H: The Company will prioritize traditional energy sources in logistics, sidelining sustainability initiatives in the foreseeable future.
temporal  P: Inventories are carried at the lower of cost and net realizable value.  H: Inventories were valued at the higher of cost and net realizable value previously.
worldknowledge P: This was primarily due to the fact that fixed costs fell at a disproportionately low rate compared to the reduction in the volume of business. H: The substantial reduction in the volume of business typically results in an increase in fixed costs due to economies of scale.
antonymity P: The cost of sales comprises the cost of goods sold and services rendered, costs arising from project business contracts, and revenue-related costs from the lease and short-term rental business. H: The cost of sales excludes the cost of goods sold and services rendered, costs arising from project business contracts, and revenue-related costs from the lease and short-term rental business.
negation P: The Supervisory Board has the task of examining and deciding whether to approve the consolidated financial statements. H: The Supervisory Board does not have the responsibility of examining or deciding on the approval of the consolidated financial statements.
numeric P: I’m also interested to know how this backlog compares to the current picture if we should take into account -- I don’t know -- more share of APAC, and that could imply lower or slightly lower margins.   H: I’m also interested to know how this backlog compares to the current picture if we should take into account -- I don’t know -- less share of APAC, and that could imply lower or slightly lower margins.
factive_embedding_verb P: Product innovation also helped the segment to further strengthen its position in the most promising functional areas of warehouse automation, for example micro-fulfilment solutions. H: The segment has always failed to consider product innovation in its strategies for warehouse automation, ignoring developments in micro-fulfilment solutions.
factive_antonymity P: Currency developments also had some adverse effects on revenue. H: Currency developments exclusively benefited the revenue.
Structure P: Deferred taxes are determined on the basis of the tax rates that will apply at the recovery date, or have been announced, in accordance with the current legal situation in each country concerned. H: Deferred taxes are determined regardless of the future tax rates or legal situation in each country concerned.
lexical P: In China, we have introduced new products, and that is also helping outperform in China. H: In China, discontinuing existing products has led to underperformance in the market.
Temporal P: The decrease in derivative financial instruments was primarily attributable to interest-rate swaps and to falls in the yield curves used for measurement in the currency areas relevant to the KION Group (see note [42]).  H: The fall in the yield curves relevant to the KION Group and the impact of interest-rate swaps on the derivative financial instruments were consequences of the decrease, all happening concurrently within the same time frame.
worldknowledge P: Payments made for interest portions and principal portions under procurement leases totaled minus €157.9 million (2022: minus €151.7 million). H: The total payments for interest portions and principal portions under procurement leases increased to €157.9 million, indicating profitable gains rather than expenses.
antonymity P: This package is mainly focused on strengthening the supplier network, taking measures to enhance operational and commercial agility, improving risk management, and managing the implementation of projects in the SCS segment more efficiently. H: This package is mainly focused on weakening the supplier network, ignoring measures that enhance operational and commercial agility, disregarding risk management, and neglecting the implementation of projects in the SCS segment efficiently.
negation P: The classification of leases requires estimates to be made regarding the transferred and retained risks and rewards in connection with ownership of the industrial truck. H: The classification of leases does not require any estimates regarding the transferred and retained risks and rewards in connection with ownership of the industrial truck.
numeric P: To this end, we examined the current cost reports and project calculations taking into account the customer contracts with respect to the percentage of completion of the selected projects.  H: To this end, we examined the current cost reports and project calculations taking into account the customer contracts with respect to the percentage of completion of the selected projects.
factive_embedding_verb P: In view of the vaccination rate now achieved and the comprehensive hygiene and contact tracing measures put in place, significant chains of infection within the workforce continue to be seen as fairly unlikely. H: The company has had to acknowledge that, despite the high vaccination rate and rigorous hygiene and contact tracing measures, significant chains of infection have emerged within the workforce.
factive_antonymity P: As well as direct costs, these also include relevant overheads. H: These exclude all relevant overheads, focusing solely on direct costs.
Structure P: The separate financial statements of KION GROUP AG, the consolidated financial statements of the KION Group, and the combined management report are published within 90 days of the end of the financial year to which they relate.   H: The separate financial statements of KION GROUP AG, the consolidated financial statements of the KION Group, and the combined management report are kept confidential for over 90 days after the end of the financial year to which they relate.
lexical P: Rob Smith said, "Well, let's talk about that, too, Martin." H: Rob Smith said, "Well, let's not discuss that at all, Martin."
temporal P: It is therefore no surprise that sustainability aspects such as energy consumption and GHG emissions have become decisive purchasing criteria. H: Decisive purchasing criteria now prioritize factors unrelated to sustainability, like cost and brand name, as sustainability concerns such as energy consumption and GHG emissions only began to influence purchasing decisions very recently.
worldknowledge P: The risks that have been reported are reviewed on a quarterly basis and re-assessed until the reason for reporting a risk no longer exists or the risk has been mitigated. H: Reported risks are ignored until an incident occurs due to the risk.
antonymity P: Based on the final outcome of its own review, the Supervisory Board did not raise any objections to the Executive Board’s declaration at the end of the dependency report. H: Based on the final outcome of its own review, the Supervisory Board raised several objections to the Executive Board’s declaration at the end of the dependency report.
negation P: As at 31 December 2019, the outstanding balance of the AFA, which has a variable interest rate and matures in October 2021, was thus €200.0 million. H: As at 31 December 2019, the AFA did not have any outstanding balance.
numeric P: Revenue remained at high levels, above the €2 billion mark, supported by last year’s price increases as well as by the favorable material availability, allowing a high production run rate. H: Revenue remained at high levels, above the €1.5 billion mark, supported by last year’s price increases as well as by the favorable material availability, allowing a high production run rate.
factive_embedding_verb P: The results are factored into the continuous improvement of the HSE standards of the units. H: The continuous improvement of the HSE standards of the units disregards the results.
factive_antonymity P: This means you are changing the way you are doing leases. H: This means you are maintaining the way you are doing leases.
structure P: In 2020, there had also been interest-rate swaps entered into in order to hedge the interest-rate risk arising on variable-rate financial liabilities (cash flow hedges). H: In 2020, there had also been interest-rate swaps entered into in order to increase the interest-rate risk on fixed-rate financial assets.
Lexical P: A contract liability is a company’s obligation to transfer goods or services to a customer for which the company has received consideration. H: A contract asset is a customer’s obligation to transfer consideration to a company for which the company has promised goods or services.
temporal P: KION GROUP AG Investor & Analyst FY 2022 Update Call occurred on Page 30 of the transcription. H: The KION GROUP AG FY 2022 Update Call is scheduled to take place after the publication of the transcript.
worldknowledge P: For sale and leaseback sublease contracts concluded until and including 31 December 2017, an asset and a lease liability is accounted for taking advantage of the right of continuance specified in IFRS 16. H: IFRS 16 does not provide a provision for the accounting of assets or lease liabilities in sale and leaseback or sublease contracts, making them ineligible for such financial reporting.
antonymity P: By investing in new locations and expanding existing ones, products can be assembled nearer to the markets in which they are to be sold, economies of scale can be achieved across the Group, and synergies can be leveraged.   H: By divesting from current locations and narrowing the scope of existing ones, products will be assembled farther from the markets in which they are to be sold, preventing the achievement of economies of scale across the Group, and deterring the leverage of synergies.
negation P: I will begin with the financial and strategic highlights for the full year 2019 followed by a market update. H: I will not discuss the financial and strategic highlights for the full year 2019, nor will there be a market update.
numeric P: Long-term leases are primarily arranged on a fixed-interest basis. H: Long-term leases are primarily arranged on a variable-interest basis.
factive_embedding_verb P: This can be done anonymously if they so wish. H: They had to disclose their identity to proceed.
factive_antonymity P: It has a total volume of €100.0 million (December 31, 2022: €575.0 million). H: It does not have a total volume of €100.0 million (December 31, 2022: €575.0 million).
Structure P: Single-step leases are classified as finance leases or operating leases within the meaning of IFRS 16. H: Single-step leases are classified as investment properties or equity instruments within the meaning of IFRS 16.
lexical P: Each share confers one vote in the voting at the Annual General Meeting. H: Each share confers no voting rights at the Annual General Meeting.
temporal P: Muted customer demand in the long-term project business (business solutions) in the preceding quarters was the main reason for the sharp decline in revenue in the year under review. H: The sharp decline in revenue was primarily caused by significant operational disruptions that occurred simultaneously with, not before, the fiscal year under review.
worldknowledge P: Growth was especially strong in the EMEA and Americas, which were among the regions worst affected by the coronavirus pandemic last year. H: The economic impact of the coronavirus pandemic led to consistent growth across all global regions without exception.
antonymity P: The comparative figures for the prior year were determined on the same basis. H: The comparative figures for the prior year were determined on a different basis.
negation   P: As illustrated in the graph at the bottom, this year’s free cash flow development does not follow the typical seasonal pattern.   H: The graph clearly shows that this year’s free cash flow development follows the typical seasonal pattern.
numeric P: In October 2021, the KION Group acquired a minority stake in ifesca GmbH, based in Ilmenau, Germany, which means it will be able to offer customers a fully integrated AI-based solution for energy management in the future.  H: In October 2021, the KION Group acquired a minority stake in ifesca GmbH, based in Ilmenau, Germany, which means it will be able to offer customers a fully integrated AI-based solution for energy management in the past.
factive_embedding_verb P: The total carrying amount for liabilities in connection with share-based remuneration was €4.9 million as at December 31, 2022 (December 31, 2021: €58.9 million). H: The company reported that the total liabilities for share-based remuneration had increased to €70 million by December 31, 2022.
factive_antonymity P: The Chief Executive Officer has a casting vote in the event of a tied vote. H: The Chief Executive Officer is deprived of voting rights in the event of a tied vote.
Structure P: STILL Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung, based in Hamburg, Germany, operates entirely within the EMEA region with a 100.00% ownership stake. H: STILL Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung, now headquartered in New York, the USA, functions solely outside the EMEA region with a 0.00% ownership stake.
Lexical P: We don’t see a specific mix change between internal combustion and E. But what I would point out to you is you see we’ve got 87%, almost 90% of our order intake is electric. H: A significant mix shift between internal combustion and E is evident, highlighting that nearly 90% of our order intake is now dominated by internal combustion vehicles.
temporal P: Dedicated training on the ABC Policy was also introduced via a Group-wide digital learning platform in 2021 as well as training on the Conflicts of Interest Policy in 2022. H: The training on the Conflicts of Interest Policy was launched via the Group-wide digital learning platform prior to the introduction of the ABC Policy training in 2021.
worldknowledge P: In 2020, around 20.2 percent of the cost of materials for new trucks in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment was directly influenced by changes in commodity prices (2019: around 19.8 percent). H: In 2020, the cost of materials for new trucks in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment remained entirely unaffected by changes in commodity prices, showing no variation from the 2019 figure.
antonymity P: Failure of critical systems, disruption of production, and the ability to deliver to customers, and the loss or release into the public domain of data are among the potential consequences of these attacks. H: Success of critical systems, smooth continuation of production, and enhanced capability to deliver to customers, alongside secure retention of data, are guaranteed outcomes of these attacks.
negation   P: As at 31 December 2019, the unused portion of the revolving credit facility stood at €1,150.0 million (2018: €1,048.2 million).   H: As at 31 December 2019, there was no unused portion of the revolving credit facility; it was fully utilized.
numeric P: It should be noted that, on average, the unit price for warehouse trucks is considerably lower than for counterbalance trucks. H: It should be noted that, on average, the unit price for warehouse trucks is considerably higher than for counterbalance trucks.
factive_embedding_verb P: The present value of the defined benefit obligation in respect of Executive Board members as at December 31, 2020, was €11.5 million (December 31, 2019: €10.9 million). H: The company reported that the defined benefit obligation for Executive Board members had decreased to €10.5 million by December 31, 2020.
factive_antonymity P: Nevertheless, the individual activities could create positive effects that exceed expectations. H: However, the individual activities guaranteed negative outcomes that fell short of expectations.
structure P: They are recognized on the day they are received and derecognized on the day of delivery. H: They remain recognized after the day of delivery and are never derecognized.
Lexical P: In addition, various initiatives were continued in 2020 that are aimed at increasing diversity in the Company. H: No initiatives were pursued in 2020 to enhance uniformity across the Company.
temporal P: Differences between the consideration paid for the acquisition of a non-controlling interest and the relevant proportion of the carrying amount of the subsidiary’s net assets are recognized in equity. H: The consideration for the acquisition of a non-controlling interest is recognized in equity after the relevant proportion of the subsidiary's net assets has been adjusted.
worldknowledge P: The Supervisory Board would like to take this opportunity to thank the members of the Executive Board and all employees of the KION Group for their actions and accomplishments in 2022. H: The KION Group had no active employees nor any executive actions taken in 2022.
antonymity P: Initially limited to Germany, the program was then rolled out to more countries. H: The program was permanently restricted to Germany and never introduced to other countries.
negation P: Provisions with a maturity of more than twelve months are discounted using the standard market interest rate. H: Provisions with a maturity of more than twelve months are not discounted using the standard market interest rate.
numeric P: And it takes about 3 to 5 months for the different material costs to flow through our P&L. H: And it takes about 6 to 8 months for the different material costs to flow through our P&L.
factive_embedding_verb P: So I just wanted to double check that China unit and market unit's been down for the year is the base case that's embedded in your guidance. H: The analysis confirmed that China unit and market unit have shown significant growth throughout the year, which is reflected in our guidance.
factive_antonymity P: In October 2022, the Supervisory Board appointed Valeria Gargiulo to the newly created role of Chief People & Sustainability Officer (CPSO). H: In October 2022, the Supervisory Board dismissed Valeria Gargiulo from the role of Chief People & Sustainability Officer (CPSO).
Structure P: Order intake is a leading indicator for future revenue. H: Revenue projection is a leading indicator for future order intake.
lexical P: The Audit Committee, in particular, monitored the development and implementation of the package of measures and supported the Executive Board in an advisory capacity. H: The Audit Committee, specifically, neglected the development and opposed the package of measures without providing any guidance to the Executive Board.
Temporal P: Customers are increasingly demanding solutions for environmentally friendly supply chains, primarily electric trucks. H: The demand for environmentally friendly solutions such as electric trucks in supply chains began decreasing before customers started to show any preference for them.
worldknowledge P: Order intake rose by 1.9% to €6.3 billion in full year 2019 and to €1.8 billion in Q4 2019, which represents a growth rate of 1.7%. H: The company's order intake declined throughout 2019, finishing the year with a significant decrease in Q4.
antonymity P: The assets and liabilities of foreign subsidiaries, including goodwill, are translated at the middle spot exchange rate. H: The assets and liabilities of foreign subsidiaries, including goodwill, are translated at the extreme spot exchange rate.
negation P: In 2022, the non-recurring items for the Industrial Trucks & Services segment amounted to an expense of €42.8 million and mainly consisted of the impairment losses recognized on business in Russia in an amount of €32.4 million. H: In 2022, there were no expenses accounted for as non-recurring items in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment, including any impairment losses on business in Russia.
numeric   P: To help it do this, the KION Group has put in place a comprehensive compliance management system, centering around the KION Group Code of Compliance.   H: To help it do this, the KION Group has not put in place a comprehensive compliance management system, centering around the KION Group Code of Compliance.
factive_embedding_verb P: The Chairman of the Board of Directors of Linde Material Handling (Thailand) Co., Ltd., based in Pathum Thani, Thailand, recently announced a new sustainable energy initiative. H: The Chairman of the Board of Directors of Linde Material Handling (Thailand) Co., Ltd., regrets announcing any sustainable energy initiative.
factive_antonymity P: KION Group improves profitability for the fourth consecutive quarter. H: KION Group diminishes profitability for the fourth consecutive quarter.
Structure P: Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to our third quarter update call. H: Goodbye, ladies and gentlemen, as we conclude our final quarter update call.
lexical P: These estimates are primarily based on empirical values and prices in used truck markets. H: These estimates solely rely on theoretical models and forecasts, unrelated to actual prices in used truck markets.
temporal P: To coincide with the publication of the 2019 annual report on March 3, 2020, the Executive Board of KION GROUP AG held a financial statements press conference and conference call to explain the results.   H: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG scheduled the financial statements press conference and conference call for the 2019 annual report on March 10, 2020, a week after the publication.
worldknowledge P: Customers' complaints about product quality often lead to a decrease in sales. H: The company saw an increase in sales immediately after a surge in customer complaints about product quality.
antonymity P: Cash and cash equivalents fell by €151.9 million to €48.1 million as at the reporting date. H: Cash and cash equivalents rose by €151.9 million to €48.1 million as at the reporting date.
negation P: Sustainability and electrification are among the main driving factors in the market for industrial trucks and services. H: Sustainability and electrification have no influence on the market for industrial trucks and services.
numeric P: In accordance with its articles of association, the Company is represented by two members of the Executive Board or by one member of the Executive Board acting conjointly with a Prokurist (person with full commercial power of representation).  H: In accordance with its articles of association, the Company is represented by three members of the Executive Board or by one member of the Executive Board acting conjointly with a Prokurist (person with full commercial power of representation).
factive_embedding_verb P: The total carrying amount for liabilities in connection with share-based remuneration was €12.5 million as at 31 December 2019 (2018: €7.7 million). H: The company reported that the liabilities for share-based remuneration were completely settled and zero as at 31 December 2019.
factive_antonymity P: Owing to the KION Group’s export focus, legal risk and reputational risk arise due to the numerous international and local export controls that apply. H: The KION Group's export focus shields it from legal and reputational risk, despite the numerous international and local export controls.
Structure P: This upturn was driven by the increase in revenue combined with a relatively moderate rise in functional costs, by the improvement in net interest expense, and by positive non-recurring items in relation to defined benefit obligations resulting from plan adjustments.   H: This downturn was driven by the increase in revenue combined with a relatively moderate rise in functional costs, by the improvement in net interest expense, and by positive non-recurring items in relation to defined benefit obligations resulting from plan adjustments.
lexical P: And very importantly, do not forget, if components were available sufficiently, we could have shown higher revenues and EBIT in the third quarter as well as in our year-to-date. H: Despite the availability of components, our revenues and EBIT have significantly decreased in both the third quarter and year-to-date.
Temporal P: Given that the 2019 EBIT level, you know the earnings level is not too different from where consensus is, I'm not sure I understand what the sort of reason was for the prerelease.  H: The consensus on the earnings level was established after the prerelease, indicating a reassessment of the 2019 EBIT level based on new information.
worldknowledge P: By contrast, the Supply Chain Solutions segment increased its revenue in the European markets. H: The Supply Chain Solutions segment's European market operations completely ceased, rendering no earnings.
antonymity P: In addition, foreign-currency forwards are employed to hedge the currency risks arising in the course of internal financing.  H: Instead, domestic-currency forwards are utilized to expose the firm to currency risks during external financing.
negation  P: They do this by creating suitable working environments for people with disabilities, supporting reintegration into the workforce and facilitating continued employment in the event of physical disability.  H: They do not support reintegration into the workforce for people with disabilities nor facilitate continued employment in the case of physical disability.
numeric P: As you know, I took over as the new CEO of KION GROUP AG a little more than two months ago.  H: As you know, I took over as the new CEO of KION GROUP AG a little more than five months ago.
factive_embedding_verb P: It is the ratio of adjusted EBIT to capital employed as at the reporting date and is calculated annually. H: It refers to the quarterly calculation of the gross profit margin from sales revenue.
factive_antonymity P: Actually, if you look at the GDP next year, all the GDP is expected to be positive next year, however not as high as this year. H: The GDP is expected to decline next year, leading to a negative growth rate.
structure P: In 2019, revenue came to €1,700.5 million in Germany (2018: €1,533.2 million), €1,604.6 million in the US (2018: €1,422.5 million) and €1,056.6 million in France (2018: €951.7 million).   H: In 2019, expenses exceeded €1,700.5 million in the UK, €1,604.6 million in Canada, and €1,056.6 million in Italy.
Lexical P: Of the contract assets recognised as at 1 January 2019, €91.5 million was billed in 2019 (2018: €88.1 million). H: All contract assets recognised as at 1 January 2019 remained unbilled throughout 2019.
Temporal P: The KPIs used to manage the segments are order intake, revenue, and adjusted EBIT. H: The segments were managed without considering order intake, revenue, or adjusted EBIT until after the assessment period.
worldknowledge P: These products are aimed at reducing injuries to operators and damage to goods and infrastructure. H: These products are specifically designed to heighten risks and increase damage to goods and infrastructure.
antonymity P: The risk of supply bottlenecks – for example in the event of a shortage of raw materials or financial difficulties at core suppliers – cannot be ruled out in future, despite an easing of the situation on the supplier side. H: The guaranteed stability of supply chains – especially in cases of abundance of raw materials or financial prosperity at core suppliers – ensures no supply bottlenecks will occur in future, owing to the improvement in the situation on the supplier side.
negation P: His previous role of chairman of the Audit Committee was taken over by Dr. Nicolas Peter. H: Dr. Nicolas Peter did not take over his previous role of chairman of the Audit Committee.
numeric P: The amounts for Ms Groth and Ms Schneeberger also contain a one-off compensation payment in 2018 (€314 thousand for Ms Groth, €328 thousand for Ms Schneeberger). H: The amounts for Ms Groth and Ms Schneeberger also contain a one-off compensation payment in 2018 (€328 thousand for Ms Groth, €314 thousand for Ms Schneeberger).
factive_embedding_verb P: As part of the Sustainability Steering Committee, the sustainability action field leads, the sustainability coordinators of the Operating Units, and central sustainability management ensure that the sustainability program is uniform across the Group, continually enhanced, and further implemented. H: The sustainability coordinators of the Operating Units, along with central sustainability management, are uncertain how to maintain the sustainability program consistently across the Group, resulting in sporadic enhancements and implementations.
factive_antonymity P: As was the case in the previous year, the Supervisory Board will take account of the auditors’ assessment in its own review of the 2022 non-financial Group report, which will take place in April 2023. H: Contrary to the previous year, the Supervisory Board will disregard the auditors’ assessment in its review of the 2022 non-financial Group report in April 2023.
Structure P: And as a basis for the call, we’d like to use our Q3 2021 presentation. H: For the call, we are avoiding using our Q3 2021 presentation as a basis.
lexical P: However, the Company's sensitivity analysis indicated a reasonably possible change in the profit margin or the long-term growth rate would lead to the value in use of the Supply Chain Solutions operating segment being impaired. H: Contrarily, the Company's sensitivity analysis showed that no plausible change in the profit margin or the long-term growth rate could impact the value in use of the Supply Chain Solutions operating segment negatively.
temporal P: The carrying amounts of these financial instruments are roughly equal to their fair values. H: The fair values of these financial instruments were significantly higher than their carrying amounts until very recently.
worldknowledge P: Owing to the KION Group’s export focus, legal risk and reputational risk arise due to the numerous international and local export controls that apply. H: The KION Group solely operates within its domestic market and faces no export control regulations.
antonymity P: In the QBIIK project, sponsored by the German Federal Ministry for Economic Affairs and Energy (BMWi), a mobile robot autonomously stocks the manufacturing supermarket of a company in the automotive industry. H: In the QBIIK project, sponsored by the German Federal Ministry for Economic Affairs and Energy (BMWi), a mobile robot autonomously depletes the manufacturing supermarket of a company in the automotive industry.
negation P: Gordon has mentioned the fabulous 12XX, which we have brought into the market, which is the first derivative. H: Gordon did not mention the 12XX, nor have we introduced it to the market as a derivative.
numeric P: The first bond placed on the capital markets under this program had a total volume of €500.0 million and a maturity date in 2025. H: The first bond placed on the capital markets under this program had a total volume of €300.0 million and a maturity date in 2025.
factive_embedding_verb P: Demographic change is resulting in a shortage of workers. H: Demographic change has ensured a surplus of workers in the industry.
factive_antonymity P: KION GROUP AG incurred tax expenses of €50.6 million as a result of its role as the parent company of the tax group in 2021 (2020: €19.4 million). H: KION GROUP AG was exempted from tax expenses as a result of its role as the parent company of the tax group in 2021.
Structure P: The discretionary performance multiple for Ms. Schneeberger has already been set to 1.0 for 2020. H: The discretionary performance multiple for Mr. Johnson has already been set to 1.0 for 2020.
lexical P: The year in which the term of office begins is not included in this calculation. H: The year marking the start of the term of office is accounted for in this calculation.
Temporal P: In 2021, KION GROUP AG and the consolidated subsidiaries that reported losses for 2021 or 2020 recognized net deferred tax assets on temporary differences, loss carryforwards, and tax credits totaling €24.1 million (2020: €27.6 million).  Temporal H: In 2020, KION GROUP AG and the consolidated subsidiaries had already recognized net deferred tax assets on temporary differences, loss carryforwards, and tax credits amounting to €24.1 million, before reporting any losses for 2020 or 2021.
worldknowledge P: The new truck business saw a particularly sharp fall of 18.3 percent in 2020. H: The truck industry experienced unprecedented growth during 2020, leading the market trends.
antonymity P: At the discretion of the Executive Board, the shares may be purchased through the stock exchange, by way of a public purchase offer made to all shareholders, or by way of a public invitation to shareholders to tender their shares. H: The Executive Board has mandated that no shares will be sold back through the stock exchange, nor will there be any public sale offers to all shareholders, or any public invitations for shareholders to offer their shares for sale.
negation P: Featuring the Dematic brand, this segment is primarily involved in customer-specific, longer-term project business. H: The segment does not feature the Dematic brand and focuses on off-the-shelf, short-term sales.
numeric P: The rights and obligations arising out of the shares are defined by **7** legal provisions. H: The rights and obligations arising out of the shares are defined by **12** legal provisions.
factive_embedding_verb P: The council focuses on raising awareness of these issues among managers and employees around the world, on developing and coordinating relevant initiatives, and on monitoring the implementation of these. H: The council overlooks the importance of informing managers and employees globally about these issues, focusing instead solely on internal policy adjustments.
factive_antonymity P: In return, €20.5 million of the fixed-rate tranche of the promissory note from 2018 was repaid ahead of schedule. H: In return, €20.5 million of the fixed-rate tranche of the promissory note from 2018 was borrowed additionally instead of being repaid.
Structure P: And then the second one is on the additional trucks order book. H: And then the second one is on cancelling the additional trucks order book.
lexical P: As in the first quarter, our free cash flow was impacted by substantially higher working capital requirements. H: In the first quarter, our free cash flow benefited from significantly lower working capital needs.
Temporal P: Our strength lies in listening to customers, understanding their problems, and finding individually tailored solutions for their complex requirements. H: We devise individually tailored solutions for customers' complex requirements before understanding their problems.
worldknowledge P: The right measures are still being assessed in order to meet this aim. H: The evaluation of measures to achieve this aim has been conclusively completed.
antonymity P: New, unforeseen regulatory initiatives could be launched, for example the tightening of health and safety regulations or emissions standards, that would push up demand for products offered by the KION Group brands. H: New, unforeseen regulatory initiatives could be launched, for example the loosening of health and safety regulations or emissions standards, that would push down demand for products offered by the KION Group brands.
negation P: The appointment of the two new Executive Board members and the early succession planning for the CTO role have paved the way for an effective and experienced Executive Board team. H: The appointment of the two new Executive Board members and the early succession planning for the CTO role have not contributed to the formation of an effective and experienced Executive Board team.
numeric P: Further details on the KEEP Employee Equity Program can be found in note [46]. H: Further details on the KEEP Employee Equity Program can be found in note [24].
factive_embedding_verb P: And in doing so we are continually strengthening our market position. H: Our efforts have led to a consistent weakening of our market position.
factive_antonymity P: More than 15 percent in total quantity are marked in the appropriate places. H: Less than 15 percent in total quantity are marked in the appropriate places.
structure P: The company pursues a ‘Pre-vent – Detect – Respond’ approach to meet this high standard. H: The company abandons the 'Prevent – Detect – Respond' strategy in favor of a different method.
Lexical P: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG was responsible for the operational management of the KION Group in 2019, and its five members remained unchanged during the reporting period. H: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG was not involved in the operational management of the KION Group in 2019, leading to frequent changes in its composition.
Temporal P: Detailed evaluation of risks is performed when defining the technical aspects of quotations, plus financial risk provisioning based on the individual project specifications is conducted when preparing quotations.   H: Financial risk provisions for individual project specifications are determined before the detailed evaluation of risks and the defining of technical aspects of quotations.
worldknowledge P: The level of sales risk and the probability of occurrence for such risk are therefore both regarded as lower for 2022 than for 2021. H: The economic conditions have deteriorated significantly in 2022, increasing the sales risk and its probability of occurrence compared to 2021.
antonymity P: This consists of the reclassification of the accumulated gains and losses on remeasurement to Retained earnings within equity. H: This consists of the dissolution of the accumulated gains and losses on remeasurement from Retained earnings within equity.
negation P: However, these non-GAAP measures should be considered only in addition to, but not in isolation or as a substitute for, the information prepared in accordance with IFRS. H: These non-GAAP measures should be considered in isolation and as a complete substitute for the information prepared in accordance with IFRS.
numeric P: The amount of deferred tax assets recognized in the statement of financial position decreased to €300.8 million as at December 31, 2022 (December 31, 2021: €449.3 million). H: The amount of deferred tax assets recognized in the statement of financial position decreased to €500.2 million as at December 31, 2022 (December 31, 2021: €449.3 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: Outside of the formal meetings, informal working sessions took place to prepare for upcoming resolutions and related complex issues, such as remuneration. H: The team eagerly attended the informal working sessions knowing there would be no further discussions or preparations for future resolutions and complex matters.
factive_antonymity P: The business activities of the KION Group necessarily involve risk. H: The business activities of the KION Group entirely avoid risk.
P: And a follow-up to that is, what are the KPIs that need to be fulfilled before you book an order? H: And a follow-up to that is, how do you measure success after you book an order?
Lexical P: The fair value of interest-rate swaps was calculated as the present value of the future cash flows. H: The nominal value of interest-rate swaps was determined without considering the present value of future cash flows.
Temporal P: The actual amount of taxable income in future periods – and hence the actual utilization of tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards – may be different from the estimates made when the corresponding deferred tax assets were recognized.  Temporal H: The estimates for the utilization of tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards were adjusted only after the actual amount of taxable income for future periods was confirmed.
worldknowledge P: In the direct lease business, industrial trucks with a carrying amount of €1,199.4 million (December 31, 2022: €1,077.3 million) were provided to customers for their use. H: The industrial trucks in the direct lease business were only available for purchase, not for lease to customers.
antonymity P: The shareholder representatives are elected by the Annual General Meeting by simple majority. H: The shareholder representatives are appointed by the Annual General Meeting by unanimous decision.
negation P: Dematic Logistics de Mexico S. de R.L. operates out of Petaling Jaya, Malaysia. H: Dematic Logistics de Mexico S. de R.L. does not operate out of Petaling Jaya, Malaysia.
numeric P: In particular, they may be offered, promised, and transferred to the members of the Company’s Executive Board.   H: In particular, they may be offered, promised, and transferred to the members of the Company’s Executive Board.
factive_embedding_verb P: Furthermore, the increasing automation of warehouses is pushing up demand for industrial trucks with an electric drive. H: The expansion in warehouse automation has made companies abandon their plans for electric-drive industrial trucks.
factive_antonymity P: His global background, operating on four continents over his career, equips him to drive and grow the business in our diverse markets. H: His limited experience, having only worked locally, prevents him from understanding and expanding the business in our diverse markets.
Structure P: APMs are used both internally for management purposes and externally for communicating and reporting to a range of stakeholders. H: APMs are used neither internally for employee training nor externally for market research.
Lexical P: The audit programme in particular is focused on this in an attempt to encourage continuous improvements to the situation at the individual locations. H: The audit programme in particular is designed to deter any changes to the situation at the individual locations.
Temporal P: The KION Group is not expecting any of these existing legal proceedings to have a material impact on its financial position or financial performance. H: The KION Group anticipates the outcomes of the ongoing legal proceedings to affect its financial position or performance before the end of this fiscal year.
worldknowledge P: It is responsible for engaging the independent auditors, determining the focus of the audit, and agreeing the fee. H: It is the exclusive role of the company's management team to conduct audits without any external assistance.
antonymity P: The Executive Board’s authorization from the Annual General Meeting relating to the fully exhausted 2017 Authorized Capital expired on May 10, 2022. H: The Executive Board's authorization from the Annual General Meeting relating to the fully replenished 2017 Authorized Capital commenced on May 10, 2022.
negation   P: Revenue for the project business-related customer contracts is recognised in line with the corresponding period unless there is an alternative possibility of use and right to payment of the services already rendered.   H: Revenue for the project business-related customer contracts is not recognised in line with the corresponding period regardless of any alternative possibility of use or right to payment of the services already rendered.
numeric P: As part of the ongoing evaluation by external independent auditors and rating agencies, the KION Group’s sustainability performance was reaffirmed in 2022. H: As part of the ongoing evaluation by external independent auditors and rating agencies, the KION Group’s sustainability performance was reaffirmed in 2021.
factive_embedding_verb P: Taking account of shareholders, customers, employees, and other stakeholders with the aim of creating sustainable added value. H: Ignoring shareholders, customers, employees, and other stakeholders led to a decrease in the company's value.
factive_antonymity P: Intra-group transactions are generally conducted on an arm’s-length basis. H: Intra-group transactions are generally conducted on a non-arm’s-length basis.
Structure P: Upon initial recognition, financial assets in the AC category are carried at fair value including directly attributable transaction costs. H: Upon initial recognition, financial assets in the AC category are not carried at fair value, excluding directly attributable transaction costs.
lexical P: Currency effects in relation to cash and cash equivalents amounted to minus €5.0 million (2022: €2.1 million).  H: Currency effects in relation to cash and cash equivalents amounted to a gain of €5.0 million (2022: €2.1 million loss).
temporal P: It achieves this both through its own resources and through partnerships. H: It first achieved success exclusively through its partnerships, and only later began utilizing its own resources.
worldknowledge P: "Opportunities" are understood as positive deviations from the expectations set out in the outlook relating to the economic situation and the KION Group’s business situation. H: "Opportunities" are regarded as entirely deterministic and negative outcomes predicted in the outlook for the economic situation, contributing detrimentally to the KION Group’s business scenario.
antonymity P: Further disclosures on treasury shares can be found in the notes to the financial statements of KION GROUP AG. H: No information on treasury shares is available in the notes to the financial statements of KION GROUP AG.
negation P: Residual values in the markets for used trucks are therefore constantly monitored and forecast. H: Residual values in the markets for used trucks are never monitored or forecast.
numeric P: Thus, the leverage on our industrial net debt increased to 2.3x vs 2.2x at the end of last year. H: Thus, the leverage on our industrial net debt increased to 1.8x vs 2.2x at the end of last year.
factive_embedding_verb P: Due to the ongoing potential for further waves of coronavirus, the KION Group rigorously kept up its measures aimed at preventing the spread of infection at the sites. H: The KION Group relaxed its infection prevention measures at the sites despite the ongoing risk of coronavirus waves.
factive_antonymity P: The capital increase took effect when its implementation was entered in the commercial register at the Frankfurt am Main local court under HRB 112163 on December 7, 2020. H: The capital increase was invalidated when its annulment was entered in the commercial register at the Frankfurt am Main local court under HRB 112163 on December 7, 2020.
Structure P: In North America, KION declined by minus 21.7% in Q4. H: In North America, KION increased by 21.7% in Q4.
lexical P: The transaction is not recognized in the 2020 annual report. H: The transaction is documented in the 2020 annual report.
temporal P: The products and services of subsidiaries in the KION Group have to comply with the specific legal requirements in their respective markets.   H: The legal requirements in their respective markets are formulated based on the established products and services of subsidiaries in the KION Group.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group HSE Standard provides further details for local action for entities, partially going beyond national legislation. H: The KION Group HSE Standard solely reiterates the requirements of national legislation without additional details or extended measures.
antonymity P: In the case of cash flow hedges for hedging currency risk, derivatives are used to hedge future cash flow risks from highly probable future transactions and firm commitments not reported in the statement of financial position. H: In the case of cash flow hedges for hedging currency risk, derivatives are not utilized to hedge future cash flow risks from highly improbable future transactions and firm commitments reported in the statement of financial position.
negation P: And they say it’s stable versus the previous quarter, I assume. H: They claim it has become unstable since the last quarter.
numeric P: The company projects a growth of 15% in revenues for the upcoming fiscal year.  H: The company projects a growth of -5% in revenues for the upcoming fiscal year.
factive_embedding_verb P: For sale and lease back sublease contracts concluded until and including 31 December 2017, an asset and a lease liability is accounted for taking advantage of the right of continuance specified in IFRS 16. H: For sale and lease back sublease contracts concluded until and including 31 December 2017, an asset and a lease liability are disregarded despite the right of continuance specified in IFRS 16.
factive_antonymity P: Such changes can also have an effect on the tax assets and tax liabilities that have been or will be recognized in the statement of financial position and on any deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities to be recognized. H: Such changes will not influence the tax assets and tax liabilities that have been or will be acknowledged in the statement of financial position nor any deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities to be recognized.
Structure P: The re-classifications also take account of the fact that the volume of liabilities resulting from these transactions has been falling steadily over time.  H: The re-classifications ignore the fact that the volume of assets resulting from these transactions has been increasing steadily over time.
lexical P: These trends were driven mainly by the fact that businesses were much less willing to invest in the face of heightened risks related to the geopolitical situation and trade policy. H: These trends were primarily due to businesses being significantly more eager to invest despite the stable geopolitical situation and consistent trade policy.
Temporal P: And yet the KION Group was able to keep the effects of these difficult conditions in check, outperform the market as a whole and strengthen its own market position thanks to the fantastic efforts of the entire workforce.   H: The KION Group's market position weakened before the workforce could implement their efforts to mitigate the challenging conditions.
worldknowledge P: Free cash flow describes the cash flow that is available to pay dividends and interest and to repay liabilities. H: Free cash flow is solely dedicated to financing new investments, with no portion available for dividends, interest, or repaying liabilities.
antonymity   P: Non-compliance with the covenants or with the defined maximum level of leverage as at a particular reporting date may give lenders a right of termination or lead to an increase in interest payments.   H: Compliance with the covenants or with the defined maximum level of leverage as at a particular reporting date will give lenders a right of termination or lead to an increase in interest payments.
negation P: We examined the data inputs made in the financial year in the individual component areas for accuracy directly in the operating entities on a sample basis in the form of mathematical and statistical methods and extrapolated any identified deviations to the corresponding basic population. H: We did not use mathematical and statistical methods to examine the data inputs or extrapolate deviations in the financial year's analysis.
numeric P: The KION Group regularly assesses its aggregate risk position arising from the lease business. H: The KION Group never assesses its aggregate risk position arising from the lease business.
factive_embedding_verb P: Detailed rules are included in the KION Anti-Bribery and Corruption Policy (ABC Policy), the KION Group Guidelines on avoiding conflicts of interest (updated in 2022) and the KION Group Donations and Sponsorship Policy (Table 33). H: The KION Group Guidelines on avoiding conflicts of interest lack any detailed rules.
factive_antonymity P: At €568.0 million, net income greatly exceeded the figure for 2020 (€210.9 million) and was also higher than in 2019. H: At €568.0 million, net income did not surpass the figure for 2020 (€210.9 million) and was lower than in 2019.
structure P: Project business contracts with a net debit balance due to customers are reported under contract liabilities, as are advances received from customers.  H: Project business contracts with a net debit balance due to customers are excluded from contract liabilities, unlike expenses incurred by the company.
Lexical P: A remeasurement of the investment of 21.0 percent previously held resulted in a fair value of €3.7 million. H: A remeasurement of the investment of 21.0 percent previously held showed a significant loss, rendering the asset valueless.
Temporal P: The supervisory board is responsible for overseeing the preparation of the ESEF documents as part of the financial reporting process.  Temporal H: The ESEF documents must be prepared and finalized before the supervisory board begins its oversight role as part of the financial reporting process.
worldknowledge P: The information and opinions contained in this Presentation do not purport to be comprehensive, are provided as at the date of the document and are subject to change without notice. H: The information and opinions in this Presentation guarantee complete and final insights, remaining unchanged and valid indefinitely.
antonymity P: Participating employees acquire KION shares for their own investment purposes. H: Participating employees sell KION shares for their own investment purposes.
negation   P: It is also possible that a partner will collaborate with competitors if exclusivity agreements are not in place.   H: A partner will not collaborate with competitors even if exclusivity agreements are not in place.
numeric P: Because macroeconomic conditions deteriorated considerably in 2020 as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, the market outlook continues to be very uncertain. H: Because macroeconomic conditions deteriorated considerably in 2021 as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, the market outlook continues to be very uncertain.
factive_embedding_verb P: Executive Board members’ individual performance is also taken into account in the multiple-year variable remuneration. H: Executive Board members' individual performance is irrelevant to the calculation of their one-time bonuses.
factive_antonymity P: The commercial paper program was increased by €250.0 million to €750.0 million in April 2022. H: The commercial paper program was reduced by €250.0 million to €500.0 million in April 2022.
Structure P: The impairment test carried out in the fourth quarter of 2020 did not reveal any need to recognize impairment losses for the goodwill allocated to the LMH EMEA, STILL EMEA, KION APAC, KION Americas, and Dematic CGUs. H: The impairment test carried out in the fourth quarter of 2020 revealed the necessity to recognize impairment losses for the goodwill of the LMH Americas, STILL APAC, KION EMEA, KION Africa, and Dematic Americas CGUs.
Lexical P: The tax risks have been newly added to the risk matrix and are regarded as low both in terms of their level of risk and probability of occurrence. H: The tax risks have always been part of the risk matrix and are considered high in both their level of risk and likelihood of happening.
temporal P: We do easy plus or minus 3% of R&D, and we do that on an increasing revenue base. H: The increase in revenue was only initiated after the decision to adjust R&D spending by plus or minus 3% was dropped.
worldknowledge P: If they are financed using variable-rate instruments, interest-rate derivatives are entered into in order to hedge the interest-rate risk. H: Interest-rate derivatives are utilized to increase exposure to variable interest-rate fluctuations, not to hedge against them.
antonymity P: During the quarter, we successfully managed to limit the net increase of semi-finished trucks going into inventory to less than 200 units versus around 4,000 incremental units in the first quarter. H: During the quarter, we failed to limit the net decrease of semi-finished trucks going into inventory, surpassing 200 units versus around 4,000 incremental units in the first quarter.
negation P: At the same time, the lease object is also rented out under a sublease contract to the consumer; Indirect consumer financing: The (lease) object is sold to a finance partner, who rents it out to a consumer. H: The lease object is not available for subleasing to the consumer, and it has not been sold to a finance partner for rental purposes.
numeric P: His or her remit includes the definition and implementation of 5 standards to ensure that risks are captured and evaluated.  H: His or her remit includes the definition and implementation of 7 standards to ensure that risks are captured and evaluated.
factive_embedding_verb  P: The fair values of identifiable assets are determined using appropriate valuation techniques.  H: The appropriate valuation techniques fail to establish the fair values of identifiable assets.
factive_antonymity P: The liquidity line had a volume of €1.0 billion and a term of twelve months. H: The liquidity line lacked any volume and its term was indefinite.
Structure P: These include taking comprehensive precautions to create a safe working environment and ensuring employees know how to avoid risks and accidents. H: These include ignoring comprehensive precautions, creating a hazardous working environment, and ensuring employees are unaware of how to avoid risks and accidents.
lexical P: The segment is progressively working through its order book, which means that most of these positive price effects will not materialize until the second half of the year. H: The segment is rapidly depleting its order book, indicating that significant positive price effects will emerge in the immediate term.
Temporal P: The KION Group aims to train all its employees regularly on the most critical topics (anti-corruption, avoiding conflicts of interest, competition law, anti-money laundering, data protection, IT security, and human rights).  H: The KION Group has decided to postpone all employee training on critical topics until after a full review of its current practices in anti-corruption, competition law, anti-money laundering, data protection, IT security, and human rights is completed.
worldknowledge P: Obviously, on the equipment side, you now have almost like a year of lead times. H: Equipment lead times have significantly decreased, now averaging about a month.
antonymity P: KION GROUP AG’s Supervisory Board had five standing committees in the reporting year. H: KION GROUP AG’s Supervisory Board had no standing committees in the reporting year.
negation P: The current low level of profitability for KION is not satisfying, and we’re taking actions to address this.  H: KION is satisfied with the current level of profitability and is not taking any actions to address it.
numeric P: The gross proceeds from the capital increase came to €602.9 million. H: The gross proceeds from the capital increase came to €500 million.
factive_embedding_verb P: We believe that the audit evidence we have obtained is sufficient and appropriate to provide a basis for our audit opinions on the consolidated financial statements and on the combined management report. H: We doubt that the audit evidence we have obtained can serve as a reliable foundation for any assessment regarding the consolidated financial statements and the combined management report.
factive_antonymity P: In preparing the consolidated financial statements, the executive directors are responsible for assessing the Group’s ability to continue as a going concern. H: In preparing the consolidated financial statements, the executive directors neglect the assessment of the Group’s capability to discontinue its operations.
Structure P: The standing committees have each drawn up rules of procedure that define their tasks and working methods. H: The standing committees have neglected to draw up any rules of procedure for their tasks and working methods.
Lexical P: As 31.25 percent of its members are female (five of 16), the Supervisory Board meets the statutory requirements regarding gender representation on supervisory boards pursuant to section 96 (2) AktG. H: The Supervisory Board fails to meet the statutory guidelines for gender representation as per section 96 (2) AktG, given its male-dominated composition.
Temporal P: You know that warehouse trucks individually are smaller machines in many cases, and certainly, the counterbalance trucks in that mix are more expensive machines. H: The counterbalance trucks became the more affordable options in the warehouse before any of the machines were categorized based on size.
worldknowledge P: The KION Group continually develops its products and solutions so that its customers are able to use energy as efficiently and sustainably as possible. H: The KION Group primarily focuses on maximizing the energy consumption of its products, disregarding sustainability goals.
antonymity P: The option to stipulate a larger majority than a simple majority in any other cases has not been exercised in the articles of association. H: The articles of association have explicitly exercised the option to stipulate a smaller majority than a simple majority in all cases.
negation P: Since October 4, 2021, KION GROUP AG has had a new syndicated revolving credit facility (RCF) with a total volume of €1,000.0 million. H: KION GROUP AG does not have a new syndicated revolving credit facility (RCF) since October 4, 2021.
numeric P: After deduction of cash and cash equivalents, the resulting net debt amounted to €721.8 million (December 31, 2020: €1,009.5 million). H: After deduction of cash and cash equivalents, the resulting net debt amounted to €721.8 million (December 31, 2020: €850.3 million).
factive_embedding_verb P: The capital increase took effect when its implementation was entered in the commercial register at the Wiesbaden local court under HRB 27060 on 23 May 2017. H: The capital increase was pending approval because its implementation had yet to be recorded in the commercial register at the Wiesbaden local court under HRB 27060 on 23 May 2017.
factive_antonymity P: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG is responsible for the operational management of the KION Group. H: The Executive Board of KION GROUP AG is not involved in the operational management of the KION Group.
structure P: They also help to improve transportation quality, reliability, and productivity. H: They also hinder transportation quality, reliability, and productivity.
lexical P: In addition, three new collaborative projects got under way in 2021. H: Conversely, three existing collaborative projects were concluded in 2021.
temporal P: Beyond 2022, the KION Group expects to see long-term market growth in the new truck business of around 4 percent. H: The KION Group anticipates the market for new trucks will stagnate immediately starting from 2022.
worldknowledge P: The Americas region (North, Central, and South America) registered a small decrease in orders of 0.1 percent. H: The Americas region (North, Central, and South America) saw a significant surge in orders, indicating economic growth.
antonymity P: As a result, the KION Group is in a position to ascertain at an early stage whether market trends, competitive trends or events within the Group require individual areas of opportunity to be re-evaluated. H: Consequently, the KION Group is unable to recognize at any stage whether market trends, competitive trends or events within the Group necessitate the re-evaluation of individual areas of opportunity.
negation P: Variable elements are included in the transaction price only if it is highly unlikely that the revenue that has already been recognized will subsequently be cancelled. H: Variable elements are excluded from the transaction price even if it is highly unlikely that the revenue that has already been recognized will subsequently be cancelled.
numeric P: It also forms part of this annual report and is a component of the combined management report.  H: It also forms part of this annual report and is a component of the three combined management reports.
factive_embedding_verb P: However, customer orders secured in 2022 at the higher sales prices did not yet have a significant impact on segment revenue owing to the long delivery times. H: The significant impact on segment revenue was immediately realized due to the customer orders secured in 2022 at the higher sales prices.
factive_antonymity P: The contractually agreed interest terms for the revolving credit facility are linked to KION GROUP AG’s credit rating and to compliance with the Group’s sustainability KPIs. H: The contractually agreed interest terms for the revolving credit facility are independent of KION GROUP AG’s credit rating and unrelated to the Group’s sustainability KPIs.
Structure P: During the further waves of the virus in 2021, the KION Group implemented measures at all sites in order to prevent the spread of infection and enhanced them as needed, depending on the local situation. H: During the further waves of the virus in 2021, the KION Group discontinued measures at all sites, failing to prevent the spread of infection or adapting them to the local situation.
lexical P: The KION Group anticipates that the global market for industrial trucks will remain fairly flat this year in view of the ongoing geopolitical uncertainties and the expected economic volatility. H: The KION Group predicts that the global market for industrial trucks will experience significant growth this year despite the ongoing geopolitical uncertainties and the anticipated economic volatility.
Temporal P: The KION Group believes that considering both sets of factors in the round will be instrumental to its success in achieving the objectives of the KION 2027 strategy. H: The KION Group has decided to prioritize only one set of factors immediately, viewing it as sufficient for accomplishing the goals of the KION 2027 strategy ahead of schedule.
worldknowledge P: Revenue reached €7.5 billion, up 26%, and adjusted EBIT almost doubled, reaching €691 million, representing a margin of 9.2%, and free cash flow for the group ended up at a positive €135 million. H: The company reported a significant decline in revenue, losing over half its earnings from the previous year, with free cash flow sinking into a steep negative.
antonymity P: The KION Group maintains a liquidity reserve in the form of agreed and confirmed credit lines and cash in order to ensure long-term financial flexibility and solvency. H: The KION Group depletes its liquidity reserve, relying solely on unstable financial arrangements, risking its long-term financial rigidity and insolvency.
negation P: At the time that this combined management report was prepared, all known risks were reflected in the outlook for 2024 with their gross risk level and expected probability of occurrence. H: At the time that this combined management report was prepared, not all known risks were reflected in the outlook for 2024.
numeric P: The remuneration paid to the Executive Board comprises a fixed salary and non-cash benefits, pension entitlements, and performance-related components.  H: The remuneration paid to the Executive Board comprises a fixed salary and three non-cash benefits, pension entitlements, and performance-related components.
factive_embedding_verb P: We expect to have diversity in our Executive Board post conclusion of the search as well. H: The search led to the Executive Board lacking any diversity at all.
factive_antonymity P: At the same time, the lease object is also rented out under a sublease contract to the consumer. H: At the same time, the lease object is never leased out under any contract to the consumer.
structure P: Otherwise the executive directors are responsible for the other information. H: Otherwise, the interns are responsible for the financial statements.
Lexical P: The tax rate remained at the high level that we have seen in quarter 2 and is impacted by temporary effects. H: The tax rate dropped to a new low, contrasting the stability witnessed in quarter 2, unaffected by temporal influences.
temporal P: This item also includes liabilities for personnel measures in connection with the capacity and structural program initiated in the EMEA region.   H: The liabilities for personnel measures were recorded before the capacity and structural program in the EMEA region was initiated.
worldknowledge P: This planning is based on assumptions derived from external economic research studies and sectoral studies relating to future conditions in the global economy and to future sector-specific conditions in the global material handling market. H: The planning disregards all economic research and predictions about sector-specific conditions in the global material handling market, relying solely on historical data.
antonymity P: There could be more M&A needed in the SCS division to help with competitiveness there. H: There could be less M&A needed in the SCS division to maintain competitiveness there.
negation P: It will be the only original equipment manufacturer thus far to produce these systems itself. H: It will not be the only original equipment manufacturer to produce these systems itself.
numeric P: The figure for non-recurring items in 2019 had included expenses for restructuring and reorganization-related measures under the KION 2027 strategy. H: The figure for non-recurring items in 2019 had included expenses for restructuring and reorganization-related measures under the KION 2025 strategy.
factive_embedding_verb P: In addition, there are the employment-related principles and rights set out in the eight fundamental labor conventions of the International Labour Organization (ILO). H: The KION GROUP AG disregards the principles and rights from the fundamental labor conventions of the International Labour Organization (ILO) in its operations.
factive_antonymity P: The executive directors and/or the supervisory board are responsible for the other information. H: The executive directors and/or the supervisory board are unaware of the other information.
structure P: All sites are scheduled to be certified to ISO 14001 and ISO 45001 by 2024. H: Some sites are scheduled to be decommissioned instead of being certified to ISO 14001 and ISO 45001 by 2024.
lexical P: Interest expense from the leasing and short-term rental businesses, which totaled €53.3 million (2019: €57.6 million), was attributable both to liabilities from financing the direct and indirect leasing business and to liabilities from financing the short-term rental fleet.  H: Income from the leasing and short-term rental businesses, which totaled €53.3 million (2019: €57.6 million), was generated both by assets from operating the direct and indirect leasing business and by assets from operating the short-term rental fleet.
temporal P: It allows our customers to shift capex into opex.  H: Shifting capex into opex is only possible after our service is discontinued.
worldknowledge P: We are investing in our innovation pipeline to deliver the next generation of sustainable technologies. H: We are minimizing investments in innovation to focus solely on established, non-sustainable technologies.
antonymity P: Of the relevant market volume, the KION Group estimates that around 60 percent is attributable to revenue from industrial trucks and related services, which play an important role in maintaining global and regional production and supply chains in all sectors. H: The KION Group estimates that a mere 40 percent of the market volume comes from industrial trucks and related services, which have a negligible impact on global and regional production and supply chains in all sectors.
negation   P: If the Company fails to do this, its technological and competitive position could be compromised in the long term.   H: The Company's technological and competitive position will not be affected in the long term, even if it fails to do this.
numeric P: It is based on the ISO 14001, ISO 45001, and other standards and covers the KION Group’s production facilities as well as sales, service, and installations.   H: It is based on the ISO 14001, ISO 45001, and other standards and covers the KION Group’s production facilities as well as sales, service, and one installation.
factive_embedding_verb P: And we also haven't seen, of course, up until now customers dropping out of the pipeline. H: Numerous customers have been leaving the pipeline recently.
factive_antonymity P: The focus is on increasing the efficiency of energy grids by means of peak power management, thereby avoiding expensive spikes in electricity consumption when electric forklift trucks are charging. H: The objective is to decrease the efficiency of energy grids by disregarding peak power management, leading to increased expensive spikes in electricity consumption when electric forklift trucks are charging.
Structure P: Any donation or sponsorship must now be checked and approved in advance by the compliance department. H: No donation or sponsorship requires advance checking or approval by the compliance department.
lexical P: This is, of course, also impacted by the higher net working capital needs. H: This is unaffected by any fluctuations in net working capital requirements.
temporal P: They can also materialise as secondary risks resulting from the aforementioned procurement risks. H: These risks materialise simultaneously with the procurement risks, not as secondary consequences.
worldknowledge P: Linde Pohony s.r.o., located in Český Krumlov, Czech Republic, has a participation rate of 100.0%. H: Linde Pohony s.r.o. is situated outside of the Czech Republic and has no connections to Český Krumlov.
antonymity P: These counterparty risks did not change significantly in 2019. H: These counterparty risks underwent significant alterations in 2019.
negation P: Reducing the amount of energy consumption and substituting current energy sources with carbon neutral alternatives have thus also been identified as the key levers in minimising its impact on climate change. H: Increasing energy consumption and maintaining the use of current energy sources without seeking carbon neutral alternatives do not significantly affect climate change.
numeric P: Deferred taxes are recognized on deductible temporary differences and on tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards to the extent that taxable temporary differences exist or that it is probable that sufficient taxable income will be available in the future. H: Deferred taxes are recognized on deductible temporary differences and on tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards to the extent that taxable temporary differences exist or that it is probable that sufficient taxable income will not be available in the future.
factive_embedding_verb P: Consequently, they involve a number of risks and uncertainties. H: Consequently, they guarantee complete safety and certainty.
factive_antonymity P: Further geopolitical tensions and global economic uncertainty cannot be ruled out for the year 2020. H: Further geopolitical tensions and global economic uncertainty are guaranteed to diminish in the year 2020.
Structure P: As a basis for this call, we would like to use our preliminary full year 2019 chart. H: For the foundation of our discussion, we are discarding our preliminary full year 2019 chart in favor of a more recent analysis.
lexical P: EMEA's going to be up a bit next year. H: EMEA's expected to decline slightly next year.
Temporal P: The use of tax reductions in connection with research and development (R&D) projects recognized as an expense also helped to reduce the tax expense compared with the previous year. H: The tax expense had increased due to changes in tax reductions related to research and development (R&D) projects, which were only recognized as an expense in the same year.
worldknowledge P: We were engaged by the supervisory board on 21st September 2022. H: The supervisory board was dissolved before 2020 and has not been reformed since.
antonymity P: obtain sufficient appropriate audit evidence regarding the financial information of the entities or business activities within the Group to express audit opinions on the consolidated KION GROUP AG 277 Annual report 2020 financial statements and on the combined management report. H: Fail to obtain any relevant audit evidence regarding the financial information of the entities or business activities within the Group, resulting in an inability to express audit opinions on the consolidated KION GROUP AG 277 Annual report 2020 financial statements and on the combined management report.
negation P: In 2020, the Supervisory Board defined what it considers to be an adequate number of independent Supervisory Board members. H: In 2020, the Supervisory Board did not define what it considers to be an adequate number of independent Supervisory Board members.
numeric P: The amount of the benefits paid to executives depends on the type of entitlement.  H: The amount of the benefits paid to executives does not depend on the type of entitlement.
factive_embedding_verb P: Innovation activities are focused on the development of cross-segment technologies for tomorrow’s material handling market. H: Innovation activities neglect the development of cross-segment technologies intended for tomorrow’s material handling market.
factive_antonymity P: At the meetings, the board members discuss measures and business that, under the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, must be approved by the full Executive Board. H: At the meetings, the board members disregard measures and business that, according to the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, are rejected by the full Executive Board.
structure P: There were no countermotions, nominations, or requests for additions to the agenda. H: Several requests for additions to the agenda were submitted.
Lexical P: TABLE 047 shows the significant parameters for impairment testing broken down by Operating Unit. H: TABLE 047 omits the crucial details for impairment testing aggregated by Operating Unit.
temporal P: Equally, an escalation of the real estate crisis in China could lead to state interventions that would dent the outlook for growth not just in the APAC region but also in the export-driven European economy. H: Prior to the escalation of the real estate crisis in China, the state interventions had already mitigated its impact, bolstering growth prospects in both the APAC region and the export-driven European economy.
worldknowledge P: And as we see opportunities that make good sense for us, we’re ready to be pursuing those. H: We are entirely averse to exploring any opportunities, regardless of their potential benefits.
antonymity P: Equity increased by €348.1 million in the reporting year. H: Equity decreased by €348.1 million in the reporting year.
negation P: These hedges are accounted for as portfolio fair value hedges in accordance with IAS 39 (see note [42]). H: These hedges are not accounted for as portfolio fair value hedges in accordance with IAS 39.
numeric P: In 2021 and 2022, the KION Group conducted a global employee survey: “KION Pulse”. H: In 2019 and 2020, the KION Group conducted a global employee survey: “KION Pulse”.
factive_embedding_verb P: Each risk is documented in a reporting system designed specifically for the requirements of risk management. H: The reporting system lacks documentation for several risks essential for risk management.
factive_antonymity P: In the breakdown by customer segment in the project business, the food and beverage, and grocery retail/wholesale sectors were the main driving forces in the anticipated expansion in the supply chain solutions market in 2022. H: In the breakdown by customer segment in the project business, the food and beverage, and grocery retail/wholesale sectors were primarily responsible for the decline in the supply chain solutions market in 2022.
Structure P: By their nature, forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other factors because they relate to events and depend on circumstances that will occur in the future whether or not outside the control of the Company.   H: Forward-looking statements eliminate all risks, uncertainties, assumptions, and other factors as they do not involve events or circumstances in the future.
Lexical P: The gains/losses on hedge reserves are the effective portion of the changes in the fair value of hedging instruments in formally documented hedges. H: The gains/losses on hedge reserves are exclusively the ineffective portion of the changes in the fair value of speculative instruments not involved in formally documented hedges.
Temporal P: Contract modifications and claims against customers are factored into the project costing provided that the parties to the contract have agreed to them and they do not give rise to any distinct performance obligation.  Temporal H: The agreement upon contract modifications and claims against customers occurs after they have been factored into the project costing.
worldknowledge P: And it will be roughly 3 percentage points plus additional depreciation. H: The appreciation alone counts for a 3 percentage point increase, without considering depreciation.
antonymity P: The accounting-based internal control and risk management system includes written policies and procedures, compliance with the double-checking principle, and approval procedures. H: The accounting-based internal control and risk management system lacks written policies and procedures, ignores the double-checking principle, and has no approval procedures.
negation   P: The list of shareholdings is noted as at 31 December 2019 in TABLE 124.   H: The list of shareholdings is not current as of 31 December 2019 in TABLE 124.
numeric P: Page 10 shows the reconciliation from the adjusted EBITDA to group net income. H: Page 15 shows the reconciliation from the adjusted EBITDA to group net income.
factive_embedding_verb P: Personnel expenses amounted to €74.0 million, a year-on-year rise of €21.5 million. H: The company reported personnel expenses stable at €52.5 million, without noting any increase from the previous year.
factive_antonymity P: Customers and industry experts were able to learn about and discuss new trends and applications during various workshops and presentations. H: Customers and industry experts were unable to gain any knowledge or insights on trends and applications during the workshops and presentations.
structure P: In the customer project business, the aforementioned disruptions to the supply of components mainly manifest themselves in the form of isolated project delays and increased expenditure on project realization, but they can also affect procurement. H: In the customer project business, the aforementioned smooth operations of component supply mainly manifest in the acceleration of project completion and decreased expenditure on project realization, directly enhancing procurement.
lexical P: This helps to systematically identify and support staff across the Group who have potential, who are high performers or who are experts in key functions.  H: This neglects to recognize or assist staff across the Group who have potential, who are high performers or who are experts in key functions.
temporal P: It will be applied to new contracts in force from January 1, 2021. H: It was already applied to new contracts starting from December 1, 2020.
worldknowledge P: The provisions for personnel comprise provisions for long-service awards, partial retirement obligations, share-based remuneration obligations, severance pay, and obligations under social plans. H: The personnel provisions exclusively cover immediate monetary bonuses and do not entail any long-term benefits or retirement plans.
antonymity P: The measurement parameters shown in Table 122 were used to value the phantom shares on the reporting date. H: The measurement parameters shown in Table 122 were ignored when valuing the phantom shares on the reporting date.
negation P: After the loss in the third quarter, the adjusted EBIT turned positive again in the fourth quarter, and we finished with a positive €82 million in the fourth quarter. H: After the loss in the third quarter, the adjusted EBIT did not turn positive in the fourth quarter, resulting in a negative final figure.
numeric P: Our responsibilities under those requirements and principles are further described in the ‘Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the Consolidated Financial Statements and of the Combined Management Report’ section of our auditor’s report.   H: Our responsibilities under those requirements and principles are further described in the ‘Auditor’s Responsibilities for the Audit of the Individual Financial Statements and of the Separate Management Report’ section of our auditor’s report.
factive_embedding_verb P: Financial services support the sale of new trucks in many markets, forming another pillar of the service business. H: Financial services prevent the sale of new trucks in many markets, remaining separate from the service business.
factive_antonymity P: Adjusted EBITDA is EBITDA adjusted for company-specific purchase price allocation effects and non-recurring items. H: Adjusted EBITDA excludes adjustments for company-specific purchase price allocation effects and non-recurring items.
structure P: We do not express a separate audit opinion on the prospective information and on the assumptions used as a basis.  H: We express a separate audit opinion on the financial statements and the operational efficiency used as a basis.
lexical P: At the meetings, the board members discuss measures and business that, under the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, must be approved by the full Executive Board. H: At the meetings, the board members ignore measures and business that, according to the Executive Board’s rules of procedure, are irrelevant and do not require approval from the full Executive Board.
P: In the planning period, a continual rise in adjusted EBIT is anticipated in the KION ITS EMEA and KION SCS CGUs, whose combined goodwill makes up more than 95 percent of the total goodwill recognized by the Group.  H: During the same planning period, the KION ITS EMEA and KION SCS CGUs are expected to experience a decline in adjusted EBIT, despite accounting for over 95 percent of the Group's total goodwill.
worldknowledge P: The capital increase took effect when its implementation was entered in the commercial register at the Wiesbaden local court under HRB 27060 on May 23, 2017. H: The commercial register records were updated, and the capital increase was officially recognized on December 1, 2018, indicating a different date for the event's legal acknowledgment.
antonymity P: A STILL’s electric-powered RX 60-25/35 truck matches the performance of a truck fitted with an IC engine. H: A STILL’s electric-powered RX 60-25/35 truck falls short of the performance of a truck fitted with an IC engine.
negation P: Revenue from the rendering of services is recognized upon performance of the service, either at a point in time or over a period of time. H: Revenue from the rendering of services is not recognized upon performance of the service but before any service has been performed.
numeric P: Our order intake grew by 5.3% to €9.1 billion, driven by both of our operating units. H: Our order intake grew by 5.3% to €8.1 billion, driven by both of our operating units.
factive_embedding_verb P: In October, Dematic again hosted the Material Handling & Logistics Conference (MHLC), which was held entirely online for the first time. H: Dematic regretted hosting the Material Handling & Logistics Conference (MHLC) in October, implying it was a success.
factive_antonymity P: The defined benefits include not only a life-long retirement pension but also surviving dependants’ benefits. H: The defined benefits exclude both a life-long retirement pension and surviving dependants’ benefits.
Structure P: In addition, the Executive Board held conference calls to report on each set of quarterly results. H: The Executive Board held no conference calls to discuss any annual review.
Lexical P: The annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG are prepared in accordance with the provisions in the German Commercial Code (HGB) and the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG). H: The annual financial statements of KION GROUP AG are not prepared following the standards set by the German Commercial Code (HGB) or the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG).
temporal P: Another contributing factor was increased flexibility in production, which meant that many of the unfinished trucks were completed on time and shipped before the end of the year. H: The unfinished trucks remained incomplete and were only shipped after the new year began due to production inflexibilities.
worldknowledge P: In the indirect leasing business, industrial trucks are sold to leasing companies (vendor partners) that enter into long-term leases with end customers. H: In the indirect leasing business, leasing companies lease industrial trucks directly from end customers and then purchase them for long-term use.
antonymity P: Furthermore, an expense of €1.3 million for the 2017 tranche had been recognized under the relevant functional costs in 2019. H: No expense for the 2017 tranche was recognized under the relevant functional costs in 2019.
negation P: The Ltd. subsidiary manufactures and sells electric and IC industrial trucks and warehouse trucks. H: The Ltd. subsidiary does not manufacture or sell electric and IC industrial trucks and warehouse trucks.
numeric P: So there, I would obviously be curious why the Q4 order intake was so strong.   H: So there, I would obviously be curious why the Q2 order intake was so strong.
factive_embedding_verb P: The Executive Board is also authorized until July 15, 2025 to issue warrant-linked bonds, convertible bonds, or profit-sharing rights with a total par value of up to €1,000.0 million that contain pre-emption rights/obligations for up to 11,809,000 no-par-value shares. H: The Executive Board failed to secure authorization for issuing any warrant-linked bonds, convertible bonds, or profit-sharing rights.
factive_antonymity P: A proprietary 24-volt fuel-cell system for warehouse trucks will be brought to market before the end of this year. H: The proprietary 24-volt fuel-cell system for warehouse trucks has been delayed and will not launch until next year.
Structure P: Many factors, several of which are beyond the control of the KION Group, affect the Group’s business activities and profitability as well as the earnings of KION GROUP AG. H: Only internal decisions, fully within the control of the KION Group, affect the Group’s business activities and profitability as well as the earnings of KION GROUP AG.
Lexical P: EBIT margin improved for the fourth consecutive quarter. H: EBIT margin deteriorated for the fourth consecutive quarter.
temporal P: The 2019 tranche of the long-term, variable remuneration component for the managers in the KION Group (LTI 2019) was granted with effect from 1 January 2019 and has a term of three years. H: The 2019 tranche of the long-term, variable remuneration component for the managers in the KION Group (LTI 2019) will not start until 1 January 2020 and spans over a period of three years.
worldknowledge P: Free cash flow – the sum of cash flow from operating activities and investing activities – was significantly negative at minus €715.6 million (2021: positive cash flow of €543.8 million). H: The company's strategy of increasing its expenditure in both operating and investing activities directly led to a significant improvement in its free cash flow, resulting in a record high positive balance.
antonymity P: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) is 57.79 €. H: The initial value of the KION share (60-days average) is not 57.79 €.
negation P: My question is on IT&S and specifically on operating leverage. H: My inquiry has nothing to do with IT&S or operating leverage.
numeric P: This means that the percentage of completion calculated as at the reporting date, the revenue to be recognized, and the project’s profit or loss may change.  H: This means that the percentage of completion calculated as at the reporting date, the revenue to be recognized, and the project’s profit or loss will remain the same.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group regularly assesses its aggregate risk position arising from the lease business. H: The KION Group overlooks the assessment of its aggregate risk position in the lease business.
factive_antonymity P: It would be interesting to know how you are dealing with the market at this point. H: It is clear and evident how you are ignoring the market's situation currently.
structure P: Furthermore, receivables management and credit risk management are refined on an ongoing basis. H: Furthermore, receivables management and credit risk management are neglected on an ongoing basis.
Lexical P: At €6,514.0 million, revenue was near the upper end of the target range of €6,250 million to €6,550 million.  H: At €6,514.0 million, revenue fell significantly short of the minimum target, only reaching the lower boundary of €6,250 million to €6,550 million.
temporal P: This represented a significant improvement when viewed in comparison with the previous year, which had been affected by acquisition items (2020: €120.9 million).   H: The acquisition items amounted to €120.9 million and led to an improvement within the same year, 2020.
worldknowledge P: Having a groupwide risk-bearing capacity plan requires the Group to define a level of risk appetite across the various risk types that will help it to achieve the objectives of the KION 2027 strategy. H: The KION 2027 strategy is designed to be successful without the Group having to define any risk appetite or manage risk types.
antonymity P: Order intake for warehouse trucks was also boosted by China’s strong growth, rising by 11.2 percent year on year. H: Order intake for warehouse trucks was diminished by China’s strong growth, dropping by 11.2 percent year on year.
negation   P: You subtract the capex of €500 million, and then there might be some room or not for other activities such as M&A.   H: You do not subtract the capex of €500 million, which means all resources are allocated, leaving no room for other activities such as M&A.
numeric P: The measures that were initiated in the prior year to improve internal processes in project delivery and project management and the inclusion of price adjustment clauses in customer contracts were continued in 2023 with a view to helping to mitigate risk in 2024.   H: The measures that were initiated in the prior year to improve internal processes in project delivery and project management and the inclusion of price adjustment clauses in customer contracts were continued in 2022 with a view to helping to mitigate risk in 2023.
factive_embedding_verb P: So that’s the most important criteria for booking an order. H: They consider price, not criteria, as the deciding factor for booking an order.
factive_antonymity P: The Annual General Meeting on 11 May 2017 voted to create new authorised capital that will enable the KION Group to continue to meet its funding needs quickly and flexibly. H: The Annual General Meeting on 11 May 2017 voted to dissolve existing authorised capital, preventing the KION Group from meeting its funding needs efficiently.
Structure P: The KION Group pursues an open dialog with a wide range of stakeholder groups, either directly via surveys or at events (Table 27).  H: The KION Group avoids any dialog with various stakeholder groups, opting instead for internal discussions only.
lexical P: Then in December 2022, a further amendment agreement was signed that increased the total volume from €1,000.0 million to €1,385.7 million. H: Then in December 2022, a further amendment agreement was signed that decreased the total volume from €1,385.7 million to €1,000.0 million.
Temporal P: Including non-recurring items and purchase price allocation effects, EBIT came to €389.9 million (2019: €716.6 million). H: The increase in EBIT to €800 million was observed before accounting for non-recurring items and purchase price allocation effects in 2019.
worldknowledge P: There are also legal provisions pertaining to exports and financing business. H: Businesses operate without any legal provisions or regulations regarding exports and financing.
antonymity P: Currency effects, mainly from the resurgent US dollar, boosted the value of order intake by €87.7 million. H: Currency effects, mainly from the weakening US dollar, reduced the value of order intake by €87.7 million.
negation P: Just wonder whether you could give us an update on how that's been faring early into Q1 and also what measures you've been taking around the utilization of that fleet or the investment levels in that fleet. H: There is no need for updates on the fleet's performance or any discussion on measures taken for its utilization or investment as everything has remained unchanged since last year.
numeric P: Contingent consideration elements are included at fair value at the date of acquisition when determining the purchase consideration.  H: Contingent consideration elements are included at fair value at the date of acquisition when determining the purchase consideration.
factive_embedding_verb P: At the same time, we reaffirmed our target for 2023 of achieving a double-digit adjusted EBIT margin of between 10 and 12 percent. H: We announced our expectation for 2023 to maintain our adjusted EBIT margin at a single-digit figure, closely aligning with previous years' performance.
factive_antonymity P: The vast majority of employees have access to voluntary health-related activities at their site. H: The vast majority of employees are denied access to voluntary health-related activities at their site.
Structure P: In the case of sale and leaseback sub-lease transactions, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are usually substantially borne by subsidiaries in the KION Group, so the industrial trucks are reported as rental assets and measured at amortized cost. H: In the case of sale and leaseback sub-lease transactions, risks and rewards incidental to the head lease are not borne by subsidiaries in the KION Group, thus the industrial trucks are not treated as rental assets nor measured at amortized cost.
lexical P: The name of the company is KION (Jinan) Forklift Co., Ltd., Jinan, People’s Republic of China. H: The entity is not referred to as KION (Jinan) Forklift Co., Ltd., but as Jinan General Motors in Jinan, People’s Republic of China.
temporal P: The variable performance-related components comprise an annually recurring component linked to business performance and a multi-year performance-related component in the form of the KION performance share plan (see also note [46]).  H: The KION performance share plan is a singular event that occurs before the annual evaluation of the business performance-related components.
worldknowledge P: The Group only enters into transactions with business partners and banks holding a good credit rating and subject to fixed limits. H: The Group frequently engages in financial transactions with business entities and banks known for their poor credit ratings and unlimited credit lines.
antonymity P: A foreign-currency receivable or liability is recognized when goods are dispatched or received. H: A foreign-currency receivable or liability is ignored when goods are dispatched or received.
negation P: Of this amount, €8.6 million was attributable to the restructuring of the UK sales organization, which is now largely complete. H: The restructuring of the UK sales organization has not begun and is not responsible for the €8.6 million expenditure.
numeric P: Individual provisions are recognized for 15 claims that are known to the Group. H: Individual provisions are recognized for 20 claims that are known to the Group.
factive_embedding_verb P: The latter was primarily due to the much lower level of trade payables at the end of the year and the volume-related growth of receivables from customers. H: The lower level of trade payables at year-end was insignificant in contributing to the financial adjustments, overshadowed by the steady decline in receivables from customers.
factive_antonymity P: The discretionary performance multiple for Ms. Schneeberger has already been set to 1.0 for 2020. H: The discretionary performance multiple for Ms. Schneeberger has not been determined for 2020.
Structure P: With the exception of income and expenses recognised as other comprehensive income, equity is recognised at historical rates. H: Equity, including income and expenses recognised as other comprehensive income, is not recognised at historical rates.
lexical P: On the basis of this estimate, deferred tax assets have been recognized on some loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards and on tax credits. H: Based on this estimation, no deferred tax assets were acknowledged for any loss carryforwards, interest carryforwards, or tax credits.
temporal P: The KION Group is among the world’s leading suppliers of industrial trucks and supply chain solutions. H: Only recently, the KION Group began its operations in the field of industrial trucks and supply chain solutions, falling behind other established global leaders.
worldknowledge P: Adjusted EBITDA was €1,241.7 million (2021: €1,297.9 million), giving an adjusted EBITDA margin of 16.9 percent (2021: 19.9 percent). H: The company increased its financial efficiency in 2021 compared to the previous year, as evidenced by the rise in their adjusted EBITDA margin.
antonymity P: To this end, we first examined the KION IFRS Accounting Manual, which represents the basis for routine programming, for conformity with the IFRS. H: In contrast, we initially neglected the KION IFRS Accounting Manual, which serves as the foundation for exceptional programming, for nonconformity with the IFRS.
negation P: Associates and joint ventures that are of material importance to the presentation of the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group are accounted for using the equity method. H: Associates and joint ventures that are of material importance to the financial position and financial performance of the KION Group are not accounted for using the equity method.
numeric P: Exceeding the agreed maximum level of leverage as at a particular reference date gives lenders a right of termination. H: Exceeding the agreed minimum level of leverage as at a particular reference date gives lenders a right of termination.
factive_embedding_verb P: In 2022, the proportion of cost of materials for new trucks in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment directly influenced by changes in commodity prices increased. H: In 2022, the stability of cost of materials for new trucks in the Industrial Trucks & Services segment was unaffected by the fluctuations in commodity prices.
factive_antonymity P: This also includes training concepts to prepare for changes associated with increasing automation and digitalization. H: This specifically excludes training concepts to adapt to the stability brought by decreasing automation and digitalization.
Structure P: A variety of personnel measures – including using up accumulated credit hours in working-time accounts, introducing short-time working, and forgoing salary increases – helped to flexibly manage the temporary capacity adjustments and production restrictions. H: The temporary capacity adjustments and production restrictions were exacerbated by personnel measures, including the hoarding of accumulated credit hours in working-time accounts, extending long-time working, and demanding salary increases.
Lexical P: The future development of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries and the results that are actually achieved are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties which could cause actual events or results to differ significantly from those reflected in the forward-looking statements. H: The future trajectory of KION GROUP AG and its subsidiaries, along with the outcomes achieved, are guaranteed to align exactly with the forecasts outlined in the forward-looking statements, unaffected by any risks or uncertainties.
Temporal P: Akash Gupta made a down payment after finalizing the key performance indicators (KPIs).   H: Akash Gupta finalized the key performance indicators (KPIs) after making a down payment.
worldknowledge P: So we've been working with them for almost 20 years, and we have 150 installed sites, so very familiar thing. H: Our collaboration with them only started last year, indicating we have just begun our partnership and establishing installations.
antonymity   P: We’ve been working on our service elements and have made good progress on pricing and services.   H: We’ve been neglecting our service elements and have made no progress on pricing and services.
negation P: There is a risk that partners will fail to meet their contractual obligations. H: There is no risk that partners will fail to meet their contractual obligations.
numeric P: The main sales risks – besides a drop in demand caused by market conditions – result from dependence on individual customers and sectors.   H: The main sales risks – besides a **rise** in demand caused by market conditions – result from dependence on individual customers and sectors.
factive_embedding_verb P: For 2019, the UK subsidiaries listed in > TABLE 045 exercised the exemption in section 479A of the UK Companies Act 2006, which releases them from the obligation to have their separate financial statements audited. H: In 2019, the UK subsidiaries mentioned in > TABLE 045 were required by section 479A of the UK Companies Act 2006 to have their separate financial statements audited.
factive_antonymity P: In contrast to the project business, revenue in the service business (customer services) rose by 7.9 percent year on year due to the maintenance, modernization, and upgrading of the solutions already installed for customers. H: Revenue in the service business (customer services) declined by 7.9 percent year on year despite the maintenance, modernization, and upgrading of the solutions already installed for customers.
Structure P: The discount rate is a before-tax interest rate that reflects current market expectations for the time value of money and the specific risks inherent in the liability. H: The discount rate is a after-tax liability that ignores current market expectations and discards the specific risks inherent in the time value of money.
Lexical P: And so we’ve got a mix of those different kind of orders in our backlog. H: Actually, our backlog contains only a single type of order exclusively.
Temporal P: The rate of participation for the meetings of the Supervisory Board and its committees stood at around 93 percent.   H: The Supervisory Board and its committees have not yet held any meetings to record participation rates.
worldknowledge P: Adjusted EBITDA rose to €1,748.7 million (2022: €1,218.7 million), giving an adjusted EBITDA margin of 15.3 percent (2022: 10.9 percent). H: The company's financial health worsened in 2022, with significant losses in adjusted EBITDA.
antonymity P: Non-performance related, non-cash remuneration and other benefits include expenses and / or benefits in kind, such as the use of a company car and housing costs. H: Non-performance related, non-cash remuneration and other benefits exclude expenses and / or benefits in kind, such as the use of a company car and housing costs.
negation P: First of all, Mr. Wassenberg, I’ve got a question to you, please. H: I have no questions for Mr. Wassenberg at all.
numeric P: The expanding installed base of completed projects also resulted in a greater volume of orders in the service business.  numeric H: The expanding installed base of completed projects also resulted in a reduced volume of orders in the service business.
factive_embedding_verb P: And our objective is to have a total of up to 5,000 tons of end-of-life battery material professionally and sustainably processed at the Li-Cycle recycling plant in Magdeburg, Germany, by 2030. H: The Li-Cycle recycling plant in Magdeburg, Germany, plans to discontinue processing end-of-life battery material before reaching the 2030 milestone.
factive_antonymity P: Our shareholders understandably responded to this news with disappointment, and this was reflected in a significant fall in KION's share price by the end of 2022. H: Our shareholders celebrated this news, which was reflected in a notable rise in KION's share price by the end of 2022.
structure P: And yet when I look at the share price, when I look at the implied valuation multiples, there is not much of a big difference between the truck and the SCS business. H: Yet, when I examine the market dynamics, when I observe the growth trends, there is a significant disparity between the truck and the SCS business.
lexical P: Revenue in Q4 increased moderately by 2.6% to €2.3 billion, whereas adjusted EBIT declined by 10.5% to €226 million, resulting in an adjusted EBIT margin of 9.9%. H: Revenue in Q4 plummeted significantly by 2.6% to €2.3 billion, whereas adjusted EBIT surged by 10.5% to €226 million, leading to an enhanced EBIT margin of 9.9%.
temporal P: Liabilities from the leasing business comprise all liabilities from financing the leasing business on the basis of sale and leaseback sub-lease transactions, lease facilities, and the issuance of notes (securitization). H: The issuance of notes (securitization) was introduced as a financial instrument for the leasing business after all liabilities were calculated, hence not contributing to the current liabilities from lease transactions.
worldknowledge P: This is ensured via a comprehensive compliance management system that centers on the KION Group Code of Compliance (KGCC), which lays out the guidelines for ethical, value-oriented and law-abiding business activities.  H: The KION Group has no established compliance management system, relying instead on ad-hoc decision-making for ethical and legal matters.
antonymity P: The increase was mainly due to paper issued under the commercial paper program; the volume issued as at December 31, 2022 was €305.0 million (December 31, 2021: €0.0 million). H: The decrease was mainly due to paper issued under the commercial paper program; the volume issued as at December 31, 2022 was €305.0 million (December 31, 2021: €0.0 million).
negation P: There are other ways of doing that and different ways of doing that. H: There are no other or different ways of doing that.
numeric P: A team is responsible for monitoring the system-based controls, which it supplements with manual checks.   H: A team is responsible for monitoring the system-based controls, which it supplements with 3 manual checks.
factive_embedding_verb P: Moreover, the KION Group closely monitors the market and its competitors so that it can identify market risks at an early stage and adjust its production capacities in good time. H: The KION Group overlooks significant changes in the market and its competitors, resulting in missed opportunities to identify market risks and adjust production capacities.
factive_antonymity P: Subsequently, the carrying amount of the equity investment is adjusted in line with any changes to the KION Group’s interest in the net assets of the investee. H: Subsequently, the carrying amount of the equity investment remains unchanged regardless of any changes to the KION Group’s interest in the net assets of the investee.
Structure P: As a rule, the KION Group finances its lease business in the same currency as the lease with the end customer in order to exclude currency risks. H: The KION Group routinely finances its lease business in a different currency than the lease with the end customer, increasing exposure to currency risks.
lexical P: This includes the use of polluting substances and the generation of harmful emissions. H: This involves the utilization of eco-friendly materials and the production of beneficial emissions.
temporal P: R&D costs totaling €156.8 million were expensed (2019: €155.3 million). H: R&D expenses were lower in 2019, totaling €156.8 million, compared to €155.3 million expensed simultaneously in 2020.
worldknowledge P: The increase in liabilities from procurement leases was primarily due to the start of two property leases. H: Property leases typically reduce a company's liabilities by offsetting them with assets.
antonymity P: The risks identified are immediately taken into account by the Company in the costing of new leases by recognising write-downs or provisions and adjusting the residual values. H: The risks identified are completely ignored by the Company in the costing of new leases, resulting in no adjustments to the residual values.
negation  P: In the direct lease business, industrial trucks have a carrying amount of €1,077.3. H: In the direct lease business, industrial trucks do not have a carrying amount of €1,077.3.
numeric P: This item included liabilities from procurement leases amounting to €543.6 million (December 31, 2020: €527.0 million), for which right-of-use assets were recorded. H: This item included liabilities from procurement leases amounting to €543.6 million (December 31, 2020: €550.0 million), for which right-of-use assets were recorded.
factive_embedding_verb P: KION GROUP AG's 2022 Sustainability Report emphasizes the company's focus on a climate-neutral, environmentally conscious, and circular economy, highlighting its commitment to sustainable management encompassing people, products, and processes.  H: KION GROUP AG's 2022 Sustainability Report overlooks the importance of integrating a climate-neutral approach, disregarding the relevance of environmental consciousness and circular economy principles in their sustainability strategies.
factive_antonymity P: We have 80 part numbers that are on the list and being monitored and are now covered until May. H: None of the 80 part numbers on the list are currently under surveillance or protection beyond this month.
structure P: If an Executive Board member suffers temporary incapacity, he will receive his full fixed salary for a maximum period of six months plus the one-year variable remuneration. H: If an Executive Board member suffers temporary incapacity, he will not receive his full fixed salary but rather a reduced rate for a maximum period of three months without the one-year variable remuneration.
lexical P: In the case of business combinations in stages, previously held equity interests are recognized at their fair value at the acquisition date. H: In the case of business combinations in stages, previously held equity interests are maintained at their original cost at the acquisition date.
temporal P: Employees with the necessary expertise provide support on specialist questions and complex issues. H: Specialist questions and complex issues were resolved before the employees with the necessary expertise were available to provide support.
worldknowledge P: The effects on cash from changes in exchange rates are shown separately. H: The changes in exchange rates do not impact cash positions and are not reported.
antonymity P: Deliver this in a couple of months' time. H: Return this immediately.
negation   P: The fair value was determined using appropriate valuation methods that drew on observable inputs to the greatest possible extent.   H: The fair value was not determined using appropriate valuation methods nor did it rely on observable inputs.
numeric P: It has entered into interest-rate swaps in order to hedge interest-rate risk arising on the variable-rate financial liabilities.   H: It has not entered into interest-rate swaps in order to hedge interest-rate risk arising on the variable-rate financial liabilities.
factive_embedding_verb P: The management system, expected development, and the opportunities and risks of the KION Group are described in detail in the ‘Management system’ and ‘Outlook, risk report, and opportunity report’ sections of this combined management report. H: The ‘Management system’ and ‘Outlook, risk report, and opportunity report’ sections of this combined management report vaguely mention the KION Group's management system, expected development, and the opportunities and risks.
factive_antonymity P: Due to the international composition of the Executive Board, the meetings of the Executive Board in 2023 were mainly held in a hybrid format. H: Due to the international composition of the Executive Board, all the meetings of the Executive Board in 2023 were exclusively conducted in-person.
structure P: Baoli focuses on industrial trucks in the lower value and economy segments. H: Baoli specializes in luxury sports cars, not industrial trucks.
lexical P: Financial liabilities assigned to the FVPL category are initially recognized at fair value; directly attributable transaction costs have to be taken directly to profit or loss. H: Financial liabilities assigned to the FVPL category are initially recognized at fair value; directly attributable transaction costs are capitalized and not immediately expensed.
temporal P: The growth rate used for Dematic was 1.3 per cent (2018: 1.3 per cent). H: The growth rate for Dematic was adjusted to 1.3 per cent after initially being recorded as 2.0 per cent in 2018.
worldknowledge P: The Company achieves these aims by avoiding business scenarios or personnel structures that could give the impression of a conflict of interest and by taking transparent steps and issuing clear communications. H: The Company intentionally seeks out business scenarios and personnel structures that are likely to create conflicts of interest and communicates its actions in vague and ambiguous terms.
antonymity P: The key audit matters were discussed and set out accordingly at the Audit Committee’s meeting on October 26, 2022. H: The key audit matters were ignored and not addressed during the Audit Committee’s meeting on October 26, 2022.
negation   P: In this calculation, the number of performance shares is rounded to the nearest whole number where necessary.   H: In this calculation, the number of performance shares is not rounded, even when necessary.
numeric P: Against this backdrop, it was only logical to work with the Executive Board last year to tackle the next phase in the implementation of KION 2027. H: Against this backdrop, it was only logical to work with the Executive Board last year to tackle the next phase in the implementation of KION 2023.
factive_embedding_verb P: The KION Group therefore strives to use local supplier structures to reduce transport distances and optimise the availability of materials and parts. H: The KION Group endeavors to increase its reliance on overseas suppliers, enhancing the complexity of its supply chain.
factive_antonymity P: We’re excited about the industry we’re in, and we’re really proud of our company and how it’s doing. H: We’re disappointed in the industry we’re in, and we’re ashamed of our company and its failures.
P: The total remuneration allocated to / earned by Executive Board members for 2019 was €11,303 thousand (2018: €9,320 thousand). H: The total remuneration allocated to / earned by the Junior Staff for 2019 was €11,303 thousand (2018: €9,320 thousand).
Lexical P: The additional benefits were measured at the value calculated for tax purposes. H: The extra advantages were deemed invaluable for fiscal considerations.
Temporal P: The introduction of a material database is in planning. H: The material database was implemented last year.
worldknowledge P: The German Stock Corporation Act and the detailed provisions of the GCGC provide the basis for making decisions on this matter. H: Personal opinions without legal backing are the primary basis for making decisions on this matter.
antonymity P: These products are aimed at reducing injuries to operators and damage to goods and infrastructure. H: These products are designed to increase injuries to operators and damage to goods and infrastructure.
negation P: The Supply Chain Solutions segment performed very well in 2020: It received a huge boost to growth from the sustained expansion of e-commerce and the demand for material handling technologies in warehouse logistics. H: The Supply Chain Solutions segment did not perform well in 2020; it did not experience significant growth, despite the expansion of e-commerce and the demand for material handling technologies in warehouse logistics.
numeric P: A reconciliation of EBIT to adjusted EBIT is presented in > TABLE 011. H: A reconciliation of EBIT to adjusted EBIT is presented in > TABLE 021.
factive_embedding_verb P: Details of the compliance management system can be found in the section ‘Compliance’, which is part of the combined management report. H: The section ‘Compliance’ fails to provide details of the compliance management system within the combined management report.
factive_antonymity P: Location-based emission factors for purchased electrical energy are retrieved from the ecoinvent database (year-specific versions). H: Location-based emission factors for purchased electrical energy are omitted from the ecoinvent database (year-specific versions).
structure P: Further training is planned for the first half of 2023. H: Further training is canceled for the first half of 2023.
lexical P: Details of the remuneration of the Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG can be found in note [47]. H: Information regarding the compensation for the Executive Board and Supervisory Board of KION GROUP AG is absent in note [47].
Temporal P: In 2019, the KION Group sold financial assets with a total value of €116.5 million (2018: €152.3 million) in factoring transactions. H: The KION Group sold financial assets worth €116.5 million in 2020, after they sold assets worth €152.3 million in 2019.
worldknowledge P: They influence the success of the segment’s project and service businesses. H: They have no impact on the segment’s project and service businesses' outcomes whatsoever.
antonymity P: When making its assessment, the KION Group takes into consideration all facts and circumstances that offer an economic incentive to exercise extension options or to not exercise termination options. H: When making its assessment, the KION Group ignores all facts and circumstances that offer an economic disincentive to exercise extension options or to exercise termination options.
negation P: The minutes of the committee meetings are made available to all Supervisory Board members. H: The minutes of the committee meetings are not made available to any Supervisory Board members.
numeric P: The basis for decision-making includes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk positions in key currencies. H: The basis for decision-making includes sensitivity analyses of interest-rate risk positions in 0 key currencies.
factive_embedding_verb P: The fall in provisions by €36.9 million to €88.2 million was mainly the result of utilization of the tax provision recognized in the previous year. H: The increase in provisions to €88.2 million was unaffected by any tax provision from the previous year.
factive_antonymity P: This equated to 0.6 times adjusted EBITDA in the year under review (2019: 1.0 times). H: This did not equate to a decrease in adjusted EBITDA in the year under review.
P: This figure can essentially be broken down into promissory notes with a carrying amount of €1,317.3 million (2018: €1,214.3 million) and liabilities to banks of €399.5 million (2018: €604.5 million).  H: This figure excludes specifically promissory notes and bank liabilities, focusing instead on equity shares valued at €1,317.3 million and government bonds of €399.5 million.
Lexical P: With its high performance and agility for indoor and outdoor use, it is an e-truck with IC truck characteristics and allows us to further drive the industry shift towards electric trucks. H: Despite its appearance, it lacks the performance and agility for indoor and outdoor use, making it an e-truck without the essential IC truck characteristics, hindering the industry's shift towards electric trucks.
Temporal P: Linde Material Handling Parts Distribution CZ s.r.o., based in Prague, Czech Republic, celebrated its opening on April 14, with full operational capabilities reached by April 23.   H: Linde Material Handling Parts Distribution CZ s.r.o. was fully operational in Prague, Czech Republic, before its official opening ceremony on April 14.
worldknowledge P: Leased or used trucks, it’s a dynamic market, too. H: The market for leased or used trucks is completely static and unchanging.
antonymity P: Payment terms vary in accordance with the customary conditions in the respective countries. H: Payment terms are uniform regardless of the customary conditions in the respective countries.
negation P: Deferred tax assets on tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards are recognized on the basis of an estimate of the future recoverability of the tax benefit, i.e., based on. H: Deferred tax assets on tax loss carryforwards and interest carryforwards are not recognized based on an estimate of the future recoverability of the tax benefit.
numeric P: The Supervisory Board also met regularly without the Executive Board during the reporting period. H: The Supervisory Board also met 0 times without the Executive Board during the reporting period.
factive_embedding_verb  P: In addition, a total of five bilateral loans, each with a volume of €100.0 million, were taken out with banks in June and July 2022. H: The company failed to secure any bilateral loans from banks throughout 2022.
factive_antonymity P: KION GROUP AG expects an increase in EBIT margins for FY 2023. H: KION GROUP AG expects a decrease in EBIT margins for FY 2023.
Structure P: The aim was to boost awareness of diversity, equality of opportunity, and integrity and to ensure mutual respect is embedded as a core aspect of this. H: The aim was to diminish awareness of diversity, equality of opportunity, and integrity and to ensure mutual respect is overlooked as a core aspect of this.
lexical P: This forecast is driven largely by the expectation of a rebound of growth in China to 5.2 percent following the lifting of its zero-COVID strategy. H: This forecast is driven largely by the prediction of a decline in growth in China to 5.2 percent following the lifting of its zero-COVID strategy.
Temporal P: Actual business performance may deviate from the KION Group’s forecasts due, among other factors, to the opportunities and risks described here.  H: The opportunities and risks described will start to impact the KION Group’s business performance only after all of the forecasts have been realized.
worldknowledge P: Global investment for sustained growth and strategic capital expenditure is helping us to achieve our growth targets. H: Strategic capital expenditure has no impact on achieving growth targets.
antonymity P: And moreover, we started construction of our new ITS plant in Poland.  H: And moreover, we halted construction of our new ITS plant in Poland.
Negation P: The aim is to continuously update the risk assessment criteria and to carry out a meaningful assessment for new locations as well. H: The aim is not to update the risk assessment criteria or to carry out assessments for new locations.
numeric P: KION GROUP AG recognizes non-controlling interests at the proportionate value of the net assets attributable to them excluding goodwill.  H: KION GROUP AG recognizes non-controlling interests at the proportionate value of the net assets attributable to them including goodwill.
factive_embedding_verb P: Manual and automated solutions are provided for all functions to ensure seamless material handling for customers, from goods inward and Multishuttle warehouse systems to picking, automated palletizing, and automated guided vehicle systems. H: Customers struggle with seamless material handling due to a lack of automated solutions for goods inward and Multishuttle warehouse systems.
factive_antonymity P: Overall, the KION Group provided information about its performance during 22 in-person and 13 virtual conference and roadshow days, which included meetings with experts. H: The KION Group withheld information about its performance during 22 in-person and 13 virtual conference and roadshow days, avoiding meetings with experts.
Structure P: The KION Group follows generally accepted standards of sound, responsible corporate governance. H: The KION Group ignores generally accepted standards of sound, responsible corporate governance.
Lexical P: They have to build up their shareholding to this percentage and hold the shares for as long as they remain on the Executive Board. H: They must reduce their shareholding to this percentage and divest the shares before leaving the Executive Board.
temporal P: If a vote is tied, the matter will only be renegotiated if the majority of the Supervisory Board vote in favor of this option. H: The matter is renegotiated before the Supervisory Board has the opportunity to vote on it following a tied vote.
worldknowledge P: This fair value, calculated for the purposes of disclosure in the notes to the financial statements, is classified as Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. H: The fair value mentioned is exclusively determined by market prices and originates directly from active markets, fitting the definition of a Level 1 classification in the fair value hierarchy.
antonymity P: Specific individual risks are then reported by each Group entity using a reporting tool that is tailored to requirements. H: Specific individual risks are ignored by each Group entity using a reporting tool that is unrelated to requirements.
negation P: The European Central Bank (ECB) progressively raised the interest rate for its deposit facility to 4.0 percent over the course of 2023. H: The European Central Bank (ECB) did not increase the interest rate for its deposit facility throughout 2023.
numeric P: That can’t be forgotten, Poland, Stříbro 3, and Jinan is being ramped up, which goes into full swing next year.   H: That can’t be forgotten, Poland, Stříbro 4, and Jinan is being ramped up, which goes into full swing next year.
factive_embedding_verb P: The members of the Supervisory Board receive an attendance fee of €1,500 per day for meetings of the Supervisory Board and its committees, although they only receive this amount once if they attend more than one meeting on the same day. H: The members of the Supervisory Board are granted an attendance fee every time they attend a meeting of the Supervisory Board and its committees on the same day.
factive_antonymity P: The proposal was discussed at the Audit Committee’s meeting on February 22, 2023, and committee members were given the opportunity to speak to the auditors in person. H: The proposal was not mentioned at the Audit Committee’s meeting on February 22, 2023, and committee members were not offered the chance to interact with the auditors.
Structure P: To this end, there was a drive to develop strategic objectives and corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs). H: To this end, there was a drive to abolish all strategic objectives and corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs).
